
                   Dr. A is an amazing professor who genuinely cares about his students. He has a very deep knowledge about testing and that makes this class all the more enjoyable. I would recommend taking this course AFTER completing Statistics.
                
                   Wonderful professor, great teacher, and genuinely cares about the well-being and learning of his students.
                
                   He is a great professor. His specialty area is in Neuropsychology so he lectures deeper about this subject. His Theories of Personality class is great also. He either uses the textbook or he doesnt depending on the class.
                
                   Worst online experience ever. She waited until finals week to grade anything so you didn't have a clear idea of where you stood in the class. Her course was extremely demanding for an online class. She pretty much just put her in-class syllabus online, which was a huge struggle to keep up with because there were several assignments due a week. 
                
                   Dr. C is awesome! She uses humor and examples that college students can relate to in order to make the material more interesting and easier to understand. She gives four big tests but prepares you with a study guide. Go to class for the lectures and you will be fine. She makes psychology fun. I learned a bunch!
                
                   He is an extremely tough professor but he prepared me, as an undergraduate, better than any other professor did for what to expect in graduate school. He is always willing to help and is brilliant but sometimes disorganized.
                
                   Likes to intimidate students. Gives no feedback. Never makes appointments on time.
                
                   Took him for stats, experimental, learning. I made As in all 3 courses, but oh, I worked for them! He is very intelligent, and very willing to help, IF you show him you truly are trying and take his courses (and psych) seriously. I would try to get on his good side; (I think) I did, and it does pay off in the end! Oh, and READ THE TEXTBOOK!
                
                   He has you work the problems before class which always really confused me. But once he explains it, it gets easier. Also if you ask for help, he's there to do what he can. I think the biggest problem was he understands everything so well and it's hard for him to dumb it down.
                
                   Dr. Byrd is a terrible undergrad professor. He does not and will not report grades at all during the semester so don't bother asking. Questions & comments just throw him off, that's never a good thing. His tests are neither valid nor reliable as they test you mostly on language and he uses too many distractor options.
                
                   I had this professor for several classes and would take more with him in a minute.  He is excellent - requires much of his students, but students will remember the material when engaging in a career in psychology.  He is concerned that students learn and be able to apply material learned.
                
                   Very disorganized. Lost my final test. Took over my lab time after he'd approved it weeks in advance. Bright, scatterbrained. Difficult to predict what he will test over. Hate him a decade later.
                
                   Took Dr Byrd for about 5 classes in my undergrad. A common misconception is that he doesnt care for the student and is unapproachable. I found this not to be true. His material IS much more difficult than many other pysc teachers and he can be unorganized at times, however he legitimately cares that you are really learning and not regurgitating.
                
                   He is a very hard teacher I would have to study a week in advance, and spent most of my time with his class. He doesnt lecture out of the text but you NEED to READ IT because you wont understand what hes talking about. He is very unorginized. I donr recomend him but he is the only perfossor that teaches certain classes!Prepare yourself!
                
                   One of my most challenging classes so far. He doesn't teach what will be on the test and is a harsh grader, especially when it comes to the open-ended questions. Be prepared to be challenged, yet confused and lost at the same time.
                
                   I had Byrd in 1993 and1994. He's tough & opinionated. His expectations for students was high,  but he's the only prof I remember by name almost 20 yrs later. I remember him being fair, and upset at his GA's for not grading quicker. I took 3 of his classes in the same semester and earned 2 B's & a D (stats).
                
                   Worst class of my college career. Period.  He goes very fast and doesn't like to explain things if they weren't understood the first time.
                
                   Avoid this man at all costs! Expect to get no feedback or no tests returned. So disorganized and does not tolerate different viewpoints
                
                   Dr. Byrd's classes are very challenging. He keeps a fast pace and you learn quite a bit about difficult material. My only complaint is that he seems to think his classes should be our only priority. When you are a full time student it is not reasonable to spend as much time studying for one class. He demands alot out of his students.
                
                   He is an extremely brilliant man, but he is horrible as an undergrad professor.  He is constantly disorganized, forgetful, and above all, ARROGANT.  He thinks the world of himself, and its irritating.  He cannot communicate well with students. His answers to your questions are always way off mark. Wish he would go back to the lab and work with rats
                
                   I've found Dr. Byrd to be a very helpful, enthusiastic, and informed professor. He is one of the rare ones that actually WANTS his students to do well. As long as you can prove to him that you are trying, and that you want to learn, you should do fine. He is my absolute favorite.
                
                   he sucks bigtime
                
                   Not helpful, not organized....a couple of the worst classes I ever HAD to take.  Maybe so smart that he can't regurgitate the material to normal students.
                
                   Dr. Byrd does not &quot;teach to the test.&quot;  He develops students for a lifetime of learning and success.  I was challenged academically like never before, but I am a better learner and person from the experience.
                
                   I learned nothing the entire semester!  I think he has ADD.  this class was unorganized, and poorly taught.
                
                   There is a lot of reading but it's not too much if you manage your time wisely. I would definitely take him again. 
                
                   I would NEVER take another class with him! Haven't learned, lectures are vague but testing is hard. Midterm took over an hour and a half. Everyone failed but two. You end up teaching yourself . No interaction between students and himself , he could careless of his students .  
                
                   Great teacher and person. Explains everything very well. Some would say he requires a lot of reading, but honestly, if you just pay attention in class,(which isn't hard to do) you probably don't even need to read all of the assigned reading material. Highly recommend this class and Professor Denton! :)
                
                   Loved his class he makes it fun and has very good and clear examples. Its best to try and go to every class because he covers a lot of material.
                
                   Class is really easy. Online Quiz every week but its easy. Final is from online quizzes. Mr. Denton is really nice and the class is interesting. Recommend this teacher.
                
                   Mrs. Fry is a great professor. She clearly explains material and will prepare you for exams. Very helpful teacher and willing to work with students and explain concepts. If you study for exams and attend class, you can easily receive an A in this course.
                
                   Good teacher. Really sweet and really wants to make sure that her students understand the material. Tests are mostly from notes.
                
                   Professor Fry was a very good teacher, everything was clear and well explained.  She projected well for such a small woman in such a large room.  Unfortunately her TA was no where near as good, and was a real hindrance to the class.  The days which he taught were not worth attending.
                
                   If you don't know what you want to do in Psychology, take a few classes from Dr. Harland and it will all come to life.  His passion for the field is inspiring and that dry humor is never dull.  He knows his stuff, is well prepared for class; and he expects the same from you.   Studying required.
                
                   The key to getting an A in Dr. Harland's classes is to go to class with the text book, listen to what he says, and highlight the material out of the book.  He always covers the material for tests in his lectures, which are entertaining and funny.  Not fast paced, though in-depth with material.  Dr. Harland knows his stuff! Go to class!
                
                   I 've taken Dr. Harland's classes over the last 3 years and have enjoyed them all. He's not an easy teacher, but he knows his stuff and will help you if you go to him with questions. All of his classes require a great deal of effort on behalf of the student, but he gives the same amount of effort. He'll keep you laughing once you get him!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Excellent teacher...a little dazed at times but vast knowledge, great humor, and makes class interesting.  He also cares about students and is always willing to listen and help...One of my favorites! (Even in stats)
                
                   not an easy teacher, but one who really cares. Knows a lot and is more then willing to let his students benifit from that knowledge.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   A great teacher! Hippie! Tons of fun and makes the class enjoyable!
                
                   His tests are easy and he let us disect a sheep brain. Very cool.
                
                   A total hippie; a fun class to take
                
                   Awesome professor. Some friends had issues with her, but if you can really listen in lectures it helps a lot. She does like for you to read before class, but you can still do well without doing so, but still get your text book. I've taken her for several classes and would take more. 
                
                   Dr. P was great for child development! We had 3 tests and 3 short, non-research papers, and the material was fairly easy. You did have to read the textbook some, but it wasn't unreasonable. If you skip class, though, your grade will suffer. She was friendly, knowledgable, and approachable, and I'm taking her again for 4342 in the fall!
                
                   She has two tests a semester and four written assignments. The written assignments are pretty easy but the tests you have to study for. She's really cool and makes her class entertaining. I would take her again for sure.
                
                   Easy class just a lot of reading. Really informed about what she teaches and actually cares and has stories and studies to back up what she teaches. Really good even when someone chalenges what she says.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I think I would've liked Dr. V more if I took her for a different class; 2272 is kind of a joke when you're a junior. I didn't care about the class content, but I did like Dr. V. She was energetic, knowledgable, hilarious, and encouraged discussion. I hope to take her for an upper-level class to get a better feel for her! 
                
                   Dr. V is awesome!  I knew nothing about psych before I took this course, but she was very knowledgeable and always there to help.  You def won't fall asleep in this class, she is very fun and outgoing.  I would recommend this class  to everyone.
                
                   Dr. V is a lot of fun. I took her my very first semester and I loved her class! She is from Canada, so she has a bit of that Canadian accent, but its great! She is really fun and really nice. She tries her best to help in any way possible. 
                
                   Bisi was very helpful and was very realistic. We had exams, group project, writing assignments, and presentations and she let us know that it was because she wanted us to develop the skills that employers wanted. We did peer review for the assignments using CPR which i found very cool. She also was very responsive to emails and was very clear ab
                
                   Tests make up 60% of grade (only 3) and are not hard. Do the research participation early in the semester. Writing assignment isn't hard and group project is easy. I barely did anything in this class except study for the final (not cumulative) and got a B. Should be an easy A if you put in effort. There is in class participation for points on grade
                
                   She was not the best teacher to me. I had to beg for help and the writing assignment were not helpful. You also had to read all the chapters, which were 30-40 pages long and take notes of all the power points. 
                
                   Dr. Arthur is the most intelligent professor I have had since my start at A&M, not just in Psychology but overall. He is extremely knowledgeable about the course content he teaches and although his tests require very extensive studying, attending every class & visiting him during office hours to review exams and ask questions will help your grade.
                
                   Don't take this guy if you don't want your GPA to drop. 3 tests + a Cumulative final over 12 topics. Test dates are not clear because he puts them to a vote during class.  Lectures are extremely boring and whenever he is asked for help he ends up confusing the class. He will also make fun of you for asking stupid questions. Lab portion was easy.
                
                   He is a really genuine and nice guy who's class isn't that difficult. He kept me interested enough to keep going to class and sometimes would have questions you could only get if you went to class. He's a super nice guy who wants you to succeed, definitely recommend taking him if you need to take this class. 
                
                   Balsis is awesome! He takes a lot of time prepping his lectures and they're really easy to follow. He gives a lot of youtube examples which make lecture go by fast. His tests are basically the notes. He drops your lowest grade and you get a point just for enrolling in the class. I finished with a 95 in the class and didn't have to take the final.
                
                   Great Prof. Highly recommended. 
                
                   He will not help you when it comes down to it. You either make the great or you do not.  NO EXTRA CREDIT!! I won't take a class with him again!
                
                   Makes lectures interesting. I am now very interested in psychology. Go to class and pay attention because 90% of exam questions are things he's directly stated. If I would've went to class I could've easily gotten an A.
                
                   I DO NOT recommend taking this prof. I average A's and high B's in most of my classes, and found it extremely difficult to get a good grade in this class. Test questions are inconsistent with what he says in lectures. I would study for hours for the tests and only received a decent grade once.
                
                   He is an awesome professor! He is really interesting to listen to and is always willing to help his students. His tests are only about 30 questions and half are about things he said in class so make sure you go to class! If I would have gone to class I would have made an A.
                
                   Such a good teacher!! Class was enjoyable and he made things fun! One of my favorite teachers! I learned SO MUCH in his class!
                
                   Prof Balsis has been one of my favorite teachers I have ever had! He is so nice and helpful, not just with the class he is informative and helpful with job opportunities in psychology which is way more helpful than any school counselor I've come across. His class is fun, he is clear cut on what he expects us to know for tests, I'd take him again!
                
                   Good prof... really funny... If you take PSYC 107 at A&M i SERIOUSLY recomend Dr. Balfour
                
                   This prof is actually the Dean of Lib Arts. He is amazing and funny! There are no tests - not even a final. Our grades were from our discussion quizzes (taken online), and essays, which were written on a topic of our choice. I loved his teaching style - I got to learn about what I wanted to. Best prof ever! I got him featured in the yearbook.
                
                   Be prepared to do alot of work if you want an A in this class. I highly recommend going to class and reading the book. You think you did really well on the test and then you find out you didn't. He throws in some questions on the test that only God knows where they came from, but there are not alot of those. Girls usually love him, guys not so much
                
                   Very sarcastic and likes to tell personal stories. Going to class is definitely a must, he uses his own stories on tests as examples. He really likes the science part of psyc so all the drugs and body functions has an emphasis. Reading the book is also a must. Overall the class is fun but still hard and sort of time consuming.
                
                   This guy is amazing!!!  I am in love with him!  TAKE HIM!  He can be pretty sarcastic, but go to is office hours and chat it up with him ;-)  There was a mistake on the test that he gave me, but didn't announce in class- so I suggest going to his office!!  LOVE HIM!
                
                   This guy is amazing!!!  I am in love with him!  TAKE HIM!  He can be pretty sarcastic, but go to is office hours and chat it up with him ;-)  There was a mistake on the test that he gave me, but didn't announce in class- so I suggest going to his office!!  LOVE HIM!
                
                   Funny guy, tells stories alot. His exams are not too bad if you study and go to class. I never read the book or even bought it and i most likely will make a B.
                
                   Makes class very enjoyable and easy. She offers extra credit, but the tests aren't even that hard to begin with. There are 12 online quizzes that are open note and she drops the lowest 2. Overall a good professor and pretty easy class.
                
                   Best stats professor ever!! Class wasn't easy or particularly interesting, but she tried to help us see the relevance of the topics. I avoided stats class as long as I could but Clare really did her best to help us understand everything. LOTS of homework and writing, but it is stats so I don't think that can be avoided.
                
                   She was really boring and the amount of work required for the class was ridiculous compared to how important the class actually was. Her tests were pretty hard. I had to learn everything from the textbook because I had a hard time paying attention in class because she would drag everything out She made the class harder than it should have been.
                
                   Although I/O isn't really my thing, I loved coming to class each day! Clare was SUPER helpful and fun, and really cared whether we learned or not.
                
                   Love her!!!!!!!!!
                
                   I took Brittney as my lab TA for PSYC 203 and she was absolutely wonderful! She helped us out with understanding the lecture portion of the class and cleared up any confusion we had. She makes learning interesting with her funny powerpoints. Don't hesitate to ask questions. She actually cares about her students and hopes they do their best.
                
                   Very fun professor. It's pretty easy to get an A. Her lectures are funny and she makes it interesting. 
                
                   Boring but easy if you studied the slides and read the book. I didn't pay attention and had no idea what was going on except the day right before the test when I crammed and still made an A. he doesn't require attendance but you have to do group assignments every week. they're really easy so just go to class and facebook the whole time.
                
                   If you want an easy A, Dr. Bodden isn't for you, but if you really want to learn the material, take him! His lectures are really interesting, and even though he speaks softly, I never lost focus because of the way he presented the material. Tests aren't that difficult, but you should expect to study. He is a very helpful and considerate prof.
                
                   Dr. Bodden was a great prof. Although his lectures could sometimes get boring, he tries his best to make them as interesting as possible. If you go to class and take good notes (be sure to write down stuff he says that isn't on the slide) then yu should for sure get an A. Would take again.
                
                   His class was easily the most enjoyable I've had yet. It is super easy to get an A as long as you read the chapters which are very enjoyable. He is very funny and enjoyable
                
                   I would have easily gotten an A in the course if I would have studied even a little bit for the first quiz and exam. You take a quiz every week and then an exam over 3 of the chapters. I definitely studied for the tests but they weren't very hard. Also gives an extra credit project for 3 points to your average. I'd take him again.
                
                   I thought his lectures were sometimes boring but I would suggest taking him. It's an easy A if you read the book! He gives somewhat easy quizzes online once a week.  You don't really have to attend his lectures because he posts the powerpoints online.
                
                   If you choose to actually read then the class will be a breeze. I didn't read and was able to scrape by with an easy C.
                
                   Teaches straight from slides that he posts on ecampus, but attendance is still beneficial. Really interesting lectures and always had good examples for key terms. Tests were a little tough and no matter how hard I tried, I could never make an A on an exam. Online quizzes are given often. Overall great professor, but class was a bit challenging.
                
                   This class was very easy, and actually pretty interesting. The tests are very straight forward, and going to class isn't even necessary to get an A as long as you read the textbook and study that.
                
                   His lectures come straight from the textbook, and he post them on line, so class is not mandatory. As long as you study the online slide shows, you shouldn't have a problem passing and making at least a B. I would def recommend taking his class!
                
                   He's a nice guy and his lectures are fun and interesting. Huge posts the notes online do you don't have to go to class but you will have to study if you want a good grade.
                
                   His exams are out of the book(read that thoroughly)so going to class is not a necessity, but he does give important information there. He takes forever to reply to emails and you have to beg your heart out if you would like help in the class. His quizzes have many grammar mistakes and are not the easiest. Overall the class was okay.
                
                   Dr. Bodden's class is very enjoyable. He has so much experience in the field of psychology and tells great stories. His lectures are very engaging as he provides a lot of examples in order to elaborate on certain topics. The online quizzes were kind of tough but he curves them towards the end of the semester. The exams are super easy. 
                
                   Professor Boden is an overall good professor. He has a lot knowledge for psychology and shows passion for the subject. I would definitely recommend taking the online quizzes with friends because they're tricky! Also, he offers an extra credit assignment at the end of semester, but don't count on it because there isn't a specific rubric. 
                
                   Dr. Bodden is a great prof and as long as you read the textbook, you will do just fine. I probably went to class a total of 5 times and I still got a good grade. There are weekly quizzes, but they are a piece of cake. Make sure to do your studies EARLY - you'll thank yourself later. Final is not cumulative.
                
                   If you go over the powerpoints, take the online quizzes, and know the vocab, the tests are pretty easy A's. He gives online quizzes every week that add up to be a test grade so take those with friends to make good grades. No class on Friday. Gives a powerpoint presentation that can up your average by 3 points. Don't have to go to class to make an A
                
                   Loved Bodden!  He gives 4 exams & 10 online quizzes. The quizzes are pretty hard, but he gave us bonus points. Exams are straight from the book & power points. He doesn't take attendance & no class on Fridays! Definitely recommend!
                
                   Fun lectures, usually tries to really get you interested and relate everything in the best possible way.
                
                   He is a great prof. His test are strictly the powerpoints! He cancels all Friday classes for the semster and attendance is not mandatory. He is so funny and loves dogs i swear there is a dog on every single one of his powerpoints. TAKE HIM.
                
                   Lectures are great! Bodden is very knowledgeable about psychology and he even cracks a few jokes here and there. Very lighthearted professor and is available after class for questions. He posts notes online but going to class makes everything seem a lot more clear. Tests are pretty easy. If you are interested in psychology, you'll love this course.
                
                   Dr. Bodden was my favorite professor of the semester. His exams were straight forward and directly from his lecture slides, they're very easy to make an A on as long as you know key terms. His lectures are interesting because he uses many relatable examples to help you understand concepts and he's a very sweet and funny man! 
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Good teacher...but teaches straight from the book. If you're like me, you can basically never show up to class(not like you have to go much anyway) and read the book the day of the test(online) and get an A.
                
                   Ms. Blackburn gave us all Fridays off. She was constantly curving our grades, and giving us extra points for simply showing up to class and doing our work. Sometimes, she would go out of town and give us the entire week off. She is a really nice and interesting teacher. You will get an A!
                
                   The material in this class is not difficult to understand. His tests were ridiculously easy. His lectures are long and sometimes boring. The last test was given during the final time and was not comprehensive. He recommends getting the study guide for the textbook and I recommend doing that. It was really helpful!
                
                   Long lectures.  Class attendance is not mandatory but make sure you have the text book to study.  I didn't go to class but I studied the text book and ended up with an A in the class.
                
                   Lectures are a little long. He has a very dry sense of humor which I found enjoyable. He's nice but very serious about cell phones not being in the class. I took his 8am so I didn't go very often and I did well by studying his online powerpoints very carefully and reading the important chapters from the textbook (he'll tell you which are important)
                
                   Tries to be funny in lectures and keep them entertaining, but it's hard to stay awake.  He says to use the study guide that you can buy, but that hasn't helped me yet.  Tests are hard, and are the only grades in the class. 
                
                   He's a funny guy and jokes around in class. His lectures are super boring though. He posts his lecture slides online. You can make a B or better in his class by studying the book and his lecture slides online. Going to class isn't even necessary. However if you don't go, studying hard for an exam is a must.
                
                   Won't meet with you outside his limited office hours.Can't figure out where questions come from - study guide is suppose to be "optional" but guess again.Not interested in success of student.  Wondering if he is just putting in his time!!!!
                
                   he likes to tell a lot of stories about his animal behavior class i mean he's pretty interesting but sometimes gets boring if he just repeats the slides i recommend printing out his powerpoints and studying the study guide a little you'll get an A
                
                   Probably the most boring teacher I have ever had. His lectures are pointless but if you go he may or may not give you 10 bonus points on 1 test, depending on his mood. Isnt the most approachable person outside of his 1 hour ofiice hour and is very good at putting people to sleep. Pretty easy to make a B but hard to make an A. Take someone else
                
                   Seems hard at first but he's really not. Go to class and highlight what he talks about, read the textbook, and only do the multiple choice questions in study guide. You have to be able to study on your own because you don't really learn in class. Do what I did and I made a very high A
                
                   Very good professor. Interesting. Don't need to read text book. Just go to class and supplement the notes he gives you in email. Tests are pretty easy if you study the notes.
                
                   He was very helpful. If you take notes you will do well. He uses things from text and often the text and his lectures overlap. Very good class and fun.
                
                   I went to class the 1st day, and the 4 test days.  Thats it, and i made a high B cause he gives you the notes via email. So study that, and go to class if your interested in the subject and youll do well.
                
                   good class, learned a lot.  professor was intelligent and made classes interesting.
                
                   She told me not to drop and I ended up with a D.  You either get it or you don't, but she wasn't much help to me.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Fairly easy class if you read and take notes. I have an A right now but the final is cumlative so that is a downside. Very nice professor though, you can find help outside of class. Attendance not required
                
                   Honestly, if you thoroughly review the powerpoints he posts online, you can get an A without ever really going to class. However, his class is helpful (& interesting) since he shows documentaries that make concepts easier to understand and provides pretty much all of the info on tests. Make sure you participate in the psych studies on time, though!
                
                   Attendance isn't mandatory but he will sometimes give extra credit do those who come. Tests aren't too difficult if you go to class and pay attention to his lectures (which he puts on ecampus) He gives a review before each test so know the material Projects are easy and the final was a breeze. Interesting class and interesting professor!!
                
                   This class is NOT an easy A. Just a heads up, you will have to work for it. He makes his tests pretty hard but if you study and go to lecture you should be okay. MAKE SURE TO DO ALL THE QUIZZES. Don't underestimate all the non-test grades, they will save your grade in the end. Nice guy, kinda hard to hear sometimes though.
                
                   NOT a blow-off class. Clifford is funny and laid back but sometimes hard to understand with his teaching methods. He mumbles a lot and gets really irritated when people talk over him or phones are out. Do well on the quizzes because they give you extra leverage. Studies are required to pass the class but they're pretty interesting.
                
                   Class isn't mandatory but you learn a lot more from his lectures if you go. The tests are pretty straightforward if you know everything in the power points. He is a very nice guy and will help you out if you go to office hours.
                
                   This class wasn't necessarily difficult, but making an A was hard. There was a lot of info and only three tests at all, so each test had a LOT of info on just one. The final is not cumulative which was a plus, but there were a ton of online quizzes which he drops the lowest two of. He lectures very fast so if you're a slow note taker do not take!
                
                   I learned a lot in this class and did well because of all the extra credit.  If you go to class, you will get lots of extra points.  He talks very fast and is hard to hear, but he posts all his powerpoints online.  He was very funny and always seemed to enjoy teaching class.
                
                   Clifford is THE MAN! Takes every opportunity he can to make a good movie reference and give you the giggles in class. Very relaxed lecturer, but is clearly extremely interested and knowledgable about psychology. Tests are fairly straight forward and if I took it again I could see myself getting an even higher A. Definitely recommend Clifford!
                
                   Clifford is very relaxed (often wears flip-flops to class) and very funny and really tries to get everyone interested in the subject. He can be kind of hard to understand because the acoustics of the room and his mumbling but he does good test reviews and offers many online quizzes and easy projects to boost grades! The psych studies are fun!
                
                   He posts the lectures online, but goes in depth in class, so it's good to go. Only need to read stuff he briefly mentions. He gives extra credit, he's really funny, he makes it interesting, and he's overall a great guy. Online quizzes will boost your grade so do well on those they are so easy! Those boosted me to an A.
                
                   Dr. Clifford is a great professor, but he can sometimes be difficult to understand while he is lecturing. However, he posts all of his notes online so class is not mandatory, but he does give extra credit sometimes. The tests are not too bad, but you do need to study a good amount to make an A in the class. Awesome professor overall. 
                
                   Dr. Clifford is a great professor. His lecture style stimulated my interest in the subject and he's good at explaining concepts/material. Grades consist of 3 tests, 6 quizzes, and 2 CPR assignments that make up your final grade. This class WAS NOT an easy A but as long as you thoroughly understand the material the tests are fairly easy.
                
                   Sometimes hard to understand, he can talk very fast. Everything is off of a powerpoint which are provided to you ahead of time. Not an easy A, you have to put some effort in by studying and reading the textbook every now and again. I enjoyed his class and his lectures. Attendance wasn't mandatory but he gave extra credit for just showing up. 
                
                   Great guy! Made lecture enjoyable, to the point, and short. Highly recommended!
                
                   Went into this class expecting an easy A. Attendance is not mandatory so I skipped a lot before the 1st test & got a D on it. I went to class every single day after Test 1 until Test 2 & my test grade only improved by 2 points. I suggest reading the book and going to all lectures. Be mindful of  online assignments, they're 40% of your grade. 
                
                   He offers a few points of extra credit before each test and only has 3 non-cumulative tests with no final. Altogether he is a pretty smart guy and teaches pretty well. You certainly have to put in some effort, but it isn't hard to make a good grade.
                
                   Hands down the best teacher I've ever had. You will enjoy this class so much. Read the textbook before class and take notes on it. Then, take notes during lecture. Do those things and you'll breeze through the class with an A. He his absolutely hilarious and is so good at teaching.
                
                   Clifford is a very nice guy but don't underestimate the tests! The quizzes are easy but you have to remember to do them, and the tests have so much information on them. Definitely go to class, (unlike me before the first test) or you will make a D. Once I started going to class my grade went up ten points. I suggest him as a prof!!
                
                   Dr. Clifford is very funny and friendly. Attendance is not mandatory but it's good going to class because he offers extra credit and they are very informational. His lectures are fast so I suggest reading beforehand. If you take good notes you'll do well. If you don't take any notes (like I did before the first test), you will not do so well. 
                
                   Super laid back professor. Lectures are fast paced, definitely read the material before he goes over it so you can take notes in class. Tests are not too hard. Gives a lot of extra credit, so be sure to show up. Not too much homework other than reading and a weekly online quiz. Love Psych107 so far! He releases early almost everyday.
                
                   She made the material interesting, and you could tell she really liked what she teaches. She was helpful in and out of class and met with me multiple times to review the exam. The exams are kind of hard and wordy, but there are multiple chances for extra credit if you come to class.
                
                   She goes over noting important in class and refuses to help you out. WORST PROF I HAVE HAD IN THE PAST YEAR! Only four exams, no extra credit. She has only one hour for office hours each week and refuses to meet you if you don't come during her one hour each week of office hours.  DO NOT TAKE HER!
                
                   Great prof, really interesting and funny! Take if you can!
                
                   Dr. Copeland is a great professor.  She doesn't care if you learn what the book says, but what things will apply to your life.  Her tests are challenging, but you need to go to the review sessions.  She reads the test questions out loud and you can write the answers to them and you will get a 100 on the tests.  Great Prof!
                
                   She flies through the material.  She assumes you understand, when you are really lost.  Lots of self teaching done..
                
                   Amazing prof!
                
                   I had Billy for PSYC 107 and I'm a business major but would take him again anyday. Lectures are not mandatory and everything is posted online. He knows exactly what he's doing. Willing to help you out on anything and offers tons of extra credit just for going to class. Your textbook is online and free!
                
                   was very helpful and all test content is on her slide shows
                
                   Dr. Fields is a wonderful person. She is super sweet an canceled class often. She really just wants you to enjoy psychology. Tests are easy and of the slides, as well as quizzes. There is no point going to class because she only reads off the slides. This is too easy of a class for such an interesting topic.
                
                   Very nice lady. Lots of extra credit. Only reads off slides and slides are given so no need to attend class unless there is a quiz that day(which is on the syllabus). Test are not too hard .
                
                   she tries to keep class entertaining. she has a lot of insight of the subjects. i would definitely recommend going to class because there are always questions on the tests that you could only know if you were in class. also read the book, lots of questions from that as well. she drops the lowest test score but the tests are confusing at times.
                
                   Very tricky tests, I studied AND read chapters and the tests were tough. You will leave an exam thinking you did well and then find out you did not. There are plenty of other Psychology teachers at A&M that require busy work, extra credit, and other assignments to help cushion your grade. I regret taking this teacher because of her testing style.
                
                   Class was very easy. Lectures were interesting and she kept your attention. However, she teaches definitions and tests over applications. They were almost impossible to study for. 3 tests and a final made up your total grade and she dropped the lowest one. Made a low B but put in enough time and effort to make a 100.
                
                   Typical psychology class as far as easiness. She uses relatable examples so it makes the class interesting and she keeps your attention the majority of the time. There were 4 midterms and a cumulative final. Reading the chapters helped a lot. I would take another class with her.
                
                   REALLY nice teacher! she makes lectures intersting and is actually interested in when we have to say. takes student imput on how to improve the class. NO FINAL just 4 tests and 7 quizes but two quizes get dropped and on test gets dropped. if you use the online resorces that go with the book to study you can make a B on the test EASY
                
                   She makes lecture material fun and interesting.  It's easy to make an B on her tests if you pay attention in class and review your notes.  Most of her lecture follows the book.  I would definitely take her class.
                
                   EPSY 432 is a very easy class if you actually do the work that is assigned. Each week there are Reading Application assignments that take about an hour to complete. There's a week-long grace for late assignments. The prof has a heart of gold and really tries to make class interestingfun, and he always let us out early. Lots of extra credit too!
                
                   This class was so easy. There's no textbook; he posts your reading online. Some weeks there's a lot of assignments, but that doesn't happen often. Usually you'll have 3 easy things to do. The final is just a project going over everything. He's easy on deadlines and grading, and very helpful. He always answers emails timely.
                
                   Overall, easiest class I've had. I literally went to class four times, not including exams, and made a great grade. Book she uses is super easy to follow and the modules and research requirements are beyond easy. An A is sooo doable.
                
                   Very easy A.  No book reading required, just review the slides in class or online for the modules and tests. Don't be discouraged by the research credits she requires, they are easy and almost everyone is able to finish them early in the semester.
                
                   Very nice teacher and understanding. Easy to understand..take notes off powerpoints and do the modules. A good grade is very do-able in her class.
                
                   really doesn't teach the class. mostly goes off of the powerpoint presentations provided by the book. not hard at all if you just read the book and do the modules.
                
                   Eddie is a great instructor and I love his sense of humor! I also didn't mind going to Happy Hour after class! :)
                
                   I LOVE Dr. Heffer. Just look up the terms at the end of the chapters and you're pretty much good on the test. You don't have to go to class, but you should he's very entertaining. So so so nice.
                
                   Rob is the nicest teacher. He cares about his students. His lectures are exactly what is on the test and he gives you the notes to print out. All you have to do is follow along. He also gives quizzes that are purely extra credit and are word for word from the book practice quiz. I cannot explain how great this teacher is... Take Him!!!
                
                   Rob was lots of fun and put a lot of work in his course, and I would reccoment anything he teaches!
                
                   Greatest professor ever!! Kayoung is very enthusiastic and passionate about what she teaches, and she makes the materials so much fun! Attendance isn't mandatory but I loved going to classes because her lectures are awesome. I would take another course from her in a heartbeat. More students should have the chance to take her!
                
                   Best. Professor. Ever. She gets to know you all personally, cares for your grades, and lectures about her own life by giving real life examples. If you go to class and pay attention to the lectures and study, you will get an A. She is energetic and you can tell she loves the subject. I would take this professor again and HIGHLY recommend her.
                
                   TAKE KAYOUNG! She is such a fun professor, you really get to know her personality and she relates everything to real life examples. Class is not mandatory but you want to go because she is fun & she gives a TON of surprise extra credit! Grades super easy on essays. Just a few quizzes and study for the test and you can easily make an A. 
                
                   She's the best! I love her! :)
                
                   Very nice and helpful. Cares for the wellbeing of her students and is clearly passionate about psychology. She offers A LOT of extra credit  and tests are not very difficult. Definitely the best professor I had this semester. 
                
                   I loved this teacher, super nice, was always really enthusiastic each day and fun. Except for vocab quizzes not a demanding workload. She gave us stacks of bonus points on my final and I got a 100. Don't let the research credits sneak up on you If you can't go to class that day you can always just get notes from a friend
                
                   Shes an amazing teacher and really cares about what she teaches!
                
                   Awesome professor. She actually cares if her students do well in her class. You have to read to do well on the tests but her lectures really help. She made the class really interesting. Attendance isn't mandatory but she does a lot of attendance extra credit.  Also, she brought us candy multiple times. I loved her and the class!
                
                   Kayoung was such a great professor. She's very laid back. The hardest part of her class was the psychology vocab quizzes. Her tests are 13 reading the book, 13 lecture notes, and 13 off of quizzes on ecampus. She made psychology interesting and I would recommend her to anyone. She also gives TONS of extra credit points. 
                
                   Reads off slides entire class period, so it can be a boring lecture. Prepare to teach yourself by memorizing all the millions of slides on each test and reading the text carefully. I found the class difficult, but hard tests were balanced out with easy projects & extra credit quizzes. 
                
                   You have to basically memorize her lecture notes and the book to be able to scrape up a B in the class. I ended up getting an 89.6 in the class and she would not round up. The subject was interesting but it was a hard course. Make friends with the people around you because it definitely helps. 
                
                   All of the exam material is in the powerpoints. He does not post anything online so you actually have to go to class.
                
                   Dr. Payne is incredibly sweet and helpful!  She thoroughly explains the material and gives examples to help you understand.  I liked her so much that I am now working with her for the summer, helping her find articles, code data, etc for her research!
                
                   Awesome. Easy class. She makes it pretty interesting. She is funny and she also takes the time to research any questions that students have that she does not know the answer to. She cares. 8/8 do take.
                
                   Stacey is one of my favorite teachers, not only in college but ever! She really goes out of her way to make the class enjoyable and gives you lots of opportunities to make good grades. She has a review session the class before a test, gives you a test study guide and posts power points before class!
                
                   I loved Stacey. She is a grad student and I would 100% take her class again. She is very knowledgeable about the material and presents it very well. If she doesn't have an answer to your question, she does outside research and then brings it back to the next class. I am so glad that I didn't take PSYC prior to coming to A&M. Take her if you can!
                
                   Very nice teacher. I didn't do any of the reading. Just studied his slides (which he emails to you) and I got a B. I would definitely have him as a teacher again.
                
                   He's a respectable scholar in his field and he's very knowledgable and a nice professor.
                
                   If Jungian psych interests you take his classes. He offers Psych of Religion (warning to Fundy Christians don't think he'll spend alot of time talking about Jesus) He's very intelligent, and his classes are more like discussions rather than lectures.
                
                   Great professor. Black psychology was definitely my favorite class this semester. There are three exams and a final project; you'll be fine if you go to class, participate, and study. You can miss a few days but don't blow it off because the lectures posted online aren't always detailed. The class is really interesting and she's  very knowledgable.
                
                   Dr. Salter is a great professor. I had her for black psychology and it was my favorite class and the reason why I decided to switch to Psych as a major. Go to class because exams are 70% lecture and even though she posts slides, she goes more into depth in class. 3 exams and a project that can be individual or a group project. Do your work and pass
                
                   Very kind professor but his were incredibly difficult, especially the multiple choice. He gets all of his test questions from the tests bank, therefore it's very hard to prepare for what may be on the exam.  The actual math in the class was fairly easy and he is a good professor but his exams definitely hurt my grade. This is my first "C" ever.
                
                   Mr. Schmeichel was a great teacher. The material was a little tough but he was extremely helpful when it came to explaining. He's really chill and responds to emails in a timely manner. I would definitely take a class from him again.
                
                   You have to make sure you read the textbook in order to do well on the exams!!!! Know the different case studies he talks about in class and vocab. You won't fall asleep in class! He is funny and makes you want to attend class. He has a few extra credit opportunities, you have to go to class to know about it. I would take another class with him. 
                
                   He's a pretty cool guy but he takes his questions from the test bank from the book so they're tricky and sometimes unreasonable. Read the book! Even the random mini stories that are included throughout the chapters! He only goes over some material in class and the rest comes from the book.
                
                   Totally awesome professor. The first two tests were a breeze provided you read the book, but he made the third a little harder, probably because we were all doing so well. Regardless, the subject matter, Social Psyc, is super interesting, and he made it better by knowing his stuff and being completely open to questions and comments. Fantastic prof!
                
                   I looked forward to going to class. I wish more professors possessed his teaching style. His presentation of the material is very insightful. It is important to read the chapters in order to do well on the exams. But the content is fairly easy and interesting to read.
                
                   He's pretty chill and it's a fun class overall.
                
                   Funny guy, always made me look forward to his class, even reading the book wasn't that painful.
                
                   Great teacher, very helpful... test are pretty straight foward from lecture. You don't have to go to class but most of the test is over his lecture. Do the study guides he posts on WebCT they always help even if you don't read the book.
                
                   He's a great teacher with passion for what he teaches. A++
                
                   
                
                   Literally the worst prof I've ever had. I heard all my friends in other classes taking psych 107 talking about how easy it was, and I worked my butt off for a C. She speaks with a thick accent and often rambles about things that she won't even test us over. Read, read, and read. 
                
                   sweetest lady ever. She knows exactly what she's talking about and explains everything very well. You'll have about 1 quiz a week, 10 questions, pretty easy. She gives several homework assignments that are grade boosters. Overall she's awesome and her class is awesome too. She takes random attendace about 7 times throughout the semester for EC.
                
                   Her quizzes and exams are very easy, all you have to do is stay up on the reading and attend lectures and it is an easy A.  She has  a bit of an accent but she makes up for it by always being prepared and knowing exactly what she is talking about. 
                
                   Really sweet lady! Also Very soft spoken but her classes were super easy. Took her 3 different times and would definitely take her class again.
                
                   She is the most boring professor I've ever had, but if you can sit through the lectures, the class is insanely easy. She gave out so much extra credit that I made over a 100.
                
                   You have to basically teach yourself as her lectures are not good at explaining things. As long as you go over the slides, which she gives you, you'll do fine on the tests. She gives 12 extra credit points in this class and an optional final. I had a 104 at the end with getting 2 Bs and an A on the tests. Definitely take her.
                
                   Very sweet lady. Very boring lectures. I went to class maybe 4 times and got an A. Study her review sheets and you're good. I'm a psych major and love psychopathology so it kept me interested.
                
                   She is the nicest professor and really cares about her students. Attendance isn't mandatory and if you read the chapters and her lecture notes, you will for sure make an A. 
                
                   She was the worst lecturer i have ever experienced. I hated her class since i was told it was going to be an easy A and it wasn't... i have heard she is better at her other subjects but this particular one she was awful. Lots of extra credit tho! 
                
                   I thoroughly enjoyed taking PSYC 305 with Dr. van Widenfelt. She is so sweet, and truly wants you to learn and do well. She gives a significant amount of extra credit and also doesn't take attendance... but coming to hear her lectures are really edifying and inspiring. 
                
                   Dr. VanWidenfelt is the sweetest! Her class is pretty easy if you read the textbook and go over the power points. There are 5 test, covering 2 chapters of the textbook. She gives extra credit throughout the semester. You could score a zero on one of the test and the extra credit would bring you up to a 100. The final is to replace a test grade. 
                
                   I liked Dr. van Widenfelt. She was very nice and interesting to listen to in class. This class was an easy A as long as you read the book. She gives case studies, so it is a little difficult to study for the test. However, the tests are just common sense questions, so don't think too hard.
                
                    Her class was interesting. This class is easy because she has 5 multiple choice questions that are worth 60 points each. The test was mainly from the book. She allows up to 25 extra credit points (assignments are easy). There is a 30-point difference between an A and a B. So, she makes it very easy to do well in this class. I received an A. 
                
                   Great Professor but hard tests
                
                   Took him for AB Psychology,  tests are semi-tough, just read the book to the letter and pay attention in class you'll make an A. 5 tests, you pick lowest test grade and retake for a final. 
                
                   I really enjoyed this class. There are a lot of tests but you can retake your lowest for the final. The tests are tough but everythings straight from his lecture or the book. 
                
                   she was awesome. i changed my major to psychology largely because of how interested i became in it after taking her class. she kept my attention!
                
                   Took her for abnormal psychology.  She was hilarious yet knowledgeable.  The class was very enjoyable, pretty easy, yet I still feel like I learned a lot about the subject matter.
                
                   I was nervous at first but professor akin is an amazing instructor who really knows what she is talking about and passionate in what she is teaching
                
                   Professor Akin is honestly one of the most ENJOYABLE professors I have EVER had. You do have to read, study, & come to class - but she is fair and does NOT set her students up to fail.  She is VERY funny and every class meeting just flew by.  I HIGHLY recommend her to ANY student regardless of your learning style, major, or interest level.
                
                   Mrs. Akins is the BEST! she makes class extremely fun. she's hilarious and really cares about her students. She uses powerpoints for class and everything on the test is covered in class. It is mandatory that you come to class and read your book, but she's worth it!! Do yourself a favor and get her!!!
                
                   She actually made physio fun and interesting. I recommend her to everyone!!!
                
                   She is amazing! i loved her class, she knows how to make it fun! you will learn a lot from her. great professor!
                
                   Akin is awesome.  She's passionate about what she does, which helps her lectures with its clarity.  Her classes are fairly large, so she never really gets to know anyone.  The class is super interesting, but the tests are a little difficult.  Attendance is not mandatory, but a lot of test &#63;s come from lecture.  Overall, its a great class.
                
                   She is really cool and smart too. I learned so much and still had fun. If you want to take a class that is relevant and taught by someone who won't BS you, take her.
                
                   I love Sissy!  She has severe ADHD, but she's hilarious and obviously knows what she is talking about.  I learned a lot from her!
                
                   Great teacher. Have taken for several classes in Psyc and Sped and enjoyed all. Makes learning fun and very enjoyable. Take her for anything you can!
                
                   Amazing professor! I was sad to leave the class.
                
                   This is the way a course she be taught.Her method is teaching from the PPT & book.She make students engage with her and classmates.Test are straight forward. STUDY and pay attention you will pass. Test are in class. You will have a APA paper & pop quizzes. Just make sure you participate and you will be fine. Excellent teaching format.
                
                   Great Prof. Very friendly, personable, helpful and funny. Eccentric.
                
                   Great Prof. Very friendly, personable, helpful and funny. 
                
                   While he may seem very entertaining, he's not a professor I would take again (especially for such an important class). He's lectures lead off into useless conversations, don't rely on the Power Points, and don't expect to gain much. His test are ridiculously hard but he does curve. 
                
                   Dr. B is really cool and funny. He is so out there with his intelligence that I was unable to really gain anything useful from his class. Stats is hard enough without being mentally drain with his confusion. He really should not be teaching this course. The power points are worthless. It was dreadful everyday, would have done better on my own.
                
                   Dr. Ball is amazing, take his class, you will be glad you did. He wants you to succeed. I have never had a professor who really cared and his compassion is truly a gift. He is uber smart & knows his stuff. Stats w/a lab is a LOT of work, it is a requirement & if you attend class, lab, and test reviews etc you will get through.
                
                   Quite disorganized, but his insight is typically worth the initial confusion. Cares about his students, and will help you as much as his hectic schedule allows.
                
                   Ohmygosh. His class was really hard to sit through....at first. His wit and enthusiasm will grow on you quickly. It is true that not all of his stories pertain to the course, but he will provide necessary information if you listen. He gives ample extra credit to make up for difficult exams. Take him, you won't regret it in the end!
                
                   I learned nothing from this class. Dr. Ball took over a month to grade our first paper, then told us to forget about the other assigned papers. His exams (online) were difficult because of his completely ridiculous and confusing use of the english language (grammar, spelling, etc.) However, he allows plenty of extra credit.
                
                   Best prof in the dept. Yes he's a little like a mad professor but Hes the most helpful and knowledeable teacher I've had yet. He is in the profession because he actually cares
                
                   He is very hard
                
                   Very strong on his words....
                
                   Very strong on his words....
                
                   Not like this teacher
                
                   Hard to follow along in class, books were hard to read, as they were not textbooks but he is very helpful and it is a very interesting class, I enjoyed it, and he grades in a way that is very rewarding for the student.
                
                   If you pay attention to his seemingly off topic tracks, it acctually helps you learn what he is talking about. You just have to pay attention. And it helps to acctually have an interest in Psychology.
                
                   when he did teach it was great but the majority of time spent in his class was listen to him ramble on about some red-belly'd fish... useless because his tests were not over that red-belly'd fish :[ his information is not clear. he is very nice but does not stay on track, therefore his tests are hard.
                
                   I really enjoyed his class. I've known Dr. Ball for eight years, he is the most kewlest teacher EVER! Everyday is something different.  I would recommend him to everyone!
                
                   I enjoyed Dr. Ball's class.  However, if you don't read, you won't know what he's talking about. The only problem I had with him is that he is so intelligent, it is hard for him to come down to the undergraduate level.  He is a huge source of information.
                
                   As with all classes you have to work at it-- but Dr. Ball is very helpful and nice and does not want any of his students to fail but expects YOU to want to do the work and the effort it takes.
                
                   After reading the comments I now see why his classes are full, day after day. He is extremely bright, cares about students, and really cute! Too bad he's happily married.. I thought the material was challenging, but loved his lectures. He has a refreshing sense of humor lacking in some profs here at TAMU, they could take some lessons from him. :)
                
                   This class was very hard!! The professor was very rude when replying to questions!! I would not recommend this professor to anyone! If you can avoid taking this teacher. The instructions to assignments were very unclear all the time. I know that a lot of my classmates online felt the same way.
                
                   VERY RUDE. WORST ONLINE EXPERIENCE I'VE HAD. WILL NEVER TAKE A CLASS OF HIS AGAIN!
                
                   I took his Cognitive Psychology 350 course online as my summer II course and  this was the hardest online course. His quizzes or either pass or fail, 10 questions to be completed in 10min but some of the  questions took 2-3 min to read and understand. His test questions were very confusing. Avoid this professors online courses if at all possible.  
                
                   DO NOT TAKE THIS PROFESSOR. I took him online and  he had you watch recorded lectures that he keeps recycling. His tests are extremely difficult. Past students warned me not to take his class. I didn't listen! It's a shame that these teachers are more concerned with hearing themselves talk then the student actually learning anything.
                
                   I took this class (cognitive) online over a summer semester.  Don't fool yourself - it is a lot of work.  However, none of it is really difficult work.  Any questions that I had he responded to promptly. Read the book, take notes from the lecture, you'll do fine.
                
                   I actually really liked the way he formatted this course.  You did need to login and check regularly to make sure you didn't have a response due.  But I really learned a lot in this class, which I usually don't feel from online classes.  I liked him.
                
                   I always do very well in online classes, this guy is crazy hard. His lectures are LONG and BORING. If you are not a good test taker DO NOT take him. The majority of your grade will come from weekly quizzes that are pass fail.  Even with reading the book, and listening to the lectured, I have no clue where he is coming up with his test questions.
                
                   This course was terrible! I was very interested in Cognitive Psy, but Dr. Carlson made this course impossible! I took this course over the summer (which I would HIGHLY recommend NOT doing) & it consisted of 10 quizzes, 3 exams, and 2 papers.. In 5 weeks! Half the time I had no idea where he was getting his questions and overall, learned nothing!!
                
                   Dr. Carlson is not an easy teacher.  However, you will learn a lot.  I took his class online, and there were quizzes each week, exams, and two article reviews.  He is an easy grader on the article reviews, so don't sweat those.  Quizzes are pass/fail with 60% or higher counting as 100%.  Study/read the chapters and lectures and you will do fine.
                
                   Great professor, I learned a lot. He is not easy though
                
                   This class was ridiculous. The real kicker came in with the lack of study guide for the midterm (after being told we would have one until a week prior), and the study guide for the final was useless, and he just copied and pasted the exact questions from the quiz. I did 6 EC hours to end up with a B. THIS MAN DOES NOT CARE ABOUT HIS STUDENTS!
                
                   This class was very difficult. Every day you go in, he turns off the lights, the fan or heater is humming in the background, his voice is very soft, and there is very little class participation to keep people awake. I failed because his quizzes and exams are impossible to pass, and it is impossible to stay awake in this class.I was completely bored
                
                   I took his online class.  His quizzes and tests are difficult.  However, his discussion posts and other assignments are very easy.  Do not take if you are not willing to put in a lot of effort in reading the textbook.
                
                   Difficult but very interesting class.  Dr. Carlson is very picky, and it takes a while (after the first exam, for sure) to get a good feel for what exactly he expects of his students.  This is definitely not a blow off class, but if you are truly interested in psych and not looking for an easy A, I would recommend it.  Also, he's pretty darn cute!
                
                   Wouldn't recommend to my worst enemy! Impossible to learn anything.  Quizes are impossible to pass.  When you ask for help or advice you will not receive it!
                
                   Never again!
                
                   Teacher was exceptionally hard, very picky. He grades on whims and his own opinion. I'd not take him ever again.
                
                   Do not take this class during the summer!! 13 Quizes, 3 Exams, and 4 assignments in 5 weeks!!! I had a horrible experience with this class.
                
                   I had a rough time in this class
                
                   Impossible exams make you feel like an idiot. No one passes them. Still made out with a B...barely. Very difficult class, couldn't imagine taking him online or for Cognitive.  Want to take Cognitive...but do NOT want to take him again, so I probably won't take it! Can make an easy class complicated just for the sake of it...take someone else!
                
                   He is awful as an online teacher!! Honestly it felt like the quiz, lecture, and assignments had absolutely nothing to do with each other. The exams were impossible!! I still cannot figure out where he was getting questions from. If you are looking to take an online course DO NOT take it from him!!!
                
                   Dr. Carlson was very clear in his lectures and his slide shows were basically what you see on the test minus pictures.
                
                   LOVE her. She goes above and beyond and is very smart and an excellent teacher. Def. one of the better teachers at TAMU commerce.
                
                   She was not very helpful, and is very stuck in her own ways. Do not expect slack in this class. 
                
                   The homework is horrible it will take you two days to complete. She will take off for every little thing. Hate her class 
                
                   Quizes and exams nothing like assignments and readings.  No communication.  No assistance. 
                
                   1. This is the only Psych Statistics teacher at Commerce. 2. Psych students tend to hate math. 3. Psych students rate the teacher negatively when they just hate the course.  I'm not gonna lie, the class was hard and Dr. Carlson doesn't mess around. But she was there anytime I needed help. I made an "A" and I had to work my butt off to do it. 
                
                   Is not helpful when students have questions about class or grades
                
                   This professor is awful!!! Forgets to post the quizzes until the day before they are due, talks down to students and gets irritated easily, will never accept she made a mistake, forgets the list of equations she promised to you in her car the day of the final and refuses to go get them, refuses to post final grades in ecollege. Just horrible!!
                
                   This is absolutely the worst professor I have ever had! The reviews posted here are true to form! She absolutely does not care if you get the material and does not help in any way. If she couldn't shrug her shoulders she wouldn't be able to respond! Do NOT take her if you can avoid her...
                
                   She is a terrible teacher. I've asked her since day 1 about help and she refers me to the tutor that doesn't teach psych stats. Homework is MORE than overbearing & she does not acknowledge when students need help what so ever! TAKE ANOTHER TEACHER!!
                
                   Not as bad as a some would say. You have to work hard for your grade. Homework adds up to about four or so hours a week. Tests are rather easy and take home, except the final. She explains it very well. My only complaint is the amount of homework. She needs to realize, it's not our only course, . Other than that she's very knowledgeable, and nice.
                
                   Horrible! By far the worst teacher I've ever had. She treats it like it's your only class for the semester, and even if you approach her for help or how you are struggling, she's just like, oh well, go to tutoring. She gives insane amounts of homework. Usually between 4-6 hours, and only gives you a coupe of days to do it. DO NOT TAKE HER!
                
                   This course was extremely fast paced. I have a 3.88 gpa and have always been extremely willing to ask for help, but she never offered help that was useful. My final grade was a 89.2 and she refused to round up. Worst class I've taken so far!!
                
                   I honestly feel like this professor is trying to fail everyone. Poor explanations over material. She doesn't give enough time for quizzes for people to actually work out the problems. She doesn't care if you pass or fail nor does she want to help you succeed in any way. Please try to avoid taking this professor.
                
                   Dr. Carlson is not willing to help her students succeed. Her quizzes are impossible to finish and or pass. When you try to confront her and try to get help, she will shrug her shoulders at you. Horrible excuse for a professor. Avoid at all cost if possible.
                
                   The class was not organized well, but I think Dr. Currin was given the course at the last minute?  There were tech issues, but she answered personal emails and texts.  Assignments were not graded quickly.  She did open everything back up at the end of the course and allowed us to make up things we might have missed.  Otherwise, typical online class
                
                   Dr. Green is seriously the best professor at TAMU-C. He makes you want to learn more about Psychology. I thoroughly enjoyed his class. His tests are not the easiest, but if you study hard, you will do just fine. His lectures are NOT boring. If you have the opportunity, take Dr. Green. You won't regret it!
                
                   Absolutely wonderful professor. Lessons are organized and straight to the point. Tests are not your casual stroll in the park. I had to study, study, study.
                
                   Great Professor! You will learn a lot in his classes and be engaged the whole time! Definitely recommend!
                
                   young, svelte, beautiful and walked with a cat-like grace.
                
                   My favorite teacher on this campus. Teaches clearly,  and treats students fairly. He is upbeat, and an all around good person.
                
                   Like him because he does not hassle you and he teaches very well.
                
                   He was my advisor my last semester and I was in and out of his office with problems almost everyday.  He was so patient with me, it bordered on ridiculous.  His class was pretty awesome too.
                
                   Awesome teacher! Very helpful and challenging.
                
                   I have had Dr. Green for several classes, and he is a great teacher. He does NOT pass out A's, you have to earn them. His classes are easy to understand and he is one of the most helpful teachers on campus. If you want an easy A get out of the psych field, if you want to actually learn something,take Dr. Green.
                
                   great!!!!!!!!
                
                   nice guy, easy class, definitely take with a load.
                
                   Made me think, I love this professor.  Helps undergraduates conduct research, whereas others typically do not have the time. Theres typically nothing in it for him yet he does this anyway.  Very sharp professor, graduated from Rutgers one of the top Social Psychology programs in the nation.
                
                   He does do a good job of getting students to like him.  I was not impressed with how underprepared I was for graduate study in the areas in which I had earned easy A's in his class.
                
                   Dr. Green makes his class fun and presents the material in a very conscientious fashion.  I disliked the first project until I actually began working on it, then found it was a lot of fun.  I am taking him again for another class next semester.
                
                   Dr.Green is an excellent prof.He is supportive!He engages the class in lively discussions, keeping us interested in the subject.The powerpoints r merely a tool to guide us during the lecture. Critical thinking is a huge part of the class. His class is not an easy A, it is challenging and enjoyable.
                
                   Whoever rated Dr.Green badly must be getting bad grades in his class. He's an excellent professor,interesting and challenging. He tries to really make you think practically through the assignments. The tests r not easy, maybe if u r only interested in passing. He's by far the most helpful professor!
                
                   He is ok.  He thinks he is a great teacher but has alot to learn about teaching.  HE needs to make the class challenging instead of passing everyone.  He just wants to be liked by the students but I got bored and glad to be almost done.  IF you want an easy A take this guy.
                
                   I think he makes his class to easy.  IF you want to go to grad school all these pretty powerpoints and teaching like high school won't cut it.  People like him because he gives out A's
                
                   What a wonderful teacher! I loved his class. He makes each class interesting. He gives plenty of examples for each topic & relates it to current life. I'd recommend taking him any day!
                
                   Simply, an outstanding professor
                
                   Great instructor, very interesting and intelligent  Lots of papers but not hard, expects all students to be adults and come to class prepared. One of the two best instructor I have ever had
                
                   History & Systems class online.  Lots of writing, but good feedback to help students improve.  
                
                   As long as you communicate with him and show an interest in his course you will do fine.  His assignments are clear you just have to follow them.  
                
                   Interesting to listen to which makes class fun & easy to attend but has a lot of info to go thru & doesn't really narrow it down Test are hard Basically read the entire book &remember what u can b/c u nvr know what is on the test also doesn't give much feedback or instructions so u only know if u did good or bad. Recommand only if you can work hard
                
                   I loved this class.  It is NOT easy, but it is very good.  He is an excellent and entertaining lecturer.  3 papers, 3 tests and he takes the top 5 grades. Unlimited extra credit. Read the textbook!
                
                   Dr. Henley's class is challenging and it is interesting, too. Plato, Aristotle, Aurelius and Darwin are a few topics. Dr. Henley supplied a lot of information (reading) on the course site to help with assignments, he is fair and he really likes it when you quote the text. This course taught me a lot about the origin and history of psychology.
                
                   This is not an easy class.  However, I would take it again with Dr. Henley if I had to.  Believe him when he says you cannot pass without reading the book. There are 3 tests and 3 papers. He takes the highest of those 5 grades.  Unlimited extra credit to help you succeed. Tests are multiple choice and "compare" essay questions. Be prepared to work!
                
                   I found Dr. Henley to be very hard to talk to and very hard to get helpful feedback from. He seems like the kind of person you initially think would be a really cool, great teacher, but they turn out to be not. I'm not sure why he is involved in education or the education of educators.
                
                   I loved this class! He tells some extremely interesting stories. I had no interest in the subject before the class, but I really enjoyed taking this class. His class is not easy, but definitely not impossible. Take him for this class! One suggestion: DO THE PAPERS!!! They are easy A's if you do what you are told.
                
                   I loved this class! He tells some extremely interesting stories. I had no interest in the subject before the class, but I really enjoyed taking this class. His class is not easy, but definitely not impossible. Take him for this class! One suggestion: DO THE PAPERS!!! They are easy A's if you do what you are told.
                
                   Difficult person to deal with. He rants about education majors. Gee, he is in the special ed department.
                
                   He tend to wonder during lectures... and sometime you may think &quot;what does this have to do with the class&quot; but he always ties it into the lecture. I enjoyed his class, will be taking him again.
                
                   THIS IS A VERY INTERESTING CLASS, And Dr. Henley tried to make it as fus as possible!! :) He did a GREAT job, despite the fact that spring of 08 semester was his first time to teach this class in a while!! (As he says, he taught it in his younger years!!)
                
                   Anyone who is interested in History would enjoy this class. Henley is a phenomenal lecturer and very accessible.  People who fail his course tend not to read and/or show up to class.  I think A's are very probable in his class if you are willing to do the work.
                
                   The course was relevant to anyone considering a career in higher-ed. I certainly derived benefit from Dr. Henley's articulation of his personal experiences, although this led to more of a &quot;sage on the stage&quot; situation than what is usual for a graduate course. Fortunately, he lectures interestingly, and the readings and assignments were appropriate.
                
                   I learned very much about becoming and being an academician of excellence in higher education.  The instructor was highly supportive of his students in this class.  I found the subject matter, guest lecturers, and the instructor's own experiences and advisement in academic careers to be very valuable and relevant to my academic & career pursuits.
                
                   Her major is Snakes. What does that have to do with plant biology, and her laugh could drive a sane man crazy!
                
                   EGO! is what this man oozes. He expects too much of his students outside of class time. He is abstract teacher. Hated it!
                
                   He knows his field and though he is very busy is always available for students. His teaching style is fantastic as he seems to love his field. He treats students like the adults which is wonderful. It is necessary to study and keep up.
                
                   This class is challenging but it is also interesting. He will give you an opportunity to do extra credit if you are not doing well. The tests are mainly essays so do the reading.
                
                   what can I say&#63;  She helped me learn so much in this class online and I will remember her comments.  She really cares about her students!
                
                   Very helpful, cheerful, and makes class interesting!
                
                   Very experienced and knowledgable.  Can get off track.  Likes to lecture and tell stories rather than teach out of the book.  I liked the class and would take a class of his again.
                
                   Dr. Johnson is so nice and knows her stuff! Do the work and you'll do great.
                
                   Great teacher!  I would definitely recommend her to anyone. Super nice!
                
                   She is really easy to follow and understand. She always goes above and beyond to ensure that her students are learning things that are relavent and can be used in real life.
                
                   This was the best psych instructor Ive ever come in contact with! She's very sweet and understanding of her students situations as well as different learning abilities. We had in class discussions,3 'exams',1 PowerPoint and 1 paper(counted as the final).I respected most how she didn't overload you with work, compared to other psych instructors.
                
                   I have had Dr.K. 3 x's over my career in school and he was one of the few that left a positive memory in my education. I learned more from this professor than any previous instructors. He will always have a warm place in my heart, and will never be forgotten. You will gain a lot of wisdom and experience from this man if you want it:) good luck
                
                   Is a nice guy, but rambles constantly about his personal stories that do not matter.. Tests are random and they change each time. This class was definitely not worth taking.. It was difficult for no reason. Asks a lot, without any clarification for tests.  You'd be lucky to get any review.. Its a nice class, just the teacher is not helpful.
                
                   Abnormal psychology is not an easy class.  There were 3 test. For extra credit, he allowed us to do 2 papers.  He doesn't discuss the material much in class. He is more into telling you personal stories that are related to the chapter.  Interesting but not easy.  You must read and study the book carefully to do well in the class.
                
                   I love Dr. K. He is so kind and considerate. He does try to motivate everyone to learn. Even though at times he can ramble, I really enjoyed his class.
                
                   Very smart. Sometimes hard to follow but very entertaining. I would recommend this class to anyone looking for a fun and challenging class
                
                   If you want to know how to evaluate clients with the MMPI, this is the class. It is work but you will learn to intrepret and use the instrument.  Dr. Keenan does not tolarate lazy people or fools, so come prepaired and spend time outside of class and you will be fine.
                
                   He is used to working with people in prison and treats his students like they are the criminally insane. He is very rude and controlling, and has a God complex. Will NEVER take again.
                
                   this teacher is not respectful of his students and he rambles on and on on endless tangents. im sure the class is passable if you can stand to listen to his rambling and incoherent explanations. he is very defensive also and cannot tolerate questions to any of his instruction. i had to drop it to save my mental state.
                
                   he is a joke and spends the majority of his time talking about useless stuff that is not on the test. i dont expect things handed to me but this class was a complete waste of time. he sat on his bum while all the students gave presentations about serial killers and we were not tested over the book, just the information the other students gave.
                
                   told us what to do to get an A, i did it and got a B. he chooses favorites and if your not one of them you will get a B. he is a liar. and if he asks for short answer essay- write a book, not a paragraph or two, more like 2 pages. he acts nice but is totally two-faced.
                
                   Dr. K is the man! He is the best professor I have had in Commerce and you will learn a lot from his class without spending hours with your nose in a book. Yes you have to read the chapters and the tests are no walk in the park but his class is fun. I highly recommend him to anyone.Good Luck
                
                   Dr Keenan was great. The class discussions were always interesting and he was very encouraging.
                
                   Dr. K does not look like a typical psyc prof.  He is helpful and funny. He cares about his students.  READ before class...he has not problem pointing you out if your are not.  Tests are not easy, but As and Bs are easily abtainable as long as your read and understand.  He wants you to know CONCEPTS, not just memorization.
                
                   Wow, what a cutie! Dr. Keenan is caring, warm, and very professional all wrapped up in a laid-back, easy chair kind of way. He obviously loves the students and the material he covers. He is there to help you in any way possible, just ask. His class was refreshing and a nice break from the other harder and more time consuming classes this term.
                
                   Dr. K is a wonderful man. He hates to see his students fail. You have to read to pass his class.  His classroom lectures are examples of what is talked about in the book. He gives you the information and it is your job as the student to put it all together.  He is easily distracted and usually can go on quite entertaining rants.
                
                   Dr. Krueger was awesome! She's very clear in her lectures and always provides real life examples to further explain. Her syllabus is transparent & to the point. As long as you come to class & listen you're guaranteed an A. (Even easier if you're a psychology major!)
                
                   I liked Dr. Krueger.  Her background is primarily in research and she tended to speak to us as fellow researchers, but she would share stories from time to time that, depending on your sense of humor, tended somewhere between the charming to the corny.  Most importantly, I truly learned a lot in this class and would take it again.
                
                   Interesting course.  Krueger is a detailed instructor.
                
                   Dr. Krueger is a good instructor and I recommend taking her developmental psychology course. It was interesting and it was challenging because you have to debate on sides of topics and your assigned side may not be the one you believe in, but it helped me see things from a different perspective. Dr. K. was helpful and available, too.
                
                   She is a great professor! You will have to work to get your grade, but it is doable. I learned so much in her class. Loved the debates. Take her, you will enjoy it.
                
                   I didn't find the class easy but it was interesting and I came away with useful knowledge.  She set up debates on controversial issues as part of the grade.  Preparing the material to present as a case made it more interesting.  She is extremely knowledgeable in her field and able and willing to share her knowledge generously.
                
                   was very interested in the class all year. very easy
                
                   Great class! Hot teacher!
                
                   Professor Masten was excellent this semester! He will work with you and has the grades posted quickly!
                
                   William Masten is not a professor I'd ever recommend. He's lectures are very scattered. The only benefit is that all the information you need to pass is in the Power Points and book. Don't expect to gain much from him personally.
                
                   Don't know where all the good comments and feedback came from. This professor isn't very clear during lectures, they even drag out. He ignores feedback from students, even though he asks for it. And don't bother asking questions- they annoy him. You basically won't get anything out of this guy. Wouldn't recommend him at all. 
                
                   Masten, while I'm sure he's a great, harilous person outside of class,  he's definately not that way in class. He is very unclear of this subject and reads straight from his Pearson PowerPoints. I will not take his class again because I learned absolutely nothing. 
                
                   Summer on line class syllabus was long and confusing. His response to email ques., were even more confusing. Tests were impossible to prepare for and didn't cover material that went with assignments. . A lot of papers up to 6 per week, but easy. Class not paced well. Online set up disorganized! He didn't turn in grades on time to register.
                
                   Worse professor I ever had. He is not willing to help students out and is random in class. When he attempted to teach he would use youtube videos of others teaching.
                
                   This online course is super easy but you have to do your reading to pass any and all quizzes. There are 4 quizzes, no exams and NO PAPER!! Just read, turn your work in on time and get your A.
                
                   Dr. Masten's online classes are always easy.  However, he doesn't grade discussions in a timely manner.  Sometimes it can be 4 or 5 weeks before you find out your grade, and by that time you have completed several more discussion posts.  Exams are easy and are graded automatically.
                
                   Dr Masten knows a lot and teaches a great course. Some students he should throw out on their ear. But he puts up with them for some reason.
                
                   He knows psychology but he is VERY scattered and unhelpful. I dont know what happened between the good reviews and now but he does not like us asking questions, he gets off topic ALL the time. Most of us bought the book from the bookstore and they have the 12th edition. He is still on the 11th and doesnt care that the chapters are very different.
                
                   Dr. Masten is a nice guy, but not a very good teacher, at least for this course. He never seems to know exactly what he wants to say, and gets aggravated when students ask questions which appear to contradict what he is saying. He doesn't acknowledge comments in class discussions. If he doesn't like what you have to say, he will just ignore it.
                
                   I took this class online. Discussion posts are answered word for word in the book.  The tests are almost 100% definitions. Very easy class.
                
                   the best prof! pay attention in class and you will do well. always helpful.
                
                   very good prof, read the book, know the notes, get a high grade
                
                   great prof. great teacher
                
                   good professor, so helpful and kind to students.
                
                   The best professor I have had! He is Extremely Helpful and is       Crystal clear about all assignments and tests. If you come to class and read the book you will get an A.
                
                   Just listen in class and study handouts.
                
                   He is a wonderful professor. He is always prepared, gives a great class and lecture, his tests are good and if you study you can get an A!!!
                
                   Dr. Masten is a great teacher who cares about his students, he explains things well I am glad I took it when I did. He is very interested in his students success. Encourages student input. Extremely knowledgeable. This class was very well organized.
                
                   I took this class at the CHEC.  Very easy.  She emailed us all of the powerpoints before the test. We had a list of essay questions to study that she chose from for the test.  A lot of daily assignments but they are all &quot;do it and get an A&quot; type of assignments.  Very easy!
                
                   I had this prof while she was teaching Health Psychology for the first time and she was VERY pregnant. Even though she was about to give birth she was so so sweet to everyone and covered the material well. Minimal amount of hw, two assignments a week and easy exams.  Do yourself a favor and take her.
                
                   I took her online summer class for Evolutionary Psy, and I loved it! She didn't teach from a textbook, she taught with an actual book Paul Bloom had wrote and the class was actually really interesting.
                
                   The subject matter was interesting enough,but the class was really just a review of examples clearly explained in the book.  If attendance were not required there would be no reason to go to class. She is very nice, though.
                
                   Cognition/Instruction: Course was frustrating because instructor has difficulty communicating (explanation confusing, she got defensive, not helpful) & due dates not weekly, but 3 days/wk which varied. I got my lowest ever final project / paper grade (in college). If you do not HAVE to take this doctoral level course, then...if so, good luck.
                
                   Cognition/Instruction: Course was frustrating because 1)instructor has difficulty communicating (explanation confusing, she got defensive, not helpful) 2)due dates not weekly, but 3 days/wk which varied. I got my lowest ever final project / paper grade (in college). If you do not HAVE to take this doctoral level course, then...if so, good luck.
                
                   Online schedule was difficult to follow at first.  As long as you posted the number of times she required and turned did each assignment, she was pretty fair.  At first, I didn't like the class, but toward the end of the semester, I knew what she wanted.
                
                   Hard to understand. Seems like she doesn't review her slides before coming to class. Just read the book on your own and you will be fine.
                
                   Very confusing. Obvious language barrier and she is not open to any expressions of confusion, will dig in her heels. Not conducive to learning. Ironic as it is a cognition class.
                
                   You need to get on her good side to succeed in some cases. This will especially effect your project grades. I would recommend checking in with her (not your lab instructor) for any major decisions or changes to your project. Her tests are difficult too- don't underestimate them even though they're multiple choice! Lu is overall a good teacher.
                
                   Nobody else teaches experimental so here are my suggestions. When she talks about your project, find out what she thinks you should do and then do that. Don't do what you want. She takes pride in the difficulty of her tests, but the only reason people score low is because she will give a question with 4 choices and 3 may be correct. Horrible prof!
                
                   she makes class IMPOSSIBLE, specially the easiest one, which happens to be Cognitive Psychology.  You can't understand a word she says sometimes.  More than half the class dropped after the fist exam.  She has only two exams, the mid-term and the final, she doesn't care about attendance either.  Kissing butt doesn't work, just pass the exams.
                
                   Dr. Lu is a VERY NICE LADY, and she will go out of her way to help you...but the info presented in her class was way over my head!! :( Even going back through the text, which is a lot of what she presents in class did not help me!!!! :( I felt as if this class should have been a graduate class!! :(
                
                   Dr Lu's class was very challenging, but she was encouraging and offered many oportunities to do well.
                
                   She is very clear about what she expects from you, and is very helpful with any questions.  She is one of the best teachers I have had a TAMU.
                
                   This teacher was very unclear; there was an obvious language barrier. Instead of trying to help students understand, she got offended that they did not. She let her emotions get in the way. The instructions for assignments were lacking. It was hard not to sleep through this class! The research assignments seemed to be for her own research benefits.
                
                   Dr, Lu is great. She is very helpful. One of the nicest people I know. I really appreciate her being such a genuine, sincere, and helpful professor!
                
                   Well-organized and nice selection of material. Some disclarity on expectations initially, but addressed these very quickly. Friendly, accessible and helpful. Good professor--would recommend.
                
                   Please avoid. It's not worth the harassment and condescension.
                
                   I took an online class with him and it was pretty good! He seems very chill and I think as long as you complete all of the assignments, there's no reason you wouldn't get an A. He doesn't really post supplemental materials, so the textbook is a must.
                
                   He really knows his stuff! His tests and quizzes were not bad as long as you read the book. Highly recommend!
                
                   He is a really good teacher and makes class fun. just make sure you read your book and take notes. He's also nice to look at .
                
                   Love this professor, he is very kind and considerate of his students. He really does  care and is willing to help you learn the material in any way possible.
                
                   Professor is extremely intelligent.  If you study EVERY word that he writes and speaks, you will do well.  If you are lazy, you will not do well.  End of discussion.
                
                   His class is very hard, but you will learn more with Pitton than with almost any other professor. Do the papers the way he says to, take GOOD notes, study your ass off, and pray for help on the final. Make sure to take the midterm, as he gives you the option not to. Very brilliant man, but he will make you work to pass!!
                
                   Prof. Pitton is an excellent lecturer. His tests are a bit scattered and very difficult. The information is in the book, you just have to dig it out because he jumps around a lot.
                
                   I'm a past student. He was one of the best teachers I had at TAMUC. Don't go in expecting a free pass. You will work for your grade or you will fail. Show up EVERYDAY, take notes, bring a tape recorder, play it and fill in any gaps in your notes. If you are lazy save your parent's money and take classes with other teachers
                
                   Never, never trust this instructor.  Take notes of everything he says so you can prove it later.  He makes his tests &quot;tricky&quot; and is happiest when he can announce that no one got an A.  Tons of mindless detail and no substance to his lectures.  If at all possible, take someone else.
                
                   I had heard the horrible rumors of Prof Pitton before attending this class, but I really enjoyed the class. He was clear on his grading policy and I made an A with some effort. His tests are not that hard. They are just extremely thorough so as long as you study you will be fine. I loved this class!
                
                   His classes really aren't that bad. They're very interesting, the kind you don't mind waking up for. He has very strict guidelines for the papers so follow them. For the tests, prepare your answers for the essays ahead of time. If you're willing to put in some time for the class then you'll be fine.
                
                   Pitton's tests are difficult.I have learned more from this man than any other professor. The people who complain are usually lazy people.He is helpful and thoughtful and very kind.Just don't mess around and you will be successful!! His tests are kindof hard but if you study at all you will pass.
                
                   While Curt Pitton does know his field of study and makes his class time interesting...the tests are horrible! Regardless of what you study for you will be surprised with new information that you never heard of. I participated, took notes, and studied hard to no avial! Run, no sprint fast and far away from the two horned, pitched fork carrying PITTO
                
                   Pitton is a very intelligent man who really seems to want you to learn this subject.  i have had him for two classes, on in the fall semester and one in the summer.  Take him in the summer because the class is smaller and he seems to be more patient and helpful.
                
                   Mr. Pitton wants everthing to be done neat and thorough!!!! He has very high standards, but if you are sure to follow instructions you should be OK!!
                
                   Simply the WORST professor that I have ever had in college. He is just TERRIBLE! His test are difficult, his classes are boring and he shows no concern to his students at all. He will not help with anything...DO NOT TAKE THIS MAN FOR ANY CLASS...PLEASE!!
                
                   He is a tough professor. Lots of notes, very little if any use of the book. Test are insanely hard, you have to study A LOT.
                
                   I really enjoyed the class, as I learned a great deal of information. Many people say that you have to write great papers, but they're wrong: the papers must be perfect. He will find a mistake, I promise you. You will never get a perfect grade on his papers, and there are about 7 of them. Tests cover huge volume of information. Good luck. Pray.
                
                   I have had Pitton for 3 other classes, which is why I took him for my capstone. Very disappointed with the inconsistency of his grading, his tests are extremely out of date on stats, his arbitrary and subjective grades on the MANY papers depend on his mood. Take him for Personality and Physio but not for this class. Its a waste of $800 IMO.
                
                   Grades very hard and gets very mad when asked about his grading. He would call people out in class and make fun and he gave sooo many old statistics that just werent up to date. Be willing to write everything down and memorize for the test, even things you wouldn't think are important.
                
                   Never in my 20 years of collegiate or professional career have I met a more intelligent, insightful and interesting teacher. His classes are challenging, but I can guarantee you will learn more about the subject than you ever expected. You will remember him for many years. Highly recommend to motivated students who are there to learn.
                
                   Take lots of notes and read them every night after class is over. If you don't you will not pass his class. Ask him LOTS of questions if you're unclear. Take up praying or chanting. Pitton is so intelligent, but he's also not going to hand out an A unless
                
                   test were most unfair with litt review on midterm and none on final in addition term papers were graded off for gramatical errors after we were told that would not happen  last of all the final had many t/f questions that literaly ran off the page. no evaluation  was offered in this class. i do not recomend at all!!
                
                   The info he presents can be very interesting and it's kind of cool to hear his stories about when he was practicing. However, he's a total **** when it comes to grading and is almost completely unhelpful if anything ever goes wrong. Hang on his every word in class and memorize EVERYTHING because you WILL be asked trick questions on it all.
                
                   I could see how he would be difficult, but in this class he was great.
                
                   Experimental Psychology.  The class was really pretty simple - just a full semester of how to do a psychological experiment.  He was very detailed and very thorough, but the subject matter is just not all that interesting to me.  He would seem frustrated when people didn't understand, but he would go over things as many times as was necessary.
                
                   Do not take this course with other hard courses! The teacher makes this class really hard to pass.
                
                   He tests cumulative, but never hands an assignment back. So if you mess up a test, well, you won't know the material you messed up on, just study it all, which is ridiculous. His lecture is basically him talking for an hour with no discussion, and his posted notes don't match the text, and they don't interact so good luck. Avoid this guy. AWFUL.
                
                   Dr. Pierce is an excellent and dedicated professor. It is too bad that he has to contend with he kind of sub-standard students enrolled at TAMUC.
                
                   Stats is a challenging course if you have an instructor who is unwilling to use different methods to find a resolution. Not everyone is trying to do experimental psych. That is the issue with him, he thinks that everyone is a math wiz like him. It is a required course and generates repeat business for TAMU.
                
                   Students have to first realize that Statistics is an extremely hard course in and of itself. Dr. Pierce does extremely well in teaching the subject. You can pass if you read the book, do the homework, attend class, and study hard for the test.
                
                   I read that the professors read these comments. So,here it goes, to Dr. Pierce. If you're reading this you need to go back to Harvard, and teach there b'coz we (TAMU-C) don't want you here.
                
                   Very knowledgeable teacher. Tardiness, absence, and frequent questions seem to annoy him.  I'm also studying to become a teacher, and although he is very informative, he is not that great at teaching the material 2 people who have never been exposed 2 statistics.  He reads the powerpoints as opposed 2 getting more involved w/ the students learning.
                
                   He is very straight forward, book oriented, and willing to help you if you show the effot. He shows a great interest in his students if they are willing to show an interest in what he is trying to teach them.
                
                   Listen in class, READ THE BOOK, STUDY THE POWERPOINTS... this class is basically a &quot;teach yourself class&quot;. if you don't understand don't even bother asking him for help because he'll just give you the &quot;are you stupid&quot; look! its a classic! lol!
                
                   I thought his class was easy, but I found out a couple semesters later that he doesn't care about minorities, and he is egotistic.
                
                   this teacher was horrible, any guy that you go ask for help and he tells you that he cant does not need to be teaching.  this guy cares nothing about anyone but his own ego, if you correct him he will make it appoint to try and point out uouir flaws for the rest of the class.  i would rather sit and listen to nails scratching on a chalk board
                
                   I am excited to be the first to rate him! Excellent teacher and extremely knowledgeable about Stats and Cognition. Just remember, the course itself is extremely challenging and put forth a lot of effort and time to master the material. Work hard and you will be rewarded with a great grade at the end of the semester.
                
                   Very boring. Nothing he lectures about will ever see the light of exam day. Hates to be asked questions and don't DARE voice an opinion or disagree. If you can stand to agree with him even when it goes against everything you know about the education system (and sometimes what the other teachers are saying) there's still no guarantee you'll pass.
                
                   extremely hard to keep my eyes open in class. I had to sit by the door so i could get out and walk around. If you are going to take him, dont take a night class..take the one hour 3 days a week.
                
                   This man is the worst professor i have ever had.  His test have no set format and they don't come from any of the chapters he talks about or his notes.  You will work as hard as you possibly can and will still not make a good grade.  Horrible professor
                
                   Hard hard hard. You must study for this tests. His tests do not reflect his notes that he gives you in class. He was the hardest prof. in the sped dept.
                
                   If you actually read the text and listen in class, Dr. Roberts makes it very easy to do well.  His patience with students who don't do the above was remarkable;however, everyone has limits.  He has lots of experience, and if getting to know a professor through their stories offends you, get a life.
                
                   He cusses way too much!!!  He screams a lot and the tests are extremely hard.  He does not want you to ask questions.  And he is not helpful.  He seems to want you to fail.  I don't cuss or I could use some very good descriptions for him.
                
                   He doesn't like you to ask questions he talks abour his smoking and his wife and mom and all. He missed 2 weeks of class because his mom got sick and said he would grade everbody on what they had already done. so if it was bad, oh well!
                
                   He knows his stuff and is very helpful if you want to try. Doesn't care for slackers Work and you wont have a problem. His test are over stuff in chapters if you read it is material you have heard
                
                   Strange guy he won't help with assignments.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Worse teacher ranks up there with Masten.  The dept must not want students. They pick the worse ones.  HE talks about his ex's and drinking.  Then test you on material you haven't heard of
                
                   This class was easy enough. She only does tests and 2 projects a semester. She was very helpful if I had questions, and went over information very well in class and was easy to follow. As long as you listen and review Powerpoints you will pass. I would recommend her to everyone!!!
                
                   Amazing Professor, I would love to take her for other Psych courses but she is only doing 2301 as of now. Projects are easy and exams are online. Lectures based off her powerpoints which she post online as well
                
                   Great Teacher
                
                   Awesome class!  Best instructor I've had at this school!
                
                   Enjoyed the class because I never had to go to it and still make an A!
                
                   Ms. Scott is a wonderful teacher. She is very helpful and I have learned a lot in her class.  She is one of my favorite teachers. I don't talk in all of my classes, but I feel comfortable enough to talk and answer questions in her class. I am learning but having fun doing it. She makes you think!
                
                   Ms. Scott is a great teacher and makes each class interesting.  Wished she had more classes I could take from her.  It is a joy in her class.
                
                   She is kind of out there, but she is very cool. We didn't really do much in class, and the tests did not reflect what we talked about in class.
                
                   Kind of scatter brained, but very nice, and she makes it fun to go to class.
                
                   Ms. Scott is a true professional.  Not only is she extremely bright, she is also creative, insightful, not to mention beautiful.  The university should charge double for her classes.  They are well worth it.
                
                   She was MIA at times during the semester.  This class was online so it was difficult to reach her.  We would send emails and her response time was long.  Tonight is the last day of class and we have yet to have grades on 5 assignments!  Would not recommend.
                
                   Large class but Dr. Robertson was great! You can tell that  she is passionate about the subject. Covered all but a couple of chapters in the book. Learned a ton and looked forward to class. Would definitely recommend!
                
                   Too much homework.  Sometimes boring class.  Thinks everyone should be interested in teaching special ed.
                
                   Great teacher you would be lucky to have her
                
                   She explains things rather well.  You know her expectations and she will help you when you need her.
                
                   i loved her class! she is demanding but she will make us LEARN and remember! extremely clear in what she says. very knowledgeable.
                
                   Capella student: Dr. Stacks seems to care about his students, but his delivery at times can be misunderstood. Dr. Stacks has his own view of what online learning should look like and may not align with normal expectations. He is extremely knowledgeable. 
                
                   Super nice guy that respects students and their efforts. He's not into grades, so if you do the work, you get an A. 
                
                   I don't know why everyone is saying that he's a bad teacher.  The only way that someone can fail that class is to skip and not do the work.  I had a 3 hr class and most of the class would skip every day or leave early. Then they would complain that they didn't know of a due date.  It's in the syllabus.  GO TO CLASS...DO THE WORK. You'll get and A++
                
                   I have taken two classes under him.  Made A's in both.  He's a decent teacher.  Really seems to care about his students and the subject matter.
                
                   Now, students have to GROW UP and remember their position!  Stats was not the easiest class, but it was a very concise one.  I learned a lot in this class and it helped me for my other classes.  Dr. Stacks, thanks for caring so much about your students!
                
                   Really GREAT teacher.  I hope he has better luck with students next semester that are not a pain.  Learn alot.
                
                   I have learned to appreciate stats. I am not a math person and have never liked it.  He helped me become motivated and learn to like stats better.  He has helped me alot.  Excellent teacher for people who are beginners.
                
                   Really nice guy.  If you are willing to take notes, participate in lectures, read a little and attend the pre-test study lectures, you can earn an A.  Don't complain if you sleep, talk, and don't attend class.
                
                   Dr. Stacks is a very sincere human being, yet he is one whom has a sensitive soul. I want to thank him for requiring me to use the knowledge that he presents and use them on tests. This requires me to know the material instead of just memorizing it.
                
                   In my three years at this school, I have never had a professor who cared as much for his students. Though at times we miss where he's going, he understands what we are going through in our schooling and that is what we need more of on this campus.
                
                   He is a good guy.  Stats is not a fly by nite course but he will help you if you need it.  Thanks for the website and help.
                
                   To the person that posted &quot;If you don't read the textbook, you will fail his class&quot; I must reply: Hey dumbass, if you dont read the textbook, you will fail a lot of classes! Grow UP, Show Up, SHUT UP and learn. Dr. Stacks is OK by me.
                
                   He is a fair teacher.  He might not always be the most clear teacher but after while will get his point across.  People need to grow up and learn that we're now in a Junior level class and our teacher doesn't have to kiss our ass, we need to work with him
                
                   Dr. Stacks has been more than fair on his grading. People need to quit missing class and just plain grow up. This is not Community College anymore and if PHI THETA KAPPA's doesn't like it is not my problem. Great Teacher!!!
                
                   He's a nice person who gives fair grades.He is very helpful and is very kind outside of class. He's goes above and beyond to acknowledge the students' feelings, and I can tell he really cares about his job.
                
                   He is a nice guy and he grades fair.  Sure he gets overworked easily, but once we all talked about it he has gotten much better.  His lectures are not like his tests, but I think that is so we can understand the thinking behind the equation.
                
                   This professor is more than fair. He has given a large curve on all our tests so he can't be as mean as everyone is saying. True, his lectures are a little hard to follow, but he will try to work with you if you ask him.
                
                   Dr.Stacks is a very fair and good teacher. I feel all this hatred is not due to him.  I learn a lot out of his classes. He is there for you if you have any problems, and he is a very nice and helpful man. You guys are awful for what you say
                
                   He's not bad..you're almost gauranteed a good grade if you come. They just expect stats to be a bowl of cherries.Try talking to him,he's really nice and helpful.He does have a sense of scarcasm,but who doesn't,its mostly legit ne ways.
                
                   Dr. Stacks is not that bad. His tests are simple, he grades on a bell curve...it's not hard to pass his classes. But, there's a good chance you'll just walk away from them none-the-wiser. And he's only made the spoiled girls cry...that's not too hard.
                
                   This is my favorite psychology teacher. She knows what she's talking about. She can seem unfriendly at first, but she just has a very dry sense of humor. Listen to what she says in class. The quizzes are online. I will definitely take her again.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very willing to help all students succeed.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great professor very personable will help you all she can
                
                   a little hard to follow. she is willing to do everything though to help you make a good grade as long as she knows you are trying.
                
                   She is very professional and knows the topic.  Her lectures are great and you learn alot.  She is student friendly
                
                   She is a great instructor.  Knows her stuff but you will be challenged
                
                   I liked the balance between lectures and vids. Maybe could use a few more vids. Lectures were funny though. Had online quizzes almost every week, but gives a few days todo them. He was pretty good about getting slides up each week and due dates were pretty clear. Only had 2 papers, but took several days to see my grade. Bottom line: I'd take again.
                
                   Sit in the back of the class and you'll pass. Do all the assignments on time and its a super easy A. Just went to class to know the due dates for tests and papers. All materials you need are online and if you have an A average by finals weeks, you may not have to take the final. Does studder a lot when lecturing...
                
                   Very easy even if you sit in the back and barely pay attention. He'll give you a heads up about what will be on the test and loves to crack jokes and talk about his life. I'd definitely take this course again.
                
                   There's always some chances to earn extra credit before tests. Will drill you on the brain and has a story for everything. Doesn't make a lot of small talk cuz before you know it you are taking notes.
                
                   Loved this class! She's awesome! Knows her stuff. Get 10 pts for A&P, so make sure and attend class. Tests can be easy IF YOU STUDY! Gives tons of examples. A 1/3 of the test comes from the book so get it. She doesn't care if its the international version as long its the correct book, 1/3 from notes, and slides. Take her!
                
                   Loved this class! She's awesome! She's young, fresh and knows her stuff. You get 10 pts for A&P so make sure you attend class. Tests can be easy IF YOU STUDY! Gives tons of examples. A 1/3 of the test comes from the bk so get it. She doesnt care if its the international version as long its the correct bk, 1/3 from notes, and slides. Take her!
                
                   Loved this class! Ms. B is awesome! She's young, fresh and knows her stuff. You get 10 pts for A&P so make sure you attend class. Tests can be easy IF YOU STUDY! Gives tons of examples. A 1/3 of the test comes from the bk so get it. She doesnt care if its the international version as long its the correct bk, 1/3 from notes, and slides. Take her!
                
                   I loved this class! The professor uses good examples and made class enjoyable. You have to work hard and definitely don't bring your cell phone, but you'll learn the material
                
                   She was a wonderful teacher who is now at another school. She made psychology interesting, which, for me, was a miracle.
                
                   Very knowledgeable and enthusiastic.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Brouillard overall is a good professor, but tends to be a bit overbearing and have extreme feminist views (e.g., she loves to rant about supposed gender inequalities in pretty much everything).  As a professor, I learned quite a bit from her even past her daily 10-minute lectures on how technology is the bane of Western civilization.
                
                   A fair grader, 2 papers, some quizzes, and four exams.A bit strict (especially with phones and electronics) kind of gives off a cold shoulder, but she is a fantastic professor! She can be quite funny and is definitely helpful office hours and through email.
                
                   Good powerpoints, clear lectures. Tests arent hard, just study. Same with papers. But DO NOT make up excuses for missed days or assignments or interrupt her lectures AT ALL for any reason. She doesn't care. She will make you look stupid in front of everyone. DO NOT piss her off at all.
                
                   Good lecturer, but cannot accept being wrong, especially to students. Makes you do an end of the semester project to exemplify how difficult her job is.
                
                   Overall enjoyed her teaching. Is a bit cold but certainly knows when to crack a joke or two. Classes are interesting, but it's all about what YOU bring that impresses her.
                
                   Class isn't bad if you sit in the back, show up, and take notes. Does random attendance quizzes. Tests are sweet because the multiple choice questions are A,B, or C. However, she can be very mean-spirited if she doesn't like your proposal on a group project, and she'll destroy you if she detects even a whiff of cell phone usage.
                
                   She is very knowledgeable. She does take attendance so make sure you are there or else she will make a mental note. As far as her test and her grading methods. As long as you pay attention and read the book. You should have no problems. This is college your expected to read and do work. Great teacher!
                
                   I don't know why people are complaining about her. I found her class to be extremely interesting & the tests are not hard at all. As long as you pay attention & read the book you should get an A.She is really nice as long as you're respectful.Provides really good examples to make the material more understandable.One of the best classes I have taken
                
                   She is very helpful but will b annoyed if u wait until right b4 class or right after class to ask a &#63;, understandable. Anytime I had a &#63; I went 2 her office and she was very nice. Her class takes work, if u bs all semester u won't do well but study for tests and put a decent effort into the project u will. If u r wanting an easy A Dr B is not 4 u.
                
                   Professor is extremely knowledgeable and generally open minded as far as explanations go. In other words concider all information before you ask a question. take excellent notes, she goes on tangents but pay attention to it's significance in lecture. Read the text before and after lecture. know all italicized and bold words in text and your fine.
                
                   Those who are in college for the right reasons will get a lot out of her classes. If you act like a jerk or are looking for an easy A, you'll have problems with her.
                
                   She knows her subject and has good examples. The course was a bit rushed, lots of material to cover. Book was great. Can be rude at times.
                
                   relates the information to students in an understandable manner except for the fact that her real life examples most always concern male oppression. Responses to in class questions are usually sarcastic and most seem apprehensive to ask for this reason made an i high b and 2 a's on three exams yet somehow i &quot;earned&quot; a B because i missed 3 days
                
                   Leaves you more confused then you were before you asked the question, but tries to answer it. Otherwise pretty cool. Read the book and go to class and you'll be fine.
                
                   Pretty cool so far. She gets off track a lot but has lots of interesting things to say. Definitely knows her stuff, but can seem intimidating and unhelpful. Tests are easy if you attend class and read the book.  She's very helpful if you have the balls to approach her; just dont catch her on a bad day.
                
                   enjoyed it
                
                   Easy tests, boring lectures, she is sarcastic, rude, and unapproachable. The only cool thing about her class is that she knows her stuff and she has THE Linclon Davis, he's such a cuttie!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I loved this class so much, and learned a lot from it. The professor is very nice and approachable. The lectures can feel a bit long sometimes, but are interesting. Going to class is mandatory! All of the short answer questions on the test were from lectureBe sure to read ahead of class and to do the quizzes. A lot of work, but possible to get an A
                
                   Tests are incomprehensibly hard and come strictly from book so lectures are useless. Even if you consider yourself a good student get another teacher. No amount of studying can prepare u for the style of testing she uses. The time constraint you are held under during the test make it comparable to a masters level course. 90 min. for 80 Questions...
                
                   I am attending UT in the fall and missed two classes due to mandatory transfer student orientation in the Fall and because of my two absences this teacher gave me a B and this class is considered an easy A generally but this teachers teaching difficulty level is way higher than that of any other teacher in the department. AVOID HER AT ALL COST!!!!!
                
                   I would not recommend this teacher to anyone. If you have the opportunity to take another teacher i highly advise it. Her tests are online open book 80 questions and only 90 min. to complete making it impossible to utilize the book efficiently and the questions are extremely difficult. I am transferring to UT in the fall and got a B in this class.
                
                   I found it boring the first half, but not because of her [just the subject]. She is very kind, helpful, and fair. Attendance is mandatory through in class assns. every time. They are easy and helpful. Utilize the book! even if you it's just on reserve, you learn from it. Daily assn., Online quizzes, midterm and final, and paper. That's all folks!
                
                   Horrible teacher, she's so out there in her thinking and methods and wants everyone else to think like her and most people do not. Lectures ramble on forever and you leaving thinking what the hell did she say the last 2 hours. If you can take anybody else otherwise you'll regret it.
                
                   Online tests are ridiculous. Reading is a must. Teacher lectures are not good.
                
                   This class was really boring, and there is no point to go to class, because all the lectures really don't help on the test. Just read the book and you will do good. But listen occasionally to the lectures to use some of your notes in the papers assigned.
                
                   Really fair prof, asks students to engage the material and let it change them for the better. You might skate by if you don't do all the readings, but you will miss out on the great stuff you'd get from them.
                
                   Overall easy class. Online tests every week from the book. A few group projects as well as solo projects. Lots of discussion. Powerpoints are uploaded for download but aren't needed. Attendance not mandatory but in-class activities are random so I wouldn't skip too much. Posts random assignments so check student board on WebCT frequently.
                
                   Attendance isn't mandatory, but I recommend going as often as possible.  The tests are difficult, but if you read the chapters, listen to the lectures and take notes, and do the study guides, you'll be fine.  She's really approachable and makes everything interesting.  I learned SO much in this class and apply a lot of it to the real world, now.
                
                   Super sweet professor, more than willing to help. There are 3-5 homework assignments a week, but they're very quick & easy if you don't leave them until the last minute. Tests are online and come straight from her power points. Choose group members carefully & don't be afraid to give candid feedback at the end of the project. Tons of extra credit!
                
                   Amazing professor that clearly understands and enjoys teaching Psychology. She gives out many extra credit points. Take advantage of it because it all piles up in the end. Her notes/homework/exams are all up online so honestly, besides the final exam, you don't even have to show up for class. But, she gives participation credit so go if you'd like.
                
                   Excellent professor.  Very interesting course to begin with and it's apparent that Mrs. Foy enjoys what she teaches.  She offers a TON of extra credit, and the tests are straight from the lecture and book, no trick questions.  Only 4 major tests, one group project, and a few participation assignments.  Would absolutely take again with her.
                
                   Dr. Foy was AWESOME! She gave extra credit for doing journals and other activities. Her test for the most part were easy as long as you do the reviews for them. The assignment given weren't hard as well. Discussions SUCKED and really do affect your grade if you miss a few. Overall great course and I would take another class with her. 
                
                   Awesome class! Really enjoyed everything Mrs. Foy taught. She made everything enjoyable to learn and easy! Tests are online, but a lot of people slacked on them. If you take your time and use your notes it's easy to make an A! She gives a buttload of extra credit. Take advantage! You're not doing it right if you don't have at least a B in her class
                
                   Loved her class! Her test were pretty simple if you study the study guide. Notes are always on black board. 
                
                   She was super sweet and understanding, Best teacher!
                
                   She is a nice lady. Gives  lots of extra credit in the class. Q&A and study session are very helpful . She is very helpful.
                
                   She is an awesome person and makes lectures very interesting. Her study sessions are always helpful. Definitely recommend taking her. 
                
                   Gives tons of extra credit. Mostly everything's online.
                
                   She doesn't have a good sense of time management (I'm in her 2.5hr night class). We don't get a lot done in class and have to go over material before tests without in class discussion or review of the topic. She's a nice lady, but I don't like that we plan to go over 3 chapters in class and only get through half of one.
                
                   Gave a ton of extra credit by the end I had a total of 50 points worth of extra credit if you participate in class discussion you can get a ticket which is a point towards your test. Test are online. watching crash course videos on YouTube helped! super easy course!!
                
                   She's an amazing professor and gives extra credit 247 . when you have online assignments do them . but she always gives chances to redo if not done . my all time favorite professor. If you don't go to class she post the class notes after each lecture.
                
                   She was by far one of my favorite professors. Gives tons of extra credit assignments throughout the semester. Posts all the notes online given during class. Textbook is good. Posts review questions and practice testsquizzesthat are an amazing study guide (only reason I made As and Bs on them). Only has 1 paper. Will do anything to help you!
                
                   you can make a good grade but you have to work for it.
                
                   Great teacher! Explains the subject well and is willing to help students succeed.
                
                   very good professor he really knows his stuff . the lectures are everything so be there all the time because what he says during lectures and his notes will be on his exams . just pay attention and take good note you and you should pass with an A- or B+ . 
                
                   TAKE HIM he's not out to get you or trick you he's the best teacher by far
                
                   Dr. Hartlaub has changed since he became Associate Dean.  He has more pretense, more authority, more gravitas.  Sort of like he changed from Captain Kirk to Captain Picard.  Make it so!
                
                   Dr. Hartlaub is an excellent professor.  I think becoming the Associate Dean made him even better, as we all know administrators care the most about teaching.
                
                   LITERALLY the BEST professor I have ever had! and I have been in college for 3 years! he is so funny, interesting, motivating, and clear in everything he explains. Unlike a lot of teachers he relates ALL material to real life situations making it easier for you to understand the topic. He is so nice also! You SHOULD take him! :)
                
                   Best professor by far! I have taken PSYC once before and had to drop because I was just so confused. Hartlaub makes class fun, he's funny, and he explains things in a way that keeps you interested and loving his class! Made a high A and never opened the book, but I payed super close attention in class and took really good notes! BEST PROFESSOR!!!
                
                   Great professor. Funny, easy going, personable. Makes the material easier to learn, understand, and therefore remember. Purposefully makes test easier, no trick questions. But you DO still need to study. He is a nice guy but his classes are not blow off classes. He WILL fail someone who does not put in effort.
                
                   Hartlaub is easily one of my favorite professors on campus! He's really easy going, open, friendly, and funny! If you get the chance to take a class with him, do it!!!
                
                   BEST psychology professor and he  is funny and interesting.He gives extra credit so don't miss class but I wouldn't miss it.I always looked forward to his class out of all my classes.  Make sure you study the material often before the test(don't cram!)if you want to make an A. You will enjoy having him.
                
                   Dr. Hartlaub is a good professor, but he needs to get a life.  He spends all his time  posting comments about his brother and bringing down his average.
                
                   He is my favorite professor ever! He is very funny and make all the material very easy to understand, he does have random quick writes in class so be sure not to skip.
                
                   AWESOME instructor, he is funny and makes class fun to go to, notes are really helpful that's all I used and got A's and B's on my exams.
                
                   The BEST Professor EVER!!!! He makes Class SO much fun and interesting. He is fairly easy as long as you attend to every lecture and read along with the chapter. Beaware He frequently has free write in lectures, if you are not there you will not get credit.Definitely recommend :)
                
                   Best teacher i've had! Makes class fun to go to an easy to listen to.  Actually teaches you what you need to know making the material seem so easy to understand.  Took of my class mid semster cuz 1st teacher got sick and my grade jumped up cuz he made everything make more sense and easy.
                
                   You are very lucky to have Dr. Hartlaub at your University. I took him for multiple classes about 15 years ago when he was at Siena College. He makes the hardest material seem easy to learn.  The best teacher I ever had at Siena.  Great teacher and an even better person.
                
                   Best teacher i have taken so far, you will never get bored. He makes it very good to understand psychology and makes the subject so interesting. He is a must take. Not difficult at all.
                
                   Amazing Teacher and makes learning fun!
                
                   best prof I have ever had, made me switch to psychology minor
                
                   Hartlaub is awesome. If you have the chance to take him for psychology...DO IT! It will be the best decision you have ever made...I took him in the summer and he was awesome. Not hard at all!
                
                   SERIOUSLY I've never had a class before where I didn't want it to end.  He is an outstanding professor, clearly gifted in keeping your attention and explaining material well.  Very kind and intelligent, welcomes students to office hours.  Pay attention in class and study.  Not hard.
                
                   Totally unclear, he didn't even follow his own syllabus. Postpones tests, basically reads from the book during lectures. He asked us to memorize dozens of vocabulary definitions (word for word) in order to do well on the tests. I learned nothing from his class, DO NOT take him!! I wish someone would've been honest with me before I took his class.
                
                   I had Dr Hill for 3 classes last semester (Personality, Child Psychopathology, and Clinical) and I loved him. His lectures are really interesting but when it came to the exams, all I did was memorize the vocabulary (word for word) and I made all A's. All of his classes assign a 10-page paper, but as long as it's the right length, you'll get an A.
                
                   I adore Dr. Hill so much! Had 4 classes with him and the tests are always the same format! He lectures for the entire class, but he has so much experience that it's worth paying attention to. His stories tie into the short essays on the tests! There is a ten page paper due each semester, don't wait until the last minute to get it done!  
                
                   Kind of long winded. Veers off topic a lot, but he is funny to listen to. Ironically, doesn't have a lot to say in terms of help if you go to his office. Read the text book and you should be fine. He grades the term papers based on structure, not content. Class time seems a bit disorganized, but he knows what he is talking about.
                
                   If you can, take this class in the SUMMER. You'll be very glad - NO PAPER TO WRITE! Read the chapters (yes, they are long) before class/lectures. Take notes. Do any extra credit assigned, and go to class. If you attend regularly, he'll curve your grade. Humorous, wry, curses a lot, but a decent professor. EASY!!!
                
                   This class should be interesting, but Dr. Hill makes it so boring. He just sits infront of the class and reads from the book and goes off topic easily. It is easy, but you have to teach yourself.
                
                   If you want a teacher that sits at the front of the class and literally reads straight from the textbook, this is the class for you! He seems lazy in his teaching and literally wants you to know the book line by line. ALL of his grading is done by his TA who grades short essay harshly.
                
                   Took Dr. Hill for Abnormal Psych and Personality. He is hands down the best professor I have ever had. His class is hard. You HAVE to study, but you will retain the information. I still remember everything from 6 years ago. Great teacher. Great quality.
                
                   The absolute best instructor I've ever had, wish I'd had him as an undergrad. The man is a seemingly endless fountain of knowledge and his stories of real-world incidents all tie in to the class. He expects a lot from his students (you really need to do the readings before class) but he understands real life happens. I strongly recommend this class
                
                   great class!!! If you do the work you will get the A.  You should take him if you can you will learn a lot from his experience.
                
                   This professor could work on lecture organization, conciseness, staying on topic, actually teaching the course material in a focused fashion, drawing better diagrams, explaining core concepts more effectively, sticking to important information (leaving out unnecessary biographical information), and not demand students learn definitions verbatim.
                
                   ONE COOL DUDE!! EX MARINE VIETNAM VET SEMPER FI!! GREAT PROF Lot of work remember terms an big paper, however you will not get bored!! gave us a great curve!!
                
                   I took both of his undergrad courses and got A's. Read the chapters & memorize the key terms for the tests. Try your best on his infamous 10 pg paper and your grade will reflect your effort. Dr. Hill is the type of teacher that people should take for the experience. He's done a lot of living in 60+ years and has great stories, so don't skip class!
                
                   Awesome professor. Laid back funny guy tells lots of stories. Tests are cake if you read a few case studies and the book. Would definitely recommend
                
                   Seems intimidating, but anything but. He will keep your attention with lots of stories and antics that relate to the subject. Read always before class, or you'll be bored. Challenging but fair &quot;oh, this isn't the 14th Grade&#63;&quot; Would take him again for sure!
                
                   Dr Hill is a great professor. If you are interested in Psyc you will enjoy his class. If your just along for the ride, you might want to get off the bus.
                
                   Dr. Hill is one sexy ass prof. I found it so hard to concentrate! Good thing you could get by with reading and going to lecture! That Yamikah was extra SEXY!
                
                   Bunch of reading and writing, welcome to college boys and girls
                
                   He kept my interest, in a 2.5 hour night class.  I thought I was going to end up with a B or C but got an A!  I never had trouble approaching him for help.
                
                   Relates material to real events, which makes it much easier to understand.
                
                   Dr. Houlihan is amazing! The tests can be a little tricky, but as long as you study and come to class, you'll make an easy A or B in the class. I learned a lot from this class. She is very knowledgeable in what she does. Great professor!
                
                   Dr. Houlihan was awesome! Her tests kind of can creep up on you with the questions, but overall I had a great time in her class! She was very knowledgeable and made talking about sex humorous and comfortable for those who weren't! Would recommend her to anyone who is willing to take this course.
                
                   Very interesting course to take. The professor is very understanding and is knowledgeable of the topics. Read the book along with her lectures and you will do great. 
                
                   This class is easy and she is very helpful! This is a great class!
                
                   Her class is pretty straight forward, read the book and study the PowerPoint, and you'll pass with flying colors. She is also really helpful during office hours if you need something clarified. You should take her.
                
                   As long as you studied the powerpoint and go to class, you should pass this class with flying colors. I definitely enjoyed this class and would recommend it to anyone!
                
                   This class is easy if you study the power points and read the book for examples. I would attend class because there are in class assignments' that will count as a grade and you won't know when. Gives extra credit. I loved this class.
                
                   as long as you study what she goes over on powerpoint you will ace class. she does take attendance. class very interesting.
                
                   I used to love Social Psych until this class. The grading is seemingly arbitrary and personal bias does play a part in her grading, even if she tells you it doesn't. When exams are returned there is no explanation of why points are deducted and no explanation is forthcoming. Find another instructor if you can or, better yet, don't attend TAMUCC
                
                   she is very clear and can keep you awake but test are hard.
                
                   This is her last semester teaching before maternity leave. Dr. H will be back next Fall! Loved this class, she is the best person out there to teach anything health related in psychology. Try taking it in the fall of 2012 everyone! Tests - require thinking! study slides AND your textbook. She will stress you read the book. She is respectful always.
                
                   Teacher is Hot, and cool, and the subject is interesting, unfortunately her tests are pretty difficult and you really have to study and read alot and take alot of notes, if you do all that you'll do fine.
                
                   Really like her. She is young and appeals to young students. Older students seem to enjoy her as well. Very clear and to the point, no dry jargon ever. Assists outside of class always, and respects your thoughts always.
                
                   She is awesome! She clearly cares that her students learn and it shows in the PowerPoint slides that are clear along with her use of other teaching materials! If you see her as a professor, take her!
                
                   very very very boring class. If you want to learn about human sexuality just check out textbook from the library. Don't waste your tuition money.
                
                   Her lectures are clear and to the point. She provides many opportunities to do well, although her tests are challenging.
                
                   Awesome prof! Took her for human sexuality. Her notes are extremely helpful and her grading is very fair! Challenging tests but the class is a lot of fun! Take this class!!!!
                
                   Ok.. Not completely fair with grading.. Not always consistent either
                
                   Fun class!! Tests are hard if you don't study, I recommend studying chapters and PowerPoints to do well. There isn't that many assignments, except for two short papers and a few in-class activities so doing well on tests is a must to pass the class.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Actually practices in his field.  Was an ok instuctor if your into the whole human sexuality topic ealy in the morning.  Class is fun if your interested in the subject.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very dry sense of humor, likes what he does.  Not always clear, but always interesting.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great storyteller.  Give clear concise examples and gives plenty of time to ask questions.
                
                   This class was very hard for an into course. He is very into the subject and talks to the class as if we are PSYC graduates. His tests had nothing to do with the reviews, though he gave a lot of hints it was not much help. I went to talk to him and I found him to be a bit rude. I will not take him again.
                
                   Awesome, easy and as long as you do the stop and checks you should not have a problem with his tests.
                
                   very funny guy. clear, not very hard, gives a lot of hints on reviews.
                
                   Easy psyc teacher. I took absolutely NO notes. I sat and paid attention in class and read book for tests. Seems like most of the other students were freshmen and just chatted on FB and complained over poor grades. Go over the little green definitions/general ideas off to the sides in the book before the exams, they will help. Read memory chapter.
                
                   Overall he is a terrible teacher.  For an 1hr30m class, guaranteed he will go in and sit on the desk kicking his feet telling stories. Lack of effort in visual descriptions i.e power points, pictures, videos, etc.  Even if there was a power point, he won't have much on it.
                
                   Good instructor. Knows material. Gives curves if test was generally unmanageable.
                
                   I took him for Phys. Psyc and he was not an easy teacher to deal with.  He kept getting off track during the lectures and on some of the test you never know where he's coming from with his questions.  In order to pass his class with a good grade you better read whatever he mentions along with writing down whatever he says.
                
                   great guy very understanding and very great Professor
                
                   Great great great professor.  You will not be disappointed if you choose him over any other professor.  I promise.
                
                   i had him for both general and physiological psychology.....he is an excellent teacher! his classes are always interesting and fun...he is also very helpful! i would def. take him again
                
                   I love the guy! he's really interesting.
                
                   he would get off the subject and much of the time we did not know where the exams were coming from.
                
                   He is really funny and makes class interesting. He is kind of odd but very nice. I actually liked going to class and the test are not difficult if you attend class.
                
                   General, Behavioral &amp; Physio were awesome
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great guy, very easy to get along with.  Willing to help.  A fair amount of reading involved, but it's not too bad.  Best teacher so far.
                
                   Very entertaining. Just make sure you keep up with the reading, too.
                
                   Stan - hes an old guy that loves to joke about Sex.  The class is average.  You can pass by only showin up on test days.  But thats all you will do..pass...no A- in order to get an A you do need to study some.
                
                   Wonderful teacher, very funny, great lecture pace.
                
                   Dr.Lewin is a great teacher. She really knows her material and is willing to work with her students.
                
                   ok
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Martinez was awesome! Took him in the Spring.  No homework is given but one paper to write, it's not even a long paper.  He asks that you attend a trial and write about it, that's it,  Test are not difficult if you study.  Dr. Martinez makes you want to go to class, he is very engaging and has awesome stories. Strongly suggest taking this guy.
                
                   Everything I learne was completely self taught [reading the book and reviewing power points]. Never on time and tells stories that are hardly useful. Very nice guy though. Worth taking but don't expect to learn anything from him.
                
                   I didn't use my book once and got A's on all my exams. Just go to class and listen in lecture, hes good about going over exactly whats on the exam. The court paper so much fun. He is a cool guy and lets class out early a lot even though he says he doesn't on the first day. I learned A LOT.
                
                   I took Dr. Martinez for Forensic Psych/Intro to Clinical Psych. He's good! PsyD's have the best stories. Trust me. Put in a little effort and you'd, at the very least, get a B. He's a good guy and will answer all questions.
                
                   he is a really cool teacher. very laid back and his class in not hard at all. he keeps you interested but he does go off topic in numerous occasions. he is super funny though. very enjoyable class. i totally recommend him
                
                   Everyone who says you don't need the book are also saying how hard his tests are. Do the reading it helps. The text is also very cheap.
                
                   Teaches concepts well.  Seems to get bored when he's teaching something he doesn't do research in.  Seems far more into his research than teaching.  Tests and quizzes (especially quizzes) are surprisingly difficult.  I'd recomend him if you could take him in between two more entertaining teachers during the day.
                
                   Seems kind of arrogant when he's lecturing.  Same as all the other reviews: tons of notes, no need for a book, and hard ass tests. The key is finding someone who took the class last semester and kept the tests--they are the same! And, take advantage of his extra credit. It can raise your grade AT LEAST a letter grade.
                
                   He goes over so much info. I have nightmares when we have a test.He lectures by powerpoint everyday.It's not really an interactive class.He doesn't take role, gives extra credit (& trust me you will need it), and his notes are always online (His tests come directly from the notes).He's really nice and cracks a funny joke once in a while. Good Luck!
                
                   good professor, very help full, in his tests you have to apply knowledge and it is knida tricky
                
                   all his notes are online so you dont need a book. he doesnt take role. very interesting material, but there is so much that is covered. tests are kind of hard even if you study the notes. its all multiple choice but again there is so much information.
                
                   He can be very tough at times but if you show that you need help he is more than willing to go the extra mile
                
                   Lots and lots of notes...but he puts them online for you.  The tests come from the notes, so you don't really need the book.  A very interesting class, but just lots of information.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Moreno is a great professor. However, i have never worked so hard for a C in my life, but I learned so much in the process. If you want an easy A, take someone else. But if you are serious about your major, rise to the challenge and quit being a wimp. We pay good money to learn from experts in our field, and Dr Moreno is the real deal!
                
                   This was the most difficult class I have ever taken! His tests are impossible, I am a straight A student and after studying harder than I have ever studied I only got in the 80s on his tests, and that is the class high. It is interesting though, so if you have tons of time and do not care about your gpa then it's a good class.
                
                   The hardest class I have ever taken. I would not recomened taking him unless you have endless amounts of time to study for his class. The tests were so hard and he wanted very specific details. I really did not enjoy his class at all.
                
                   OMG DO Not, I repeat.... Do not take this professor!!!! He is the WORST I have ever had! Trust me I had a 3.8 GPA and he made me drop to a 3.4. He teaches undergrad class like a grad class and a grad as a doc class! He is the single worst person to get a hold of prolly cause he is way too busy with other students trying to figure out how the hell t
                
                   he's an okay teacher....be sure to read the chapters before entering class b/c slides are exactly off the book and its easier to understand. Quizzes are random so ATTENDANCE IS REALLY IMPORTANT! take notes on articles he talks about. quizzes and tests have lots of questions from quizzes straight off the book but some from articles he talks about.
                
                   He is laid back. He goes over alot of information but narrows it down before an exam. He is entertaining so the class is interesting and not hard to sit through.
                
                   He's a new professor, funny, tries to make the best out of learning.
                
                   This class was great! Dr. Mims was monotone but his jokes made the class what it was. Powerpoints aren't provided to students so must read before going to class. Reviews are very helpful for the exams, and are easy to do. Test are long but they're not hard if you study. Paper was easy and attendance isn't mandatory but worth 40 points. 
                
                   Dr. Mims gives 4 long exams, but provideds students with study guide questions; you look up the answers on your own.  Also, 7 pg. case study paper.  Attendance NOT mandatory; however, takes random attendance for 10 pts. toward grade.  Not hard, but you will have to study for exams.  Also, VERY helpful!  Love this guy!
                
                   Dr. Mims knows his stuff.  Always willing to help students & uses power points; however does NOT post online, so, you'd better write fast or you'll miss something.  4 lengthy exams, a paper, & 0 points allotted for random attendance.  An "A" is possible, but you'll have to earn it.  Still,  you'll learn a lot! Not much (if any) extra credit.
                
                   He can be a bit intimidating but the class is interesting. Exam wise as long as you study from the book,you should do pretty well. & now lets talk about his looks, this man is incredible to look at. A true treat to the eye. Fo sho. Yum! ~_^
                
                   Very caring guy! He gives reviews, uploads videos to help, and is readily available. He is very committed to his job, and the class isn't very demanding as long as you're willing to study. There's also very little math, so don't be scared off. He makes the class very do-able, I would recommend him for sure.
                
                   I took Experimental with Seidel and I really liked him. He's really into his students' success. The exams were easy. You do have to create & perform a full-blown experiment, but your lab instructor breaks it up into a million different parts so you're basically forced to stay on top of it. Plus, it was kind of cool seeing your experiment play out!
                
                   I have taken 3 classes with Dr. Seidel and have learned a great deal of useful and valuable information. He is very helpful, has a positive attitude, and a nice smile.
                
                   Dr. Seidel is one the best and chillest psych professors at tamucc. Hes understanding, loves what he does, and helps all his students succeed in the class! I recommend him to anyone!
                
                   Seidel was a great professor. He helped and gave feedback when needed. Needs to make all his exams open book, think that would make the course a bit easier. 
                
                   Dr. Siedel is very enthusiastic about his job, does a great job, tests are a little wordy and can be confusing, but generally if you pay attention in class and pay attention to the definitions in the book, you will do fine
                
                   He is the best professor. I knew nothing about Business and industrial psyc before I took his class and now I want to get a masters in it.
                
                   Helpful. Makes it interesting, fun guy. Gives opportunity for extra credit. Would def take him again.
                
                   Nice guy easy ot work with and doesnt put you to sleep in lecture.  Not to much hw and even gives extra credit.
                
                   Loved him. Super easy teacher. I literally didn't turn in the only paper of the year and still came out with an A. And I never went to class
                
                   He's super easy. He want everyone to pass so he replaces grades a lot. I almost never read the book. Most stuff is common sense. If you do want to pay attention in class it is better to sit in front because he can't control the class.
                
                   His lectures are pretty boring and tends to think out loud which makes it hard to focus. Makes a lot of corny jokes. Doesn't have much control over the class.
                
                   Amazingly amazing
                
                   He's very boring but his lectures are very helpful for knowing what will actually be on his tests.
                
                   Lectures are dry and very boring!! It is hard to stay awake. Takes attendance everyday. There are also a couple of exams and a group project/presentation. I recommend you take stats before you take this class. I ended up dropping before taking any of the exams so I can't comment on their difficulty. Avoid if you can.
                
                   Terrible professor, lectures are boring, and attendance is mandatory. Tests are HARD. For a general psych class he has a very bias approach. I would not recommend him, Avoid if possible
                
                   I love love love Dr. Seidel! He loves his field and makes it very interesting to learn about. His tests are straight from his lectures, and he doesnt try to fool you.
                
                   He's a good guy and goes out of his way to help all his students.  His lectures aren't entertaining though...
                
                   He is very monotone and not not much of a public speaking but he's very good hearted and is very nice. It is very hard to maintain attention in his class, he is not very enthusiastic. Just overall very boring.
                
                   I love this professor so much that I take him each chance I get! He's actually a wonderful person. He's very understanding and he'll try to help you at any chance he can. He loves to do powerpoints which makes it easier to follow along!
                
                   I've had her for 4 classes  and she is great. Everyone should take her if you have a chance. Even if its a late class, it is worth it. Attendance isnt mandatory, but you should go because her test are from lectures.  
                
                   Would take her class again in a heartbeat! She makes the material and readings enjoyable. Her test are all taken directly from what she lectures on in class so I wouldn't advise skipping a day. Reasonable grader, very willing to help her students. I you show up to class, pay attention, and take decent notes, the course shouldn't be a problem.
                
                   se is gorgeous, and a great teacher
                
                   EASY EASY EASY!! Great professor!. Discussions are very interesting and funny! must attend class though cause thats when she assigns the howework which is not hard. easiest tests i've ever taken. not necessary to read entire chapters, just study your notes you take during discussions. If you don't get an A in this class, there is not hope for you.
                
                   Chari was an awesome professor she was clear and concise but also a ton of fun! She would talk about her patients in class and she made the class be very involved in everything. She would ask the class questions about our past experiences pertaining to the topic we were on. All in all she was one of the best professors I've ever had. :)
                
                   Ms. McCloud was my favorite professor! She was truly a joy to have. I had her twice a week. We covered a chapter one class and the next we had a quiz - it's open note & open book. Not only is she a professor but she is on the counseling staff. She's truly passionate about her work & it shows just how much she cares about students.
                
                   Says class is not mandatory but randomly takes attendance for a grade. Horrible at grading presentations. Does not accept late work (AT ALL). Exams are easy if you study the PowerPoints/lectures. I never took notes or bought the book. Her notes are VERY HELPFUL!
                
                   She's a nice lady, but she's monotone and boring. I never took a single note in her class because all she does is stands and reads directly from the power point. Her study guides are 50-60 questions, but every test is only 20 questions...GET TO THE POINT. I am glad I'm done with this class.
                
                   She is a very interesting professor. Her class is pretty easy since she gives you the power point slides that she goes over in class.  She also gives out a lot of extra credit, so make sure you complete it and you'll do fine :)
                
                   Very helpful and considerate of his students. Uploads template notes online for you to use in class (must go for the notes), but the templates may be used to pass his tests (based on you ability). Gives pop quizzes, tests are simple and always have bonuses, and final isn't comprehensive. Strongly urge you to take him for intro to psych.
                
                   He's a good teacher. About 5 or 6 tests. He goes pretty fast but if you go to class and take notes, you'll learn the material since he's pretty clear about what he's talking about.  Pop quizzes and questions worth 2 points are given at random times.
                
                   Somehow class would start off with a lesson (from the book) and then turned into peoples opinions over life matters. By the way my class was abnormal psyc. Somehow I believed this class was going to be the biggest eye opener when it came to dealing with psychological disorders and to be honest I didn't learn much. 
                
                   Before every exam you get a study guide. It's important to attend class because he give you info sometimes that the book will not have. He helps you remember info because he repeats important concepts to get you to understand and prep for the exams. He did assign a term paper but as long as you are descriptive in it you will make an A on it.
                
                   He lectures through the whole class pd., it is a fairly difficult class but if you attend class every time you meet and read the chapters assigned you will be good. He sends reviews/studyguide to your tamuk email address! He is a good professor :)
                
                   Professor knows his stuff but is not the best (nor the worst) at explaining it. Not flexible with mistakes/changing grades. In the summer, tests are open book but still tough! And there was a presentation that wasn't terrible but after talking to him about mistakes that wern't the whole groups fault, he wouldn't raise our grade. He's okay..
                
                   Very rude, boring, and doesn't care about anyone only his favorites
                
                   Extremely boring, very pompous and doesn't really care about you unless you like to suck up.
                
                   Take notes, attend class, and keep up with your reading. The tests are based on knowledge and memory. The only pain in the butt was the 10 page essay. overall ok teacher
                
                   She's an amazing teacher! She's always helping everyone and really encourages group work and partners. Gives lots of daily grades so you shouldnt miss too much, but they are easy assignments. Wonderful teacher. Definitely recommend!
                
                   Awesome professor!!!! She's very intelligent,  helpful, and really funny!! I really enjoyed her class, she made it very interesting!
                
                   N/A
                
                   She is so helpful and will work with you on any issue. She also frequently lets out class early. She is one of the nicest and most interesting teachers I have ever had.
                
                   She is one of the nicest teachers on campus. She frequently lets class out early, and she gives you most of the notes. If you show up and study the reviews she gives you before the tests, you should do fine. Also, she makes class interesting.
                
                   This is a great teacher. Every class she teaches is a great one. You have to study and come to class to pass the class obviously, but it is not extremely difficult.
                
                   this class was sooo boring! you dont even have to show up just read the chapters all her notes come exactly from the book and when you ask her questions she cant explain anything! dont take
                
                   Stay clear away from this profsessor. She is rude and puts her students on the spot if they are not correct or need help. She never hands exams out and is rarely there during her office hours. She makes the class harder than what it should be and grades very picky on essays and exams. The university needs to get rid of this professor asap. 
                
                   She is a great professor! I learned how to study by taking her classes and if she sees that you really care about your grades, she will help you. I'm currently a senior and she is the ONLY professor who has let me know that I am a hard working student. If you are not self-disciplined, don't take her. 
                
                   I guess some people never change.I took this "professor" at utsa and the comments are right on, pretty much the same. Being a professor is not one of the cards she was dealt with. I have to say that her personality (huge ego) narcissism, grandiosity, intermittent explosiveness, possibly borderline, all axis2 get in the way of her teaching ability.
                
                   Do not take her. She belittles her students. She makes you feel like she is on your side but at the end she is not. She should not be a teacher. If you are late she'll put on the spot unless you are her favorite. Her test are hard & if they are not to her standard, prepare to fail. I want to sign the petition please to get rid of her.
                
                   She is a horrible instructor. She makes the lesson harder than what it should be. I love psychology and i never made anything less than an A ever until i took her course. Her test are horrible as well, she confuses the hell out of the whole class. She is very picky on her test as well, she grades too picky and ask for too much. Theres like 4 test.
                
                   He would always lecture, and they were very interesting lectures.  He often would deviate into gender and sexuality topics, but still very interesting.  Had few exams, but they were very easy and he would provide a review.  I would definitely take another one of his classes.  10 pg essay at the end, but it was done in parts so it was easier.
                
                   She?s a great professor but a little on the lost side. Ms. Martinez is very helpful and understands student?s problems. (She?s a must take psychology professor because she?s awesome) :o.
                
                   She doesn't give any homework assignments. Her tests are multiple choice. She gives you a study guide but you are not allowed to take it home. She's a little difficult to understand with her Nigerian accent.
                
                   Honestly just show up and pay attention and you"ll do great.  Didn't use my book often but it does help every now and then. I would take any course she teaches. Plus she's super nice, and helpful. Take her class!!!!
                
                   Very easy course weekly assignment very easy,  just read and answer questions then exams r on these! !!  She's So Young And Knowledgeable. . She also always replies to emails and is very very helpful... would def take another course with her... make sure u show up to class always
                
                   Makes class interesting. Very understanding of students situations and considers their time. Grades fairly and will not test over anything she hasn't gone over. She does NOT provide notes but, as long as you take some or listen, you will be fine. I did not buy the book and got an A+. :)
                
                   This proffesor teaches his lectures right off the powerpoint, doesnt elaborate much. There is one major essay envolved but not very hard. He gives study guides for exams but they dont help much. Assigns online quizes even though it is not a hybrid class,  and is not very engaging overall, would not recommend!
                
                   She is great!!! Lectures are interesting and keeps you entertained. Three exams and one project is a piece of cake, if you study and try at least. I will definitely take her again!
                
                   Took her for 3320, 4324, and 4360, and I'm taking her for 4325 this fall! Her tests are fair, the study guides are excellent, and the textbook isn't necessary; I've made 3 As without reading a chapter. Only problem is if you're not a strong writer; she's not a tough grader, but you usually have a lit review worth 30-40 percent of your grade. 
                
                   Dr. Debutte is AMAZING! She is such a sweet lady and very helpful during class with examples and explaining. 
                
                   She's one of my favorite professors I've had so far. She cares about students as individuals and she's really into teaching so the lectures are never boring
                
                   Dr. Debutte is an excellent instructor.
                
                   Great teacher and intersting class. She teaches off of powerpoints which she puts online along with reviews, but takes attendance daily. She prepares you very well for the tests, but sometimes goes too fast during lecture. There are many extra credit opportunities.
                
                   kept class very interesting. explained things very well. tests were extremely easy if the terms were studied. reviews were almost the exact same as the tests. allows bonus points. overall an amazing instructor!
                
                   Professor Hughes is a good teacher and I learned much from her class.
                
                   Fairly easy classes, but incredibly boring, she reads from her power points every class.  She does not offer much help during her office hours.  The best words to describe her attitude is &quot;Stuck Up&quot;, she does not have time to talk to a student.
                
                   Great professor. However, I learned quickly that I did not really need to read the textbook. Anything on the test comes from her notes. You just memorize the lists and regurgitate them in most classes. She's very thorough in class discussions.
                
                   Easy enough. But you have to study the stuff yourself. You can talk her into giving you most of the questions for review. She was very new when I had her.
                
                   He's GREAT! Read the textbook. He does not like lazy students and will call you out if you do not participate. This is what college is SUPPOSED to be like. Real-world, critical thinking is emphasized. Great film on hormones, too. I highly recommend this guy/class. I learned so much and still think about the class 2 years after taking it. A+++
                
                   He is a good teacher who provides valuable feedback.  I learned a lot from his class and will take him again.
                
                   A Professor with high expectations. He respects those who demonstrate their ability to &quot;think&quot; outside themselves. He challenges his students not to believe without thinking critically. He does NOT spoon the material...He expects college students to rise to the level of his expectations. GREAT Professor!
                
                   If you are not willing to bow to him, expect trouble. Huge ego and very intolerant of different points of view. I think he likes to intimidate people which is why he still has a job, i suppose some people are afraid to challenge him directly. JMHO
                
                   Totally subjective in grading papers and discussion questions.  I had an A on all the multiple choice questions, actually the highest grade in class, but I did not have boobies, so he found a way to give me a B.
                
                   Easy class if you READ your textbook; never go to class without having read the lesson. His favorite question is always, &quot;What was your most important learning&#63;&quot; Meaning, tell me what you got out of the chapter. He responds from what the class brings up in discussion. You just have to get used to him.
                
                   He likes 2 make sure u read the chapter by asking u questions and calling u out in class.  He is egotistical at times, and his tests require that u read the chapters. Some &#63;s on the test were not gone over in class.  The tests were also rather long. Class was BORING.
                
                   This teacher is very tedious.  Hard, yes.  But you WILL learn if you survive his higher level classes. Must be able to expand answers. Prone to huge ego trips and god-like demeanor.
                
                   She has a very good self taught learning style. Even though the chapter reviews she assigns are time consuming it helps you retain the subject matter. Very good professor.
                
                   Dr. Moore will make it clear she wants you to learn. Just do the work, come to class and you will make a good grade. Not your usual boring class and you WILL learn. She went to school and taught in New York City, so if you expect to be spoon-fed an A, don't take her. Give her respect, and she will respect you in return. Dr. Moore is great!
                
                   Professor Moore is a very good professor who makes class fun and interesting.  She provides great feedback that helped me improve my writing.
                
                   Professor Brandy Moore was a very nice professor, she loves what she does and works hard for the people who show up. If you are going to miss class a lot, dont bother trying to do anything except for dropping, because she only works well for those who communicate with her and who make an effort to make it to class. Always communicate regardless.
                
                   If you have the opportunity definitely take her class, she was wonderful. She takes attendance every day, lectures are always interesting, 100-50 question test, extensive reviews, and she always willing to help. You can tell she enjoys teaching, she's so enthusiastic. AWESOME TEACHER (:
                
                   Shes not hard but not easy.  She does require multiple projects, do them early and you wont have to worry about it later.  Read your book, write notes and listen to her lectures. She's funny and nice.  I loved her class and learned a lot.
                
                   Aww I actually miss this teacher... Too bad I wont be able to take another class with her, she was awesome!
                
                   Calvario is such a nice professor! The class is really easy & the test are super easy! I really love that she gives the students a study guide! I learned a good amount of info on cross-cultural. :)
                
                   She's really sweet, and very young. She looks like one of the students! Interesting class, provides reviews and is very accessible
                
                   Mrs. Calvario is an awsome instructor!! she makes the class interesting. Study her review test and you will be fine. I would definately take another class with her.
                
                   Great teacher, very helpful and knows her material! She gives you her cell phone number and answers! Her lectures are not boring and she shows a couple interesting videos. I took her for 2 classes this semester and really enjoyed it! Take her, Take her!!!
                
                   Great teacher....really enjoys teaching students you can tell. If i could take her in all my classes I would. I learned a lot in her class and would for sure take her again.
                
                   Very easy class. The work required for the class was told to us at the beginning of the semester and it was easy to understand. The lectures were easy to follow. She has lots of energy & is fair in her grading.
                
                   Great teacher if you?re looking for a good instructor who will be helpful, understanding, and respectful she is the one to take. Just show up to class and you will do just fine.
                
                   I've taken Mrs. Calvario twice aready! she's super cool and good at teaching. She can give a lot of work at times but its work that can be accomplished. She really helps her students a lot. She provides powerpoints and reviews. take her!
                
                   This instructor is awesome.  She knows her subject well and you can tell by the way she teaches.  Take notes on ppt or print ppt, reat the chapters and you will do fine.
                
                   This professor is absolutly awesome.  She knows her business and seems to really enjoy teaching it.  She has a great sense of humor.  Read the book and study the ppt for test and you will do fine.
                
                   VERY COOL TEACHER AND FUN ESAY CLASS IF DO WK
                
                   I love this professor.......she is young and ready to teach...she keeps things exciting....ya its hard work ...but hey its college...study hard, read the chapters, participate in class, do the reviews, read the power points ....you'll be just fine
                
                   Shes a great professor. She makes you work a lot but you'll learn believe me, but be prepared to earn your grade. She makes you do a report at the end of the semester tests are challenging but if you study the power points and read the text you'll do fine. Go to class though you never know when shell give bonus points for tests!
                
                   The professor is very helpful and willing and there to help. The lecture can be confusing at time but if you ask she will definitely clarify so don't be afraid to ask. Most of her test come from the book so also answer the minor exams after every chapter in the book. The class was a difficult but  overall learned quite a bit, had a good experience.
                
                   Dr. Bohmann, is very vague on what's expected on assignments. Lectures are guided by her powerpoints. I feel like she misses many points, so reading is essential to grasp the content. Don't rely on just her notes, create your own. Really focus on definitions and apply them with the lectures. If you have questions, ASK! Very ambiguous assignments.
                
                   This class was for my minor.  I found it pretty easy you just had to keep up.  Do the book and power point readings, discussion questions,  quizzes, exams, and one research paper.  Keep up and you'll do fine. She also answered my questions in a timely manner.  She was not confusing to me.
                
                   Worst teacher, she stated if you are in the hospital you still must take test on time. I had some much homework I was having a hard time keeping up. I read 80 pages, watched 2 PowerPoint, discussion questions and took two quizzes per week. We had to restudy five chapters to answer to essay questions for exams.
                
                   Professor Bohmann is extremely scatter-brained. I have actually watched Youtube videos after her class that explain statistics better than her. She complicates everything, so I end up tuning her out so I don't get overwhelmed. I am extremely aggravated that I learn more from free online videos than a class that's costing me hundreds of dollars.
                
                   Vague, ambiguous, confusing.  This is by far the most frustrating class I've taken at A&M. The psychology department is equipped with so many knowledgeable, helpful and  caring professors. This woman is not one of them.
                
                   Great prof. I'm good/like math so the class was a little slow paced for me, but great none the less. She wasn't very clear sometimes when explaining the lectures. Vocabulary weighs A LOT, and there's roughly 10 terms on each test. There's also roughly 20 points possible for extra credit, out of 1000
                
                   Tough Class i studied book and power points but could not pass tests.  She does posts power points before class so that you can follow along.  Gives pop quizzes so try your best to understand the reading before you go to class. I used Youtube to follow other instructors who explained in clarity each chapter. She is extremely critical of your work
                
                   took her for stat and research methods.She is very helpful and wants you to do well. She can go fast at times, but if asked to slow down she is more than willing to go over things many times. All her classes are out of 1000 points so its very easy to do well and she gives extra credit. If you read book and keep up on homework you will get an A.
                
                   Was a difficult class considering it was intro.  Speaks fast and expects you to keep up.  Expect weekly homework and quiz. Test every week.  Very rapid and too much info.  Book was not much help and wasn't used much.  Very intimidating.  Tutoring was available by appointment only.  Did I learn anything&#63;  No.
                
                   The instructor is very firm but very knowledgeable and passionate about psychology. If you are taking the class as a requirement you can rest assured that you will leave this class with a lot of knowledge. If you are only taking this class as an elective you may want to look for another instructor. Be prepared to work and work hard.
                
                   Took a hybrid course with her and she expects A LOT of homework. It was difficult to keep up with my other classes. In addition to in-class quizzes, expect multiple discussion each week, assignments, and a term paper. Tests REQUIRE heavy studying, read textbook. Tests are specific multiple choice questions (know your figures) and essays.
                
                   tests were hard at the beginning but towards the end i started to figure her out. flash cards help with the terms and theories. Read the chapters, also go to the textbook website and take practice quizes, they help! attendance is mandatory. she's a really good professor and reasonable. she makes the class interesting.
                
                   Very good professor. Stats is already complicated but she explains the concepts pretty well. She can go fast tho, but if you ask her for help she will help you ANYTIME. grading is decent, she drops lowest test grade. Dont take rock! take bohmann, she gives so many assignments that i think its impossible to fail.
                
                   This Professor is very keen in her department.  She is sometimes hard to understand because she goes off tandum and back again. If you print her ppt and read the book, you will do fine.  Also, make sure you do the work that is assigned and you will do good.
                
                   He is an enjoyable professor. He does give it some long readings (particularly on China) & asks for a summary but doesn't actually grade those. Class & group participation is important. I found papers & exams easy. Reviews match the test perfectly
                
                   I have took Dr. Cox for 3 classes two where online (cross culture & psychological psychology) as well as Stats II with him. He is an awesome and extremely sweet and helpful professor, he will most definitely go out of his way to help you! He is a bit tough but then again this is a university. I would recommend him to anyone, anytime!   
                
                   The exams were not easy, but he goes over the exams . Not everything he reviews will be on the test. He is hilarious and he will listen if you have any questions. Would take Dr. Cox again. Attendance is part of your grade not mandatory if you need extra points.
                
                   I took Stats 2 with him. The course was tough, but this professor made it as best as it could get. There is no way I would have passed with any other instructor. I would take this professor again. You don't find many professors like him. 
                
                   He's amazing! He makes everything so easy to understand, class is entertaining. You don't want to miss class!
                
                   This was a pretty good class. His lectures were interesting for the most part. He has a few article summary assignments but they're not long. Exams aren't long & he gives a general review a class before the exam. There's a group project which I hated but not too bad. Show up, speak up, and do the work. He is actually kind of cute
                
                   Dr. Cox is an amazing professor.  His tests are a little tricky and you really need to think about it.  He offers tons of extra credit.  Just comm with him and you will make an A/B. Would take him again!
                
                   I took Mr. Cox Fall 2012 for Social Psychology he is awesome and understanding.  I enjoyed his class.
                
                   I wasn't paying attention to his looks, so I don't know about the last comment, but I will say that he is efficient and gets the job done. Be prepared to study the book well. His lectures are fast paced, so try to keep up. It was sometimes a bit confusing, but I think everyone did fairly well. Just put effort in the assignments and you'll do fine.
                
                   I love this guy! He is very welcoming, polite and accessible AND also very handsome :)
                
                   Prof. Coulton is not awful but definitely not a professor I have enjoyed. He rambles on in his lectures, often beginning a sentence then saying "nevermind" or "no I'm getting off track". He often seems unprepared. Luckily his lectures are so boring & useless that I read the chapters during class.  Just read your book!
                
                   3 exams, 1 paper. Exams are tough!! No review, powepoint are NO help. You have to read and study, basically teach yourself. He posts the powerpoint a few days prior to the exams, and if you email him and remind him he'll have a rude reply. Yes he gives extra credit and curves other wise I don't think anyone would pass!! Nice guy, horrible professor
                
                   The entire semester was an awful experience! Lectures are extremely dull, useless and mandatory. Hes completely unorganized and hardly provides any help. Tests are typically 60 questions over four chapters. Overall Im disappointed in the class and the commitment of the professor.
                
                   History and Systems of Psychology. Funny, nice, easy going guy. He is a little disorganized with lectures and tests are hard becasue not sure what to study. It's important you read the chapters and take your own notes. He gives extra credit and grades with a curve. He is very understanding as well. 3 exams, 1 term paper, 1 presentation. He's great.
                
                   Abnormal Psych. He is funny, laid back but  little disorganized. He is very understanding in terms of late work, offers extra credit. His exam are 60 Qs, hard, 2 small papers (but gives templetesexamples)a  semi comprehensive final with a heads up on chapters. Tests are hard because his lectures are unorganized and hard to know what to study.
                
                   I don't understand why students don't like Dr. Coulton... I am taking his Abnormal Psych class right now, I was so nervous to take his class because of the negative feedback I got from other students. In all honesty, show up to class, take notes, read your book and you will be fine. Tests are a little difficult, but he grades on a curve of 5 points
                
                   Respect Dr. Coulton!
                
                   A lot of people talk negatively about Dr. Coulton, but he has a lot to offer no matter what and should be respected, regardless. He is nice and is there for his students in time of need. Be a student and do what's necessary- read the book, study, and attend class. It's not that hard.
                
                   OMG avoid him!!!!  When I told a faculty that he was teaching they were floored and told me they thought he was only in an administrative position.  He mumbles and doesn't speak clearly - gives bad examples, is not clear when explaining and covers tons of background but doesn't test you on it.
                
                   Read the chapters and you'll pass. Lectures are boring if you don't participate. He has this amazing sarcastic sense of humor if you don't get it you'll be bored or offended.
                
                   Extremely boring lectures with mandatory attendance, he docks your grade for over 3 absences. Read the book and that will get you passing grades on the tests. My issue was that the syllabus was always a work in progress we never had concrete test dates to prepare for.
                
                   This guy is an amazingly awful professor. I don't even understand how he still has a job. He's disorganized and mumbles; you can barely hear him. Frequently late. He can be pretty offensive with his "jokes". Overall, I thought he was rude. Previous comments are 100% accurate! Worst prof I've ever had. Try to avoid if you can.
                
                   How much longer must I endure this torture... I cannot wait until this semester is over. This guy is by far the worst Psychology professor I've ever crossed paths with. With all his "jokes" you WOULD THINK he's a "nice" guy but believe me he is not your friend...AND he WILL put your grades at stake with no remorse whatsoever. Study, study, study.
                
                   I find him sarcastic and extraordinary rude at times. I don't know why some people like him... I strongly dislike him. He is also a bore and severely critical, if only he could apply this type of criticism inwardly maybe he would actually improve his teaching methods.
                
                   He seems to be a nice guy, but he is just not a good teacher. He does not explain things well, mumbles through the lecture, and is disorganized. His tests are difficult and don't come from the class lecture at all. If you can avoid his class, then stay far away.
                
                   great prof, as with any college course,read the book, take notes for a good grade. easy going and well liked by many.
                
                   He is different. He has 3 exams and 1 apa paper. Expect to read the text and take you own notes in order to pass. His lectures are not clear and often when giving an example or definition says, "...or whatever" or "no one is listening anyways". Oddly I find him funny. Treat the class as learning on your own. But he is nice mannered
                
                   I took Dr. Coulton for Abnormal Psychology (spring 2013) and did not do well. The reasoning being if you do not read the book and take your own notes you will fail exams. He has 3 exams (60Q ea.)and 1 APA term paper. His lectures are not clear and he is very monotone. Stangely I found him funny. He says "or whatever alot while lecturing.
                
                   It is hard to stay awake during class. The professor seems to be subjective and have hard time explaining the information in his lectures. This makes the lectures very boring. If you have the chance of choosing another professor for this course I recommend you to go for it and not take this class with Coulton.
                
                   I am pretty sure this teacher is very knowledgeable unfortunately, teaching is not his forte.  Be ready to read your book and be absolutely sleepy during his lectures.  If you really want to enjoy the class and feel like you want to engage on the learning process, pick a different teacher.
                
                   I took her online course last semester. Discussions due every Friday but not necessary if you do well on the tests. Test are super easy IF you read!
                
                   Loved Dr. K! Just finished taking her and she is hilarious! She's so knowledgable and the class was so interesting. I enjoyed not having to read word per word to learn, but also getting her input and experience which makes it so much easier to learn. She gives reviews on all tests. I would definitely take her again!! Forensic psych
                
                   Course consisted of discussion board questions every Friday, and exams on due dates online. - you must read all chapters to understand the course. - great professor!
                
                   Dr. Kalmbach is such a knowledgeable woman! Time flew in her class, as everything that she teaches is very interesting. She's funny and makes you laugh. YOU MUST READ THE CHAPTERS, ITS NOT AN EASY COURSE. - But if you read the chapters take notes you will do great. Do not procrastinate. Exams come from the book and notes. Don't be late! LOVED HER!
                
                   Tough class, but very interesting! Tests are hard and there's no study guide :( make sure to read the chapters! overall a great professor! I learned a lot.
                
                   I LOVED HER! I quickly learned that it is not a simple breeze through class. Take good notes. READ the book. Yes I know many classes you can get by on not having a book but this is not the case for  this course. She is extremely helpful and knowledgeable and encourages class room discussion. I enjoyed her so much I am taking Forensic Psychology.
                
                   Dr. K is great professor.  tough but fair.  Tests are hard.Clear on what is expected.2 papers. Go to her office for help. Read chapters take note what she says in class, it will be on the test. This class not for slackers. Attendance mandatory. 2 essay questions on each test. final not comprehensive. overall good class. She likes class discussion.
                
                   Dr. K. is a really good professor. She is very interesting and funny and lectures are good. She expects you to read the chapters and know the information, gives quizzes and exams are difficult. The class is not easy but you will learn.
                
                   Took online. read the book. Test questions from book, but not made for anyone to get 100, even with saving all the questions and looking up the correct answers, are tricky. she will not reopen a test for you even when blackboard does random maintenance, she will give u a zero. not helpful at all. discussions not worth the time only 3% of grade
                
                   Prof. Kalmbach is not hard, attend class and take notes. Very helpful and clear in her teaching. Participate so she notices you. You can visit her office for any help. One paper is due and it's clear what she asks for, know the APA format! I had no textbook, STUDY THE REVIEW and extra readings. Tests mult. choice and short answers (all on review).
                
                   If you plan to take her class online be prepared to memorize a lot or take good notes lots and lots of reading.  Her test are difficult.  You will not have any time to look up any answers.
                
                   I took her once a week and this class is hard. It consist of A LOT OF READING!Test are hard and you have to memorize alot of the material because you dont which question she will ask for. This class you will learn alot but be prepared!
                
                   Very helpful & so funny & clever. She requires a term paper for this course (Forensic Psych). She offers lots of help so go to her office if you need it or use the library resources. Her tests are fair and she definitely emphasizes what will be on the test during the semester, close to the test, and provides a good test review.
                
                   LOVED HER!! forensic psych is her life & you can tell. she knows her stuff..i took the course during summer school so there wasn't a paper, but she did say regular semesters did have a paper. Read the handout & take good notes
                
                   Take good notes!If she repeats something, or goes as far as to tell you to write it down...you should, because it will be on the test. It was a very fun class...great professor.
                
                   Maintains interest, very funny professors, and keeps you on your toes! She's really interested in her subj matter and makes it interesting for others too! great prof
                
                   Awesome!! She tells it like it is. extremely interesting and stays on target. Funny and always willing to help you if you have questions. I would take any of her classes again.
                
                   While Dr. Meyers has a great sense of humor; unfortunately he gets off topic often. The content isn't easy to understand, it is very biological, and technical. MUST READ TEXTBOOK! Utilize free online course content as a test study guide. Grading is based on Four multiple choice unit tests with a short essay question, and a comprehensive final. 
                
                   I will never take him again! Read your text book and go online to look at questions for the tests don't bother going to class you'll be wasting your time on a teacher who will just ramble and put you down. He's disorganized, pp are 100+, tests are exactly from study guides online not from pps, no extra credit 4 tests your grade. DON'T TAKE HIM!!!!
                
                   He is very friendly and approachable. His class was easy and very interesting, but you definitely need to attend each class. His lectures are based on the book mostly, but he does put in some videos which are very helpful. The tests were easy if you prepared, but there are no other assignments.
                
                   I would never take another class with him again!!!! He a very little office hours so he cant help you. I went to him once before a test and he would not really help. In fact he told me not even to take the test because I would fail it right before the test. What professor would tell someone that.
                
                   He's great! I really enjoyed his class! He makes it really easy to study for his tests.
                
                   Most Horrible professor I have taken in a while.  I am an A student, but rcvd a D. Tests are horrible.  Comes to class unprepared posts the wrong ppts.  Does not have office hours. apathetic. Rambles in discussion does not correlate to test. Powerpts are 100+ on every chapter. His teaching is disjointed, has no clue how to teach. Do not take him!
                
                   Lectures all the time. Everyone is able to make at least a C. There's only 3 exams and he usually curves then by 10pts. I didn't have the book/paid attention and I made a B. Part of the exam is a short essay, but he gives you the questions beforehand. He's not a bad professor; I just wouldn't take him again.
                
                   Super easy, 3 tests and half of the test he tells you to go on the books website for practice tests..he uses the questions from there. the other half of the test is from the textbook and he has an essay question, he tells you what the question is before the test. He is very helpful and he curves exams.
                
                   Super easy! at the beginning he was pretty stern about attendance, then later he just let it slide, lol. he grades off 3 tests. And half the questions can be found on the textbooks website. Plus he know's his material and at times he was funny. I would take him again.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Rock is old school, funny and straight forward. I think he's a great teacher who challenges you. This course is Substance Abuse and it was very good. He know the material really well. You have 2 short papers, but he grades hard but allows rough drafts that he will review and give great feed back. Test 60 -70 questoins and its important read
                
                   I'm a hostage....I have to take this class for my degree and this is the only teacher who teaches it.....I don't understand why the University does this!!!!!  They force you to take a class only offered by one teacher and they are horrible :(  He's very mono-toned.  He's very old school.
                
                   Honestly, he's pretty mean. Legitimately talks down to students. I thought I was imagining things at first, but after watching students become visibly upset over things he would say, I know I wasn't just being overly sensitive. He grades very harshly. I know we're all adults here but sheesh, I've never left a class feeling more insulted before.
                
                   One of the worst classes.  Got frustrated when asked for clearer instruction, everyone in my class failed.  I dropped because there was no way the way he taught to pass.
                
                   Dr. Rock is funny but old school. You must read the book and study his powerpoints in order to do well on exams. He has 4 exams 1 apa paper. He grades paper hard so be prepared. Lectures funny but doesnt always stay on topic. Overly good guy and expects you to work hard.
                
                   He was the worst doesn't teach statistic well. Doesn't know how to explain the process and doesn't do the problems to help you know how to do it yourself.. Test don't have what he shows you. Test were open book, but the average in the class was 50.  What is on book is hard to find on test or not even their.
                
                   Mr Rock is a funny professor! except that he talks low & i can't hear him very well. His test are really hard & he doesn't give out a study guide which makes the test harder because u don't know what he's going to put on the test or what to study for the test! i got a D in his class because of the tests :/ so good luck figuring it out!
                
                   Interesting, entertaining, tough! Work hard and do well!
                
                   Dr Rock is a very good instructor to take Stats with. He teaches lots of short cut formulas and you will even learn advanced techniques like Factor Analysis. by using his practice problem workbook combined with his slides, I was able to get good grades on most of my tests. I ended with a C because I totally tanked on some tests (my fault)
                
                   A great class and a great instructor.  Cognitive Psych is the best of all worlds- physiological, behavioral, etc.  Dr. Rock is very passionate about the subject.  He posts all of his PP presentations, use them AND the book to REALLY study and you will do well.
                
                   He amuses himself with the level of difficulty in wording and overemphansizes the critical thinking aspect on his tests. There is a better way to test students knowlege. Not funny when students grades are at stake.
                
                   ATTENDENCE IN BGE JUST READ AND DO EXERCISE ONLINE FROM BOOK WEBSITE
                
                   Dr. Rock is a great professor. He knows what he is talking about. Some say he is hard...well we are in college folks. Come to class, pay attention and read and you will do well.
                
                   I took him for Stats. Try to avoid taking him at all costs because at the end of the semester you'll regret it. His tests are extremely hard. The subject matter is hard enough but he makes the wording on the tests even harder to throw you off. Most A students end up with a C at the end of his class don't believe me you'll find out!
                
                   Loved his class, funny guy and really patient. He will always get you your grades quickly. Don't take him for statistics though.
                
                   He is a great man and knows his material.  He is willing to help you to understand the material.  One main problem is that his tests are hard.  He asks questions that in no way seem to relate to the info given, however if you read and study his powerpoints you should do fine.Another hint is to study with a group and take notes in class,take notes.
                
                   He is a decent professor. Pay attention to his lectures and review his Powerpoints. READ, READ the chapters! He  wants you to know the concepts, and how to apply them. I would not recommend taking him for Statistics.
                
                   Be ready to read. His test suck the wording is a bit off it seem like some of the qestions and answers sound the same. But overall good guy knows his stuff.
                
                   um... he's an ok teacher.. sometimes boring but i think it's cuz he's an older guy.. so his tone is what makes it boring... Just study the slides and you should be ok. Alot of the students are prob making like c's !
                
                   Professon boring. This is a senior level class yet I have the feel as if I was in a freshman &quot;TA&quot; session. I did not learn a thing and It takes him at least 10 minutes to get that powerpoint to work.
                
                   Terrific professor!
                
                   VERY GOOD TEACHER, VERY KNOWLEDGEABLE. PPTS AND VIDES HELPS TO UNDERSTAND THE CONTENT. HIGHLY RECOMMEND
                
                   Great professor! Totally recommended, you are going to learn more than you expect, with out stress.
                
                   This teacher was awesome! you really understand the material and what you are learning. he's a good professor and makes the class fun. tests are good
                
                   Professor Viera was great. I would recommend her to other students. She is very intelligent. Also, she can be sarcastic if in a classroom full of adults acting like children. She is very respectful of others as long as she is respected.
                
                   Interesting lectures, good reviews.  Give respect & you'll get respect.  No problems with this instructor I would definately take again.
                
                   She needs to be more consistent and she is not great at her tact and her sarcastic attitude can be disappointing for a teacher of her experience.  I would take again when she get's off her high horse!! She's not the best teacher but she is very knowledgeable.
                
                   She would be a good professor if she want back to school and got her Ph.d. she played favorites in the class but I wsa one of her favorites which is not fair. I didn't like her kid attitude and she needs to grow up and be an adult and a professional.
                
                   Good prof for sure. I took her for multiple classes at NE Lakeview and at A&M. She gives great reviews that deviate very little from the exams.  She's a good public speaker and her lectures will retain your attention.  Im a slacker and avid procrastinator and i still made A's in all of her classes.
                
                   Great professor, well spoken, professional and fair. Would take her again.
                
                   She was alright..not consistant...not clear on what she wanted. I had to study my butt off to get an A. LOTS of reading. I never had problems with her but most people found her unclear and did not like the class.
                
                   she should be an editor. APA nut for sure, you can have a totally awesome paper, but if your margins are 1/2 an inch off... 15% of your grade gone... oh you didn't correctly cite your source, that's MLA, not APA, another 15% off... oh..you put a space between your paragraphs...15%...tsk,tsk... I'm no english teacher but that looks like a run on,40
                
                   she was very rude to other students. She was never rude to me but she plays favorites and i really didn't like that. She needs to go back to school to get her Ph.d
                
                   This teacher is very good and he does give everyone a chance to pass him class. I have taken him 2 different (3301 & 3320) Pysch classes with him and he is great!!!
                
                   Class was interesting however tests were extrememly difficult, even with reading the material. Finally relented and changed the test format for the final. Did offer extra-credit. Definitely need to purchase book and read! Oh and tests were the only grades, no other assignments.
                
                   If you are sick with a doctor's note he will not accept any assignments. we are human and it's better not to expose the whole class with illness.
                
                   I took him for Psy 101 and Criminal Behavior. He has a passion for teaching, presents the material in an interesting manner, is very open minded, polite and funny. His tests aren't easy but if you use the study guide he provides and pay attention, you will get a good grade. (turn in all of your work on time & show up!)
                
                   Love him! Great teacher, wish he taught more at this school.
                
                   Good professor. He is always willing to help students. His lectures are clear and gives accurate study guides for the test. He has a good sense of humor and involves the class in discussions. I really enjoyed this class.
                
                   Good class with plenty of movies and discussions. Loved class because it was easy!
                
                   Great teacher.  Motivating and humorous.  He has a passion for teaching.  I would like to take another class with him.  All around great person.
                
                   Professor Brown (Doctor Brown) She is an awesome educator. She makes the class topic interesting and relatable. You will leave the class learning something new, and you will want to take every class she teaches.
                
                   Professor Brown made this class fun and allowed the freedom of writing about what interests you! She's very positive, easy to get a hold of, and knowledgeable about her field! I would recommend her teaching any class because she would no doubt make it interesting. 
                
                   She is truly the best at TAMUCT!!!  Most online courses teachers do they bare minimum, and do not engage with the students. She makes online classes interesting and you want to learn. I highly recommend her
                
                   Best teacher at TAMUCT!
                
                   BEST TEACHER!!!! I would take her again and again.  You learn so much in her class.
                
                   Great professor! Hands down one of my favorite at TAMUCT. She really understands what students needs in order to get the most out of course regarding learning. Pretty easy yet you learn so much!!
                
                   I just signed up for her class because a friend took her last semester. She is awesome! Only had two classes so far and I like them. She really does like teaching. I hope she teaches another class that I need. But come to class, like the other rating, her quizzes are based off her powerpoint slide. 
                
                   Definitely take her if you can! You can tell she likes teaching because she is always so excited. But make sure you go to class, her quizzes are based off her lecture and powerpoints. I would take any of her classes again!
                
                   very nice person, helpful but seems upperty!!!!
                
                   PROF Bohannan, is a very helpful professor.She grades really hard on all of the Reaction Papers. You will have a total of 3 Papers to write, two 4page papers and one 10-12pg paper, but all of the test are open book.
                
                   Amazing instructor! More importantly, he organized the course into sections- breaking down each part of a paper that was required: abstract, intro, body, and conclusion.  Each day we covered a section and learned  of its importance to the paper and how to properly articulate our ideas concerning the key points in each section. He's also fun !!!
                
                   Great teacher, helped me with all of my problems. Shes young and makes the class fun. Shes also easy on the eyes!
                
                   This course was required for my degree. She was a little different.
                
                   Fun Teacher
                
                   Smart, but comes off as unprofessional.  Seems to unfairly favor students who buddy up to her.  Prone to rambling about herself.
                
                   Shes fun, and she is not hard at all. She gives a review identical to the 2 exams- you just have to memorize the short essay answers to like 30 questions. I had a 99 average in her Cognitive Process class, no joke. She is really young and cool.
                
                   She tries to be buddy buddy with her students. She is too immature to teach and I didn't learn ANYTHING. You either like her and get on her good side or not like her at all. I wish I would have taken the class by a different prof and actually learned something!
                
                   Difficult, but fair. Dr Fiala keeps the student responsible for his/her success.
                
                   Dr. Fiala wants his students to pass and will go the extra mile with you, as long as you are doing your part. He allows you to work together on homework. His quizes are easy because he makes them off of the companion quizes.  If you do your homework and come to class, you will have no problem getting a passing grade.
                
                   I really the assignments in the class.  Many of them had us assume the role of the psychologist and directly applying the theories and concepts we learned in the class.  He was a little behind in our class though - slow grading and last minute posting of rubrics.
                
                   Great professor, makes the subject matter fun and is very willing to clarify anything you don't understand.
                
                   Awesome teacher!
                
                   Extremely informative; up to date; passionate about teaching and very caring about his students and their performance.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He means well, he just expects students to understand what he assigns. 
                
                   This professor was seriously the worst one I've had ever. He had us study things that were not on the tests and never lectured about the topic. I honestly am not even sure if he is knowledgeable about the subject in the first place. I would avoid this professor at all costs, I don't even know how he's still teaching here. 
                
                   All tests are open book as well as its hard to totally fail this class. Homework and tests are on the same level gradewise so if you fail a test don't worry it won't totally kill your grade for the class. Overall, this professor is better for a student that is self-starting and can learn unassisted. But if you need help you will get it!
                
                   Great professor. Will make you work but helps you grow. Gives great feedback. Interesting class.
                
                   I have not even had a class with him yet, but getting he was SUPER helpful in helping me get an override. I also had him as a &quot;guest&quot; in another PSY class I was taken, and he seemed to be very knowledgeable.
                
                   He explains everything in detail.
                
                   I have taking him for a lot of psy classes and love his classes.
                
                   Great Teacher
                
                   You will actually work in his class, but it's the type of work that makes you learn as opposed to busy work.  He's funny, helpful, and he really knows his subjects.
                
                   Dr. Kirk requires a lot but if you listen and do the work the class is easy. He is very understanding and has a great teaching style. I have taken several classes with him and highly recommend his classes.
                
                   He is the most wonderful prof in the world. He is SO patient and FUN! Not only will you learn - you WANT to come to class!
                
                   Prof. Kelly is the best teacher I have ever had. She doesn't take the material (educational psych) too seriously and is very clear and fair. The class has a good bit of work but it is not too difficult. Tests are open notes are not overly hard. I learned a lot and highly recommend Prof. Kelly.
                
                   Prof. Kelly is the best teacher I have ever had. She doesn't take the material (educational psych) too seriously and is very clear and fair. The class has a good bit of work but it is not too difficult. Tests are open notes are not overly hard. I learned a lot and highly recommend Prof. Kelly.
                
                   Nightmare!!!  This instructor only has a masters degree trying to teach at a University. She is in private practice and is more devoted to counseling than educating. Not to mention she doesn't have time for "office hours" because she works full time. And outright lies. If she starts a sentence with "I promise", take it with a shovel of salt.
                
                   She is so scatter-brained. She has not read the text book herself, and any papers turned after spring will not be returned with grades until the day OF finals. Take any other teacher, even if they have a very low rating! Definitely not ready to be a professor at a college or university!!!
                
                   Great guy from Boston. Enjoyed his class. Tests are hard but he curves so ppl do well. Fun class. I wish I could take him for ALL my psych classes. Very understanding if you need to miss class or turn in late work.
                
                   Dr. Rynearson's class wasn't easy but she did a great job thoroughly explaining the information. Her tests were straight forward and you always new what to expect.
                
                   She is very fair. The amount is decent; it seems like a lot compared to other professors. She grades promptly & gives feedback. Learning to write Results in APA is very important & learning this in HER class helped me so much. Her workload is no diff than the other prof teaching this class but she CORRECTS your work from the beginning.
                
                   This instructor is one I took for an online course for Statistics for Behavioral Sciences.  This is already a difficult subject for most, but the work load for this course was REDICULOUS. Easily 8-10 assignments every 10 days. She rather you get tutoring than ask her for help. I would not take unless you have a LOT of free time to devote to class.
                
                   Great discussions in class.  Learned a lot about my strengths and was encouraged to continue researching.
                
                   This course was basically a waste of my time with Vivona. I basically paid for a glorified story time, which is annoying. I expect to take something from the classes that I spend so much money to take, unless you read the book on your own you wont actually learn anything from this class. If you need an easy A and like people take this class.
                
                   Blended class. The exams were essay but due online. She is very fair with her grading.
                
                   Awesome Professor! Awesome Class... Highly recommend her. I take any class she offers. She keeps class interesting and knows her stuff!
                
                   She is a great teacher. Any class she teaches that I am able to take, I take with her.
                
                   Awesome teacher. Very helpful. Test are essay format but open book. Will take again!
                
                   Very good teacher. Test are essay format but open book. She is willing to help if students don't understand clearly. Would take more classes from her anytime.
                
                   She was a great teacher. Her test were fairly easy and her assignments the same.
                
                   Dr. Murphy is hands down one of the best professors I have ever taken. I have had four classes with Dr. Murphy, three of which were at the undergraduate level. His knowledge about the brain surpasses anything you could imagine. Classes typically consist of lectures, in class work and student presentations.
                
                   Excellent Prof. he is extremely knowledgeable (knows more about the brain than you will ever need to know!!!) Classes are difficult and require work but I have had him for multiple classes and have always achieved an "A".
                
                   Dr. Murphy is an EXCELLENT professor. One of the best at TAMUCT. Punctual, helpful, and interested in student success. Stands above his counterparts.
                
                   Professor Murphy is awesome, he's good at explaining things, gives us short answer tests with the questions ahead of time. He can be kind of monotone but I couldn't ask for a better professor.
                
                   I have taken several classes with Dr. Murphy. Some of his classes can be considered easy but others hard. He is well educated and this can cause some confusion in the more difficult classes because his understanding surpasses the average persons. However, if you ask him to explain what he is trying to say he well.
                
                   If you can help it, do not take this professor. He is a nice man who tries to help you, but his tests are extremely hard and he spends 30 minutes going over one slide in class that is not very important. The quizzes every class and the lectures are easy, but he makes the tests extremely hard on purpose. Even though he is nice, avoid his class.
                
                   If you are taking PSYC 107, I would recommend Dr. Barnhardt. His class basically consist clicker questions, 4 test (not cumulative),  one easy project. This sounds bad but all the other teachers give the same thing. What you put in is what the grade you will get. He cares about his students and will try his best to help if you need it. 
                
                   READ READ READ. He posts all of his lecture notes online but you do have to come to class because there are daily clicker questions that count as extra credit. Tests are VERY tough but you have a possible extra 15 points for every test. I struggled in his class and would not take him again. This year he started not doing reviews:/
                
                   He's alright but to pass this class you must read the book. 
                
                   He's not a hard professor but not an easy one either. If you read and do the review questions you will do fine.
                
                   I don't understand why Dr. Barnhardt's rating is so low. I loved his class; it's what made me want to become a Psych major! I recommend this professor very highly. He's funny and his tests aren't hard at all.
                
                   I really enjoyed this class. He gives reviews and if you do them and know them fairly well, you should be able to get an A or B on the tests. He always has clicker questions so go to class but you can occasionally miss class if you need to. Altogether, it was an interesting class and not hard. I recommend this professor.
                
                   He is a very nice professor, knows his stuff, very approachable and willing to help if you have questions. That said, this is not an easy class in the least. His exams are incredibly hard. Know every single concept in the review questions back to front, read the book, and go to class because there are daily clicker quizzes.
                
                   Barnhardt is such a nice person, and seems to really enjoy his job. He has a tendency to ramble and talk about the same topic all class long but he means well. There are iclicker quizzes everyday so go to class. Also do the extra credit. I found the class extremely easy, and also very interesting and informative. The tests are very fair, just read.
                
                   He is one one of the best Professor to teach Intro to Psychology. His test can be difficult but he gives Power points about the questions that will be on test.
                
                   Very good professor. The textbook really helped, but his tests were really hard. You almost HAD to attend class because he would do daily quizzes on the i-clicker. His lectures had somewhat to do with the subject we were on, but they were really interesting.
                
                   Great class. He is very random in his lectures but EVERY test question is STRAIGHT from the reviews so just study those well and you'll be fine!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   So, this guy tells stories of he and his wife teaching their then 2-year-old daughter about why daddy can pee standing up. A TODDLER! He told more stories about experiments with his kids. This guy really creeped me out.
                
                   Adored the class and Dr. Barnhardt! The test material comes straight from the reviews, very helpful!!
                
                   I could never tell what to stufy for the test.  It was hard to follow along in class because he was so random.
                
                   Good teacher if you're interested in psychology at all
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Class is once a week, you show up for the quiz/test (quiz every week). Lectures are online and he does expect you to read the book. There's also online quizzes you need to take but they're due at the end of the semester. Crazy easy class. Just read the book, watch the lectures and do the online quizzes and you'll get an A.
                
                   EASY A. You go to class once a week for an average of 30 minutes and take a quiz most weeks. Read through the assigned chapters once and you'll be golden for the quizzes and tests no problem. Take him if you want to learn a little and get an easy easy A.
                
                   Jay, what can I say, CLASSES ARE ONCE A WEEK AND LAST 30 MIN MAX.    EASY, KINDA STUDY AND YOULL GET AN A  YOU ONLY GO TO CLASS TO TAKE THE QUIZ and then you can leave
                
                   seriously the definition of a blow off class. You have to show up to class because you will have a quiz every week but no worries it will be open book, can use your partner, etc. You also have to do online quizzes but google got ya. Exams you actually have to study the questions from the quizzes but other than that, you are set for an easy A.
                
                   He doesn't seem to want to teach. We only had class one day a week and were supposed to have a quiz each time we came in but about three weeks in a row he did not upload the information we needed for the quiz and would make us come in for 5 minuets and then release class. Easy A if you make sure you get 100's on all the online quizzes or and tests.
                
                   Take him if you can! He can be sarcastic and he kinda gave up at the end of semester but its a easy class. Quiz question often show up on tests and in class quizzes are open note, open book, and partner. Not much studying required.
                
                   I took a hybrid class with him. Everything was online and when we came to class it was to take a quiz/test and then we were free to go. The questions on the quizzes he posted online were often seen again on the tests so make note of that. Sometimes he does take a little to post things on ecampus but he emails you frequently and keeps you updated.
                
                   I highly recommend taking him for PSYC 107 hybrid. I am a business major and had him on Tuesday's but the only times I ever had to stay more than 30 minutes were on test days. All you have to do is actually read the assigned pages and take the practice quizzes to study for tests, they are almost word for word and quizzes are open book/notes.
                
                   Schumacher is a very laid back teacher and appears to be on your side when it comes to tests and quizzes. If you read the specific chapters before each test you will do just fine. A lot of the questions on the tests come from the open book quizzes. I highly recommend taking him and I personally would take him again. 
                
                   Schumacher doesn't seem to care about the students at all. However, this is class was ridiculously easy. It's half online and the in class part is an open book quiz every week. The tests come mainly from the online homework. The homework is all reading quizzes, but you can take them an unlimited number of times.
                
                   Most of the class is online. He is pretty laid back and let us have open note and open partner quizzes. His tests are straightforward. My best professor of the semester.
                
                   This was part online and part in class once a week. In class you took quizzes or tests. All of my quizzes were open note and the test questions came from them and the online homework. You don't have to read the novels for the test. VERY laid back and overall a solid credit I would take again!
                
                   I had him once a week. Not because I skipped but because he only held class once a week. The one day I was in class, it's either a test, quiz or a 5 minute lecture on what to expect next week.
                
                   This teacher is frustrating. He tried to avoid answering questions and is hard to get ahold of. His class isn't difficult, but if you want to learn something I wouldn't suggest you take his class. He gives quizzes every class so you have to go.
                
                   Gives clear instructions as to what he expects. Do as he says, follow the syllabus, and you'll get an A. Don't read the books, just take them to the tests for open book tests. All quizzes are online and open note. All test questions come from quizzes. Super easy and laid back class. TAKE HIM! 
                
                   You teach everything to yourself. The class is partialy online so that is how it is justified. DO NOT miss class. He never gave a single lecture in my class because every single class there was either a test or a quiz.  It is still an easy A! How much you learn strictly depends on the effort you put in! Easy easy gpr booster!
                
                   Hello, this is your GPA calling.  If you see that Dr. Schumacher is teaching a class you need to take, make sure that you sign up for it. 
                
                   Lectures are boring and it's okay if you don't pay attention. He will give quizzes at the end of class sometimes, but they are open note, open book, open person so don't stress out about it. Test questions come from the material out of the book so if you read the chapters, you'll get an A. 
                
                   Prof Schumacher is cool and really funny! his class is really easy as long as you just keep up. Studyblue has all his tests and homework posted to study for the tests. But do not expect much extra help from him. He dosnt seem to really care about individual students and is never in his office during office hours.
                
                   This guy is really nice. funny. lazy professor as well, but kudos to him for grading exams faster than any other prof. EASY EASY A... I learned a lot too. tons of hw and quizzes but guess what... that is the exam. exactly whats on the hw and quizzes... in that order. DONT READ THE 3 BOOKS HE TELLS YOU TO READ. just take them to the exam. trust me.
                
                   Dr. Galiana is an amazing professor. One of the best that I've ever had. She is super intelligent and knows what she is talking about! You will not want to skip a lecture, simply of how interesting they are. She genuinely  wants you to do well and is super helpful. I will warn you though, if you want to be on her bad side; use your phone in class. 
                
                   Dr Galiana calls her students by their first name, takes seriously their opinions and encourages discussions in class. Her lectures are very structured with quantitative data, clear definitions and fascinating examples. She also has an very sharp sense of humor :) :) Difficult not to love her class :) 
                
                   I love this class! Dr Galiana's an amazing professor who wants her students to succeed. Lectures are incredible and  exams are very interesting. She's a little strict about behavior in class (if you wanna make her angry use your cell:)) but she's is a fantastic prof . I love her clinical examples and her sense of humor.  
                
                   Amazing class taught by an incredible professor!  I learned more in this class that in all my other classes of the semester. The prof is very helpful, her clinical stories very interesting and gives very good examples. I worked hard because exams were super challenging but I got an A! 
                
                   I took Abnormal Psyc Fall 2013 and I have missed this class since then. Seriously this was the best psychology class of my life. Dr Galiana is an incredible person who enjoys lecturing. I loved the amazing international experience of the prof and by first time in college I enjoyed the exams. I loved writing the case studies! 
                
                   Great professor! Tests are tough but very fun. I loved the case studies. Lectures are amazing with lots of information about clinical practice in Asia, Africa, Europe. I love the professor's energy and enthousiasm. She is very knowledgeable and also very helpful. Feedback after take home exams is really good! I miss this class 
                
                   Amazing professor! She loves her field and would make you love it! Lectures are well-thought, very informative and well organized! From far my favorite class 
                
                   Her  lectures and her clinical expertise outstanding. She has an international experience and gives very clear cultural examples about culture bound syndromes. She speaks different Asian languages, is also an anthropologist and has a multidisciplinary approach!  l'm in love with this class and with the professor . I'am learning a lot in this class
                
                   This was an excellent class! Dr Galiana's class is challenging but it's worth the work you put on it. I love her interactive teaching style and the cultural examples  about Japan, India, Mali.  I also enjoyed the take home exams with case studes.  Dr Galiana is an outstanding psychologist and teacher. She grades fairly and feedback is excellent 
                
                   I'm very impressed by the quality of Dr Galiana's lectures. Discussions in class are very encouraged which is nice.  I also like the way she's with students, respectful and always willing to help. Sometimes she seems kind of formal and a little too serious but she's really nice when you need anything. I would take her again if I can
                
                   I needed to take this class as I'am a biomed student. I had heard Dr Galiana was an exceptional teacher and she really is!  Only attended three lectures but she's really something else! I love her definitions, examples and sense of humor. She has an international clinical experience her cultural examples are really clear and informative. 
                
                   This class was my absolutely favorite. The professor is really knowledgeable. She interacts a lot  with students during lectures. I was really surprised to be so willing to talk in class in front of 54 people! Dr Galiana is an incredibly inspiring professor, the perfect image of what I would like to be in 15 years! A real role model to me 
                
                   I took her gender Issues in psychology class and I loved it. She has a unusualstyle, is very knowledgeable and gives amazing examples. I kept talking about this class the whoe semester! The content of the class and the discussions were fascinating but exams are quite tought. She makes her students work for their grade but I really learned a lot
                
                   The most amazing class I ever took! I also loved the professor's teaching style with lots of discussions, videos, etc. You can make a decent grade but you will work for it. This is probably the most challenging psychology class I ever took but I really loved it. The professor is very strict about rules but also extremely kind and understanding
                
                   This was a challenging class! You really have to work for your grade but I will admit I really enjoyed it!  I usually hate when teachers lecture for the whole hour, but she can make things interesting. Her lectures were not boring at all. I will admit I took 3-4 hours completing an exam since they do have to have references. Oh and NO CELL PHONES!!
                
                   I took her three times and always did great.  She is very fair, easy to talk to and explains clearly what she expects. Tests are interesting but also challenging because they require academic readings and and critical thinking. In my experience if you listen to her expectations, read, come to class and take her feedback you'll do great. 
                
                   I loved this professor and this class but taking her has pros and cons   Pros: smart,energetic teacher,experienced and overspecialized. respectful, classy,warm and helpful. gives excellent feedback    Cons: interesting exams but time consuming and requiring academic references. tough grader and strict about rules  Still my favorite professor
                
                   Dr. Galiana was a great professor. She's a tough grader and expects you to know what she wants when doing her essay type exams. She is although very helpful with her comments and she is always willing to answer your questions whether it be in person or via email. Overall I do wished I received a better grade, but it was a great experience.
                
                   a challenging professor who makes you feel smart and original. discussions in class are very interesting even if there are always students trying to talk about personal and irrelevant stuff. I admire this prof because she knows how to handle difficult students with kindness and patience. she is tough about rules but very kind when you ask for help.
                
                   will take you to an unbelievable level of knowledge. lectures are amazing with plenty of interaction. values a big deal student's opinions and discusses them very intelligently. Dr G. is a subtle and humanistic professor. she can make a difference in your life but this won't be without some pain. be prepared to come to class, to read, to write...
                
                   I'm torn about this class. I guess if you want an easy A and don't want to learn much in an online class, take him. Otherwise, don't. He was basically MIA all semester and the only job he had was to open quizzes and even that didn't happen on time. I've heard he's good for on-campus classes but as far as online classes goes he's nothing special. 
                
                   This class was strange. No interaction from the professor at all. You just do the assignments. Everything is due all at once, only one time per month (which isnt a bad thing, just different). Pretty easy class, organized, everything is laid out. Not confusing. 
                
                   He is such an awesome teacher who is very knowledgeable in his field.  He states that attendance is manadorty but at the end of the semester he never counts it. Classes are pretty easy but thats because he gets straight to the point because he actually wants you to learn. 
                
                   Hes awesome!
                
                   I would recommend everyone take him for grad. level behavioral stats. He was amazing about explaining things you'd never think you'd understand. It also helps that he doesnt like to drag on his lectures. I took him  mon/wed 5:30pm-7pm and we were usually done by 6:30 at the latest. He is super funny and doesnt over load you with work.
                
                   Everyone complains about his online classes. But in class Darth Yeager is a blast. His sense of humor and t-shirts brighten my day. He explains everything, all tests are open book, online, not proctored. Easy A and a wealth of useful information.
                
                   Didn't care @ class / students . Didn't bother to return emails. Waste of space.
                
                   Only take this online class if you don't want to learn anything.  You will read the text book and take three open-book multiple choice/fill in the blank tests.  You are COMPLETELY on your own!  You will receive no feedback, encouragement or contact whatsoever from Dr Yeager.
                
                   Dr. Yeager makes class fun. He has lots of good stories that make the class that much easier to follow. He takes what the text book has to say and brings to life in his lectures.
                
                   Fabulous and very intelligent professor. He gives his lecture, seemingly straight from the book but its all from notes, and will give you extra information that will probably be on the test (he will let you know). There is no reason anyone should get away with less than an A in his classes.
                
                   The weekly discussions are a bit long but aren't due until Sunday each week. You don't get any feedback and you most likely will not get a response from him if questions are asked and some students had issues with this. Most of his criteria is clear. The midterm and final are timed but he allows students to share their chapter ?s with each other 
                
                   I took him class spring 2014 on thurs from 6pm to 9pm. We only had a grant proposal and a final to write but they were pretty intense. He is very strict with attendance. Dr. Wortham is a very nice man just really really unorganized. Doesnt email or answer phone and you never know what your grade is in the class til it post to your transcript.
                
                   He was extremely helpful and interesting teacher! Love his class took it summer 2013. We did not use the text books that much but he did provide us with lots of knowledge. I would recommend EVERYONE to take his classes!
                
                   One of my first classes in the Master's program. He made this intro class interesting and gave a good idea of what we were getting ourselves into. Great teacher who actually cares about his students.
                
                   This was an all day Saturday class which lasted 8 weeks. We met 3 days. His emphases was on papers, we had about 5 but they are pretty well spaced and not hard to do. He doesn't give any tests in this class which is a big plus IMO :o) He made this class interesting to me!
                
                   Dr. Strutton is very clear on what she expects from students. She is a tough teacher but no impossible. She gives very rapid feedback. 
                
                   Wonderful professor. Very interesting class. She truly cares about her students. I wish I could take more of her classes.
                
                   There are two Professor Smiths. I'm referring to Stephanie L. Smith.  She's a great educator. She's tough and you have to work for your grade but she's ALWAYS willing to help you achieve success. People call her rude, I attribute it to her quirky sense of humor. She's very intelligent so I think she's misunderstood by you common folk  ;-)
                
                   Terrible professor. Always gets off topic. She's strange and can be rude a lot. Not learning much. Had to teach myself how to write a paper. Would not take again!!!
                
                   The instructor was  very clear and responses to questions she always there to help , It was a very interesting class and will definitely refer my friends to take the class i learnt a lot.
                
                   This class was pointless. I didn't learn anything and I had to force myself out of bed just to show up. There was no structure to the class and her grading process is questionable. If I didn't already know how to write I would be even more mad that this class did nothing to prepare me for my future classes. If you have another option, use it. 
                
                   Blended class with online exams. She was very clear with her expectations.
                
                   Teacher did not provide full instructions to some parts of assignment completion. Teacher also took a while to get in touch with most of the time. Also even posted that the week of a major assignment due she would be out of town and would be reachable "dependent on the internet connection." 
                
                   If you want an A in this class you will work for it. However, do what she says to do and you will get an A. If you do the bare minimum you will make a grade that matches. She is extremely helpful, responds quickly to questions, and wants to see you succeed. Surprisingly, I learned more in her class about APA style than my writing class. 
                
                   Course was extremely helpful and challenging. Instructor was not flexible in adjusting required exam content to allow for multiple choice questions and essay responses in a given period of time.
                
                   I took her for statistics and I received an A, but I worked for it. If you do your work & turn everything in on time, then you will pass. She has videos for each section that people were too lazy to watch, but they were very helpful. I kept my work and most of it helped me thru Research Methods. I HIGHLY recommend her.
                
                   She is a great professor. I got an A and I deserved it! I'd recommend her if you want to learn something. She is prompt with feedback. Workload is a bit more compared to other professors at TAMUCT. Very fair. She is the one I learned the most from. If you put in the effort, it'll be worth it.
                
                   Dr Schwegler is awesome. Not only is she a hottie..but she is a good teacher who cares about student's learning!
                
                   excessive amounts of work.  You will get one minute per question on your tests. You can do well on all other work if you like to write a lot, but the tests will probably mess up your final grade.
                
                   This was a wonderful class, Professor Legree-Roberts is enthusiastic and charismatic.  You can tell she really enjoys teaching and is there for the students.  She will go over exactly what will be on the tests.  I would take her again if possible!  And, don't buy the book! She provides a guide. Learned a lot!
                
                   Very cool prof. She was funny, interesting and knowledgeable. I learned more in this class than other class I have ever taken. I wish she was teaching Sociology so that I could take her again. I actually learned from her.
                
                   I took Technical Writing and Document Design. This was a very easy course. The directions are not very well explained and there is a utter lack of anything close to an example. Turn your work in early for her check it and to resubmit. You are able to resubmit it later for corrections. Good class/Good Professor.
                
                   Professor Bunke (Doctor Bunke) is an awesome educator. you will have a lot of writing in the class, but she gives you enough time to do it. I recommend you take the  campus class if you can, you get more out of it than online. open book exams and they are not timed so you make A's on them.
                
                   amazing professor, her class are very fun and as long as you take time to do your work and you show up to class you will pass. She is very helpful and a fair grader. I had to do a presentation and paper for this class. Her test are kind of difficult but as long as you read and pay attention you will be fine. 
                
                   I like Professor Bunke as a person, but not as a professor. The class was out of control and unorganized. There was a lot of discussion and lecture; however, most of the time it was off topic. I think if she put her foot down and took more control of her class it would have been better, but she didn't and I basically taught myself the material. 
                
                   I took the 8 week class and it was great, her lessons are very interesting and your participation matters. The test are not timed and you can take it twice if you don't like your grade. There is only one paper and one presentation, but it was really easy. She grades very fair, half of the class is online so discussions is a must. Overall excellent 
                
                   Took the 8 week Abnormal Psyc online and it wasn't difficult. She lets you retake any exams at the end of the semester if you need to improve your grade. The weekly discussions are direct and not difficult. It was a good class. The exams are not timed.
                
                   EXCELLENT PROFESSOR! I took this class on Ft. Hood (8 weeks). I've finally met an EDUCATOR, someone who talks to you and not at you. Class attendance is a must. I love her open door policy. She's easy to talk to and willing to work with you if you need help.
                
                   She was very understanding when I had missed some assignments for personal reasons and let me still complete them. I highly recommend her.
                
                   Ms Bunke is AWESOME! This was the third class I have taken with her and i would take another in a heart beat!!!!! Not super clear in class but will gladly explain as many times as needed upon request. Super fun easy going. Most classes meet once a week and most of her test are TAKE HOME!!!!!!!!
                
                   Miss Bunke is an awesome person but I really don't think she wanted to teach I/O psych. We end up having more class discussions about motor cycles, and sexual offenders than actual I/O stuff. Tests are easy because they are open book, and we as the class wrote questions for her to choose from.
                
                   Professor Bunke is the epitome of professionalism when it comes to Psychology and her students.  Her amount of knowledge on the subject surpasses that of most professors at TAMUCT.  If she ever teaches a class that I haven't already taken, you can bet that I'll be in it.
                
                   I took her for abnormal psychology on ft.hood 8 week class. She is extremely helpful and nice. You must attend class though and show an effort. Take home tests, a few homework assignments but easy enough to be done in a day. also one presentation but it's really easy and her grading is fair. Definitely recommend her. great professor
                
                   Abnormal Psych.-- (8-week course)Great class! All take home exams; One 5-10 min presentation; Attendance is important. Few threaded discussions online. Great professor.
                
                   Took her for Personality online. Clear and gives you plenty of time to complete the assignments. Just pay attention to the calendar, you will have weekly Discussions, Quizzes, Assignments. Tests are not weekly, I liked the online textbook. It's easy, but busy work. If you have other classes and work, just make sure to set reminders for everything.
                
                   Her powerpoints are great! You can listen to her, play it again if you didn't catch it the first time, all while reading along. It helps you grasp the subject better. Tests are not too hard, but you do need to study AND read the book if you want an A.
                
                   Easy class, took online personality, it was an easy A. Her tests are straight from the book. She had tests, discussions, and midterm and final. If you need to take this class taker her!
                
                   Funny and lenient. If he gives out a review it is word for word the exam. His tests are a little hard, but it's open book/notes. A lot of your grade comes from the discussion board, once every week or so
                
                   Fun Lectures but you need the book. The tests are based out of the book not lecture.
                
                   cool professor! take him!
                
                   Mr Martinez is an awesome instructor, and funny as well, he knows his field, and he knows it well , he has many stories that  keep you intrigued , Hes tough on grading papers, such as punctuations and typos so be careful on that. But other than that i  recommend him!!
                
                   very good teacher
                
                   very knowledgeable in field. would take again.
                
                   Dr. Howard makes class enjoyable and is easy to listen to.
                
                   Yale professor. has a LOT to offer if you just listen and welcomes discussion. High expectations for papers; think outside of the box and write with eloquence & proper punctuation. Tests are multiple choice and directly from the book and his lectures. He has &quot;been&quot; there, he is part of Psychological history, so listen and learn!
                
                   Dr. Elias is tough, but fair. Lots of group work & you get to work on a real research project. Dr. Elias gets a bad rap, but she is an excellent professor. She cares a lot about her students and expects them to earn their grade. Don't hesitate to ask questions. If you need help, go to her office! Would definitely take again!
                
                   This is the toughest class I have ever taken. There is a difference between challenging and just making it AS DIFFICULT AS POSSIBLE. This possible made every assignment brutal. The homework was a major overload. Stressful because it was just too much all the time. No assignment was clear and the final was impossible to overcome. 
                
                   Do NOT TAKE!!!! She does not get back to you. It will take her over 2 week or more to responded to you. She is not helpful. 
                
                   Worst instructor I ever had, I want to take family & marriage spring semester, unfortunately she's teaching it so I'll wait another semester hopefully offered by someone else. She don't email or answer questions in a timely matter, and by the time she does, modules are do, she's a horrible instructor . What a waste of time & energy
                
                   Never taken an online class like this one in my history!  So much reading outside textbook, it's repetitive and redundant.  Her assignments are confusing.  She doesn't grade on time and no feedback so you don't know how you are doing.  I don't like her style, - coming from someone who loves to read and all my classes.   
                
                   Dr. Elias is very knowledgeable, but she is very strict. Do Not come late to her class or be ask to leave. come prepared or be called out. There is at lease 5 books to read.  You will do a lectures on your own  online)they are longer than face to face. Group work in the class  is not easy. You  need tough skin, she has a harsh tongue.
                
                   Im quite surprised about some of these reviews.  I LOVED her class, period! It was my favorite class that I have ever taken (I have taken many). She knows her stuff you'll learn so much from her. You have to keep up with your annotated bib., you must read 40 pages a week and watch a documentary a week. NO TESTS, BUT still difficult.
                
                   I did not have a bad experience with this teacher however my complaint is she would ask us questions or expect a level of knowledge or understand beyond her explanations. I ended with a great grade but until my grade was posted I didn't know what my grade was.
                
                   The class was tough,you manage the overbearing workload.I did all the work.I never got grades back on time. The grade is posted,there is no explanation to why or how you received that grade. tried my best and still did not get an A...I know I deserved an A as some other students. You can give it your best & it wont cut her unrealistic expectations.
                
                   Horrible professor!  I took her for  summer session.  This lady gives very little direction,  you'll never get a grade on time,  and she gives some extra credit, possibly due to the work load she can't keep up with.  She grades bases on her level of knowledge on the subject.   Leave assignment very broad but your work won't meet her requirements.
                
                   great teacher! she was always willing to help when ever needed. she is a bit demanding but she does care and just wants you to learn the stuff. my best advice if you take her is get to know her ask questions and show her that you want to learn. she is a teacher that will work with you but you need to talk to her.
                
                   Elias is a weird professor! she talks too much and gives very few examples of the material she is covering! She doesn't help at all! She would say, "think about it" if you were stuck on a problem -_- what a horrible way of teaching! The only thing i liked was that she let everyone use notes on the test!! I barely got a B in her class :/so good luck
                
                   She gets getting use to. She has high standards and at the beginning a bit rough around the edges. Know your material and if you need help she is more than available to help you. After going to her office (often) I found her to be pleasant and very helpful. She wants you to succeed. Loved this course. She gives extra credit!!!
                
                   I actually loved taking this class online w/ an online book, however even after doing all the work,- I MEAN ALL THE WORK- reading 14 chapters and doing the modules, I still rec'd a B,her grading is horrible and she does not return any emails. GOOD LUCK taking her
                
                   WORST TEACHER EVER!!! She is so inconsistent in her grading. Good luck if you have questions or need help, because she is no help at all! I will never take her again! I took her my 1st semester at A&M and took her my 3rd semester and both times I received a "C".
                
                   Worst teacher I ever had. She makes you feel like a kindergarden child and she always is right no matter what. I would not take her again at all. Good luck if you do!!!
                
                   The worst class ever... No direction, grading system was horrible and she makes you feel like a child in kindergarten when she gives you directions to sit in the first of the class. Two thumbs down!
                
                   She talks fast and doesn't slow down to show you how to do the math part. When you ask for help, she still talks fast and doesn't bring it down to a level where a lost student will understand
                
                   She talks fast and it doesn't seem to concern her to ask if we understand her lecture.  She grades hard. I tried going to her for help and she basically told me a lot of nothing.  I was not the only one who left confused and frustrated.  Pay attention to the wording in her exams.  She knows her stuff but does not know how to teach it.
                
                   She will teach you the math part but you will not come out of the class or semester feeling like you learned something to apply to anything at work or anywhere. If we pay for this education, we should be able to use it. You have to ask over and over to clarify stuff. Her tests will frazzle you. I think shes on power trip as teacher.
                
                   too much work
                
                   Dr Bohmann is one of the first professors I had at TAMUSA and she is probably the best professor I've had in college.  I'm now a graduate student and out in the workforce.  I use her teachings in my everyday life!
                
                   Wonderful professor.  She brought in guest speakers and showed us movie clips which demonstrated the topic of the class.  If you come to class, take notes, and listen, you will do really well.  You learn a lot in this class, and you can tell she really enjoys her job by the way she treats her students. You couldn't ask for a better professor.
                
                   Classes were interesting. The professor was nice. Exams were not hard if you study for them and read the chapters. They are the standard mulitple-choice type exams.  She's fair. If you do your part - try to learn - and study - you will do well in her class. She's a very nice lady.
                
                   Has anger management problems, gets mad very easy if her concentration gets off track. Treats undergraduate students like kids, but teaches as if we're in a PhD level class. I went into the class with a positive attitude, for the love of science, but didn't enjoy the class for her attitude!!
                
                   has anger issues, has to count to 10 in order to compose self over simple interuptions. Talks to students as if in jr high at the same time wants assigns PhD work level, refuses to review test or give any kind of study tools.
                
                   Experimental might have sealed the deal for me as to where and or what I wanted to do with my academics.  This is not an easy class, but it is rewarding and a must.  Everyone should take it.  It is well crafted, well presented and enduring.  
                
                   Excellent instructor.  Very knowledgable in the field of counseling.  Models what he teaches with real life examples.
                
                   Super friendly, super smart. Her Texas drawl will shock you at first, but she really knows her stuff. She is very approachable and helpful during office hours.  She does not pretend to be better than her students, unlike others at this university.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very interesting instructor. Knows her stuff and relates to the students. Test are essays but very easy.
                
                   Amazing professor! Easy tests and gives extra credit. I love Walker!
                
                   Mrs. Walker is a wonderful instructor.  she uses life experinece to make her students learn
                
                   Knows her stuff very well, but did tend to favor certain people. Especially those who sit in the front rows. It annoyed me beyond belief how she had a personal story behind every lesson she was teaching. Tried to make it to personal which made me just start to judge her and not learn anything. I'm avoiding her classes for the rest of my time here
                
                   Walker is beyond interesting! If you need help with anything she is there with open arms. She cares about every student. She doesn't teach, she preaches. When she is lecturing you are put into a sort of trance because she talks with such compassion. Easy class if you listen and take notes. An easy A with no issue! TAKE WALKER!
                
                   Words cannot describe how amazing she is. I chose to minor in Psychology because of her. When she speaks, she does it with such devotion that it makes you want to listen. Cares about each one of her students. Definitely great. Take her if you can.
                
                   AMAZING PROFESSOR!  I promise you that you will never regret taking her, her tests are difficult and make you think but her lectures are incredible.  She's amazing, please take her! Some days I was so engaged in her lecture that I wouldn't have any notes written down, that's how interesting she is. Amazing lady!!
                
                   Mrs. Walker is probably the best professor I have ever taken.  I considered changing my major to Psychology because of her. She is very clear on the material, and offers extra credit and group work through out the course.  Her class isn't difficult to pass if you just show up to class and apply yourself. I would recommend her to anybody.
                
                   Walker is AWESOME. She makes psych fun to learn and is a wonderful person. She loves her students a lot too. Two things to remember with her class. READ the book. It is near impossible to pass her class if you dont. And go every single day, she will count it against you if you dont. Oh, and make a effort to stop by her office and get to know her!
                
                   Mrs. Walker is AMAZING!!!! best psych prof EVER she loves her job as well as her students. She follows the syllabus very accuratly. She is so loving and caring. Her test are over the chapters she assigns and lectures not hard if you study and pay attention in class. You would never fall asleep or get bored in her class you HAVE to take her! GREAT !
                
                   She was my psyc 2301, 2302, 3301, and next semester will be my 2308 teacher. She is amazing, and I never used the book she assigned but I still received an A :) She's the best teacher on this campus. I highly reccommend her. Any of professor for these psyc classes is out of the question! Don't make the mistake of not selecting her.
                
                   Walker is truly the best.  She is very clear with her lectures and is very helpful at all times.  She is by far one of the best professor at TAMUK!  I would recommend to anybody and everybody!
                
                   She is my favorite teacher by far! I absolutely love her. I would recommend her to anyone. The key to her class is to read the book because she tends to put a few questions on her test that are over things she didn't lecture over. She genuinely cares about her students.
                
                   She is a great professor and she makes class so interesting. I strongly recommend her if you really want to learn  . She is easy only if you study; her tests are kind of hard.
                
                   I loved having her as a teacher. She inspired me by her attitude everyday. She was extremely helpful and I am trying to get more classes with her.
                
                   She's a good teacher. Her tests are a little hard but if you study, you should do good. She also has plenty of extra credit. I got an A
                
                   Mrs. Walker is simply amazing. She makes everything about psychology interesting. She is extremely passionate about her job and makes you aware of it during every class. Attendance is a MUST and going to SI will definitely score you an A and final exemption.
                
                   First off she's an amazing teacher! my best teacher so far in college, she's really passionate about her work and she loves her students. her class was easy as long as you studied, never missed class, and went to every single SI session that is available. The SI's really help you with the study guides and practice test she hands out.
                
                   I also had her for intro to psyc, loved it. Can't wait to have her for child psyc. She's the best professor i have ever had. She extremely loves her job and does it well. she also genuinely cares about her students.  Just put some effort into it and you'll pass. I highly recommend her.
                
                   mrs. walker is great! i am taking child psyc with her this semester, its a really good class. Fairly easy too.
                
                   SHES GREAT
                
                   This teacher was a great person and you can tell she loved teaching psych and stats, however her grading was unclear, no study guides, hmk was great but didn't help much with the grade for class,  she seemed to be on the go all the time.  
                
                   Good professor, really gets into discussions with students, wants everyone to pass, this semester all of our exams were take home and she gave generous extra credit. Book is very helpful, all your tests come out of it. Gives study guides for tests that aren't take home. 
                
                   She was such an amazing person and professor, I almost cried when I found out she retired :/ best professor I've ever had! Wish I would've had the chance to tell her though. Ms. Hill we miss you!
                
                   She is absolutely out of this world.  She even counseled me on a personal issue I had.  She influenced me tremendously.  Absolutely incredible and she smells gorgeous! :)
                
                   AMAZING! I love her!! I am taking every single one of her classes. She is an AMAZING teacher and very helpful. She gives really good notes and you rarely need the book! If you study the notes and go to class you will do great! She also gives extra credit every chapter for the test! :) Love her!
                
                   Great teacher!  She makes that class fun and interesting.  The material covered in class is exactly what you will be tested over.  Study the notes and you'll do fine.
                
                   She is really funny and keeps you interested.  You do need to attend, it gives you bonus points on your exams.
                
                   LOVE HER! she always makes the class fun and keeps you interested. also tells you exactly whats on tests. always gives bonus opportunities. one of the best professors on campus!
                
                   Great professor. Probably the best I've had at this school.
                
                   always makes class interesting and teaches in a way so that you want to learn more, and you remember stuff. tests come exactly from the notes, so pay attention. very fun teacher and lively.
                
                   Cool class. Gives you everything that is on the test. Even tells you what notes to write down as far as what is going to be on the test.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Pam Hill may just be my favorite teacher ever, i plan on taking every class of her's that i can. She is great with her students, unfortuneatley she can't teach every class. There is usually some hotties taking her classes too.
                
                   Best professor of psychology I have ever had. I love how she presents the matter without blushing. It helped me and the students to approach the material without giggling. I love how she does not allow conservative students dictate how her class will be ru
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great teacher. Theres no need for the book the test are right from the notes. Her notes are the best any prof as given. Very nice and funny lady. Makes the subject very easy.
                
                   Great teacher and sweet lady
                
                   Great Professor! She's not JUST a sex teacher. I learned so much from her and she is a great lady.
                
                   Hill is one of the best teachers I ever had.  She actually cares about her students, adn her class is very informative.  If you don't want to hear about sex though, don't take it.
                
                   This lady gave too many condoms to the students.  She had lots of examples of sex.  This class will make you and expert on sex -- and even Dr. Ruth would blush.
                
                   Can't talk down about her. Just be prepared to work and you should do fine. If you're a male be ready to defend yourself, if you're a woman, congratulations on your A.  
                
                   Nicest professor I've ever had! Genuinely cares about teaching the material at hand and tries to make lectures fun and interactive. Very funny too. Exams can be hard but you'll pass if you read the book and listen during class. I enjoyed her Psychology of Women class so much. Would take her again.
                
                   I had a stats class with him years ago. I was dreading it - I'm not a math person at all. But from day one he made all of us non-math people feel comfortable, and he walked us through different examples step by step. I learned so much more than I thought I would. He was quiet, but he really cared about his students. He is missed at TAMUK.
                
                   He's cool. Can be boring. He lectures slowly and spaces his phrases apart. I record the class but if you can pay attention his lectures are interesting. He makes a lot of sense. He is always asking if anyone has questions & answers any question. He gives homework that is based on powerpoints & notes. Exams are the same. Great class!
                
                   This class was awesome. Dr. Mario would really explain things well. The textbook was not needed as his notes were from the book.
                
                   I have taken Dr. Blake twice online and I have always found the class to be quite easy. Since there is no lecture on anything, you do have to read the textbook in order to pass the quizzes and tests, but it's pretty interesting material so it's not too bad. Oh, and don't forget about the course project.
                
                   My favorite professor! Follows syllabus unlike most professors I've taken. You will use your book so definitely purchase it! Lectures are clear and to the point. Gives good feedback and is very helpful. If I could, I'd take her for all my psychology classes.
                
                   Great teacher.
                
                   Does not know how to present any of the material. He only takes information from the textbook, turns it into a PowerPoint, and reads it to the class. He is extremely boring. It's hard to focus in his class. He also uses the words "Specifically" and "Ultimately" WAYYYY too much. It is very distracting. I do not recommend this professor.
                
                   Omg .. He is super help full!!, if you have emergencias he undersatnds and workforce with you to help you get the grade you want ... Just take him
                
                   Confusing teacher. Boring class. Does not follow syllabus, but will work with you if you miss class.
                
                   Easy professor. Although he assigns them, you do not need to read the book or any reading materials. The students also are the ones that make the test. The problem is he is very confusing because he does not know how to pronounce any big/long words that he puts on his own presentations.
                
                   He is very helpful and if you need to miss class let him know before hand... He works with you and your work schedule too.
                
                   He is very hilarious in his teaching techniques. all details of the quizzes and about extra credit appeared on Bb and are reminded you on time, so dont worry when studying in his class.
                
                   Don't be discouraged by the awful speech he gives on the first day of class about how hard the course is. If you put in the work, it will reflect in your grade. Choose carefully when the group project is assigned! Tests are really all from lecture, so pay attention and go to lab!Attendance isn't mandatory, but he sometimes gives extra credit for it
                
                   Attendance is not mandatory however it WILL help you pass. Everything is posted on blackboard. He is extremely organized and SI Sessions help A LOT. I would definitely take him again. Best professor ever. He knows what he's talking about.
                
                   Awesome teacher. He is great at posting things up in blackboard, and he responds quickly to correspondence. There was work involved but nothing that you wouldn't expect.
                
                   Weekly homework.  Tests are online but are tricky - although if you attend class and SI its easier to figure out what he expects. Hope I get the opportunity to take another of his classes.
                
                   He gives the BEST lectures and there is tons of extra credit opportunities! I definitely recommend Dr. Z!
                
                   Prof. Zoccolillo is amazing! There are four online tests and a final. He drops the lowest test grade. Expect homework every week but it is easy work. His lectures are really interesting and will help you pass. He give out a lot of extra credit if you are willing to do it. Just do the assignments and study for the online tests and you'll do well
                
                   He's ok for me but honestly, I didn't learn much in his class (maybe because I took his Maymester). He's easy but you need to study for the tests (read the powerpoint if you don't have a book). Most of the things he talks in class, in my opinion, do not help me in the tests, but they are interesting though. 
                
                   Very good professor. The lectures are interesting, and the tests are all online. The tests are open notebook, so having the book ready with bookmarks is essential.  The tests aren't too hard, and if you read the book and attend class you will do well. There is a ton of extra credit throughout the semester. 
                
                   He is a great teacher, very nice!
                
                   Amazing professor! I didn't exactly put my best foot forward this semester therefore I don't have the grade I wanted but rather than going off to another professor I plan to take him again and this time ace it. He's relatable and easy-going; there really are few legitimate professors left like him. Now planning to be a psych minor. 
                
                   If you show up and do the work, you will do well in this class.  Do not expect to do well on his tests though if you are just reading the book or getting notes from someone.  Super interesting lectures and discussions and class is actually fun (sometimes).  Responds to questions quickly and wants his students to do well.
                
                   Dr. Z really is cool like everyone says! There is work to do, and tests can be kinda confusing but reading and going to a SI session helps a lot. Dr. Z always seems to be giving extra credit opportunities though.
                
                   Dr. Z is awesome!
                
                   Zombies, Facebook, toilets, The Big Bang Theory and so much more. I've never had a professor be so sociable and in tuned with the world around him. He's witty, hilarious, relatable, and all around perfect. Read every once in a while and listen to his lecture on studying. He expects the right amount of effort and is very understanding.
                
                   Zoccolillo is such a great professor as well as a great person. He is willing to help you however he possibly can and is very understanding that your life doesn't revolve around his class so makes it not mandatory. If you attend regularly, listen in class (which is not hard since he makes it interesting) and study some you will make an A or B.
                
                   Very good professor. He cares about his students and wants us to do well. He is interesting and fair. I loved his class!
                
                   Professor Zoccolillo was one of the best profs I've ever had by far. He makes class fun, and he is really laid back. He also generously curves exams, almost all of the material comes from his lectures. He also gives a lot of extra credit. He takes attendance every class though... But he makes the course so easy, it's almost impossible to not pass!!
                
                   This prof. was one of the best I have had. I took his Gen. Psych class over Maymester and it was very interesting and he was very clear on what the assignments were. He also adjusted the class so that we covered the most amount of material possible without it being overwhelming. Overall a grade A Professor!!!
                
                   best teacher ever. interesting class and really helpful for real life. I got +b but it was my fault. he helped me a lot.
                
                   Dr. Soward is amazing!! She knows what she is talking about and her tests are easy. Theres 1 essay during the semester. She doesn't post power points on BB though, so it is mandatory to go to class. Everything she covers on the power points are on the tests. She was awesome! Definitely recommend. 
                
                   The class and exams are challenging, but very doable if you've studied prior. He's a nice professor who truly helps you out when you don't understand something. His office hours are the best! As long as you're on track, do the assignments and work he provides, and STUDY you'll be okay. I recommend taking him!
                
                   The class is definitely difficult. However it is really interesting if you pay attention. If you have questions ask immediately or else you will get lost. He is really helpful yet he is extremely set in his rules so do what you have to when you have to. Go to SI and do all your sniffy and crosswords! they effect your grade more than you'll realize
                
                   He is hard, I honestly think the people writing his reviews is him. He gives the MOST DIFFICULT test, and not enough time to finish it. Its ridiculous. He is a nice teacher, but not a fair one. He wants you to fail, and he proves it with the test 3 essay questions, 6 fill in the blank, 12 multiple choice, 10 t/f in 50mins. you cant even reread!
                
                   Dr. Moreno is very intelligent, helpful, and interesting but his tests are HARD. You will need to  read, do Sniffy assignments, crossword puzzles, and articles. Make sure to go to class, read, and do the assignments.
                
                   VERY DIFFICULT TESTS. STUDY HARD. CONSTANTLY. Otherwise, Moreno is wonderful. He is ALWAYS open to questions (preferably in his offices) if a student doesn't understand something. He absolutely respects students that DO go see him. Makes lectures/material as clear as possible but actually wants to pass students that WILL TRY (hence the hard tests)
                
                   Dr. Moreno's class is very hard! However, you need to attend class do all  the assignments and read the material that he requires. He is very helpful and will answer any questions you have. He's a great teacher, just very hard. But do the work and ask questions, and  you'll pass.
                
                   Yes, Dr. Moreno's classes and exams are HARD so be prepared to STUDY. Class started with 54 students, we now have about 30. Everyone complaining about him didn't TRY! If you work hard, it pays off! If you attend class, you get bonus points! Moreno is a GREAT professor who knows his stuff! Learn from him, and don't give up!
                
                   I LOVE him as a prof.! He really cares how well you understand the material, and will explain something until you get it. He offers extra credit almost everyday, because if 20% of the class is absent (or even not on time) he gives the class an "attendance quiz." He even lent me a book to help me train my puppy! lol i highly recommend his class.
                
                   He is very nice, and very helpful. You must go to his office and monitor your grade and see what you can do to raise a grade if you need to. He will answer any questions you have and will sit there with you until you get it. His assignments and tests are HARD which is why i mentioned his office.
                
                   He is a great teacher. If you actually want to learn something that you can use prior to entering the class take this. His tests are challenging and require you to think not just memorize notes. Great guy, will help you if you need help and not just give you answers - if you don't like being challenged and like being handed stuff - don't sign up.
                
                   Dr. Moreno's courses are taught the way a college course should be taught. The material is challenging, the tests require basic understanding of concepts, the professor is very helpful, and extra credit is offered. If you're looking for an "easy A" or a free ride, don't bother taking a Moreno course, or for that matter, going to college.
                
                   Cognitive Psych favorite class last semester. The class is difficult, but he cares for his students. If you are having a difficult time understanding he will take extra time (office hours) to help. Yes,his test are difficult but I learned more from his class than any other.  If you are serious about learning the material not memorizing take him.
                
                   Although Dr Moreno is articulate and you can learn and understand by listening.  I found his class extremely challenging. His tests are timed (not enough) I am not lazy, I studied a lot.  Problem is you have to take either him or Glanc if your a Psych major and both of them make it difficult.  Good luck future psych majors!
                
                   Do Not Take Any Class He Teaches. Talk about anal. He assigns so much homework its insane, reading, crosswords, labs, discussion questions and everything has a time limit. If you're 1 minute late to class then your work is late. Doesn't matter what the reason is. I have As in all my classes except his which is a low C. So it cant be my fault.
                
                   2nd worst teacher at TAMUCC, talks so quiet and above everybody heads, and takes pride in the fact his test are harder than everybody elses. In fact he even says that in his opening speech how he knows that (while have a big smile on his face). Tests were horrible and the dumb digital rat is pointless. Stay away from Moreno, take anyone else.
                
                   I really enjoyed this class.  It was enjoyable.  All the people that are complaining are just lazy.  Dr. Moreno is super smart and is really, super helpful; plus he gives a lot of extra credit.  Remember do the essays first then fill in the blank, and then the MC questions; if you do it this way, you will be able to finish his tests.
                
                   I have Dr. Moreno for Learning & Memory and he's one of my favorite teachers. His tests aren't difficult if you attend class and review beforehand. He gives a ton of extra credit, so there's really no excuse to fail his class. I have a 99 and I really don't study except the day before the tests. I'd definitely take him again.
                
                   The griping by the others here is just sour grapes.  This professor does a good job of covering material.  Yes, his tests are a challenge, but you will do fine if you read the book along with study the lecture notes.  Seems to care very much about his students.
                
                   Took him for S&P. He utilized Power points a lot. However the test are extremely ridiculous. Multiple choice, T/F @ page essay some of the stuff wasn't covered in class. I showed up everyday and every extra credit opportunity he had. If you want to learn something in college do not take him!!
                
                   Do not, I repeat do NOT take a class with this professor.His exams are the worse I have ever taken.He covers too much material in each exam & expects you to do insane amounts of HW.Taking his class was a nightmare.Really,don't take him.I assure you, you will reject it.(BTW,I wasn't even lazy in his class, I really tried.It was still unbearable.)
                
                   Professor Johnson is a great instructor. Show up to class, he expects you to read ahead in the chapter. Be prepared for pop quizzes, he gives extra credit- which helps a lot. Fun and interesting class to have taken.
                
                   This was the BEST class ever. Some lectures felt like I was at a comedy club. He keeps things interesting and entertaining. You will have to work hard, but if you do, you will learn SO much! Oh, and go to class- there will be pop quizzes (so always do your reading)
                
                   Professor Johnson was GREAT. You learn a substantial amount in this class. He lectured in ways that everybody could understand. Gave out tons of extra credit. Just follow the instructions, put your name on it, and you're awarded the extra points. He is super hilarious too. Tests are a little difficult, but if you study then you should be fine.
                
                   He offers many chances for extra credit, but then pettily refuses to award said credit if any small thing is wrong with submission. I.E.- didn't put your ' A Number 'on the paper. Or, " Didn't properly label paper as 'extra credit' " or "put your name on the 'wrong' side of paper".
                
                   Very enthusiastic about class and helpful. Very challenging class and assignments.
                
                   Dr.Hasan was great!! She is greatly proud of what she teachers and it shows in her teachings. Her test were kind of hard, a lot of definitions to memorize but other than that not too bad. Awesome professor!
                
                   She was very enthusiastic about the class, really got everyone engaged. Attendance wasn't mandatory as long as you had emailed her about why you were out. She gave points at the end of semester for attendance. Her test were a little hard as far as a lot of terms and definitions. She gives you what you need to know, you just have to memorize it.
                
                   Dr. Hasan is a great professor who keeps students engaged and you actually look forward to going to her class because she is so positive and upbeat.
                
                   phys psych is a harder subject but I made B in class study book PP any and all info you will do good. She sang in a &quot;rock' band with three other TAMUCC professors incld. Hartlaub and Siedel!! she is wild!!!!!!!
                
                   This professor is great. She has had a lot of experience in her field and encourages discussion in class. She expects the best, including a sufficient number of cited sources for papers, and respect for the classroom environment. I took personality with this professor and learned a lot! I'm going to miss it.
                
                   Dr. Glanc was a decent professor. Since this was an online course she did her best to ensure we were all on task and up to date on everything. Her tests are difficult, and you need to make sure you know all the structures for the labeling part of the test. Textbook is definitely needed and the coloring book I didn't find very useful. 
                
                   I took her Physiological Psych class online, and granted with it being online it is a harder class. She uses about every vocabulary word in the book which makes memorization and comprehension very difficult. Reading quizzes over each chapter every week. I would recommend taking this class in lecture over online.
                
                   This professor is hilarious!  Take her! Explains everything clearly and is extremely helpful.  Uses videos and real-world examples to explain things better.  Offers extra credit opportunities so you can bring your grade up a few points.  Do the assignments, study for the (online) tests and you will get an A.  Definitely helps to attend lecture.
                
                   She's kind of quirky, but she's a great teacher and was awesome to be in class with. 
                
                   I recommend taking her class during the summer. She gave us a choice of online/inclass tests, no home work, little inclass activities, good power points(I don't think book is required), she said the book was mandatory but I never got it and I made a B. attendance was mandatory for summer session.
                
                   One of the best psychology professors i've had at A & M Corpus Christi. Her classes can be somewhat difficult, but the grading is fair and conducive to learning. You don't have to take my word for it, just look up some of her work in top tier journals, it is plentiful.
                
                   This class by far was one of the easiest classes I've taken. Of course with any class there are assignments, but with her online assignments you are done within at least 10 mins. I took her class once a week for 2 hrs.. she even drops the lowest test grade! hint* go to SI word for word on the test and powerpoints instead of the textbook
                
                   Dr. Glanc, is a nice and funny teacher. Her test comes right off from the slides, and doing the review will help you pass the test. The homework assignments are fun to do, and easy learning. If you don't attend class or do the assignments, read the power points, do the reviews;  then it is easy to fail or have a hard time.
                
                   Dr.Glanc, is a sweet funny teacher. She has great power points, she places videos on the slides to show examples of what she is talking about in class. I really enjoyed her class, her test are not hard, but it is good to do the reviews.
                
                   Absolutely the worst instructor I've ever had! A huge inferiority complex and will argue with you about mistakes in the book, mistakes on her slides and answers on a test! Nothing is her fault (even if it is) and sarcastic. If you have problems with math, are an older student or returning to class after a few years do NOT take this instructor!
                
                   Class is fairly easy. Read the book before taking an exam and you'll do fine. Take notes in class as well! I you fail this class, it's mainly because you're not paying all of your attention to it, for ex, watching tv while reading the book. Tests come from the book and slides. Teacher is "funny" at times haha.
                
                   I Love This Professor, She Was Great And Very helpful.
                
                   I took her for S&P and PhysioPsych. I liked her! I didn't think she was difficult at all. I almost fell asleep a lot, but that was bc I was tired. Pay attention in class, read, and re-read her slides and you're guaranteed at least a B. I don't get where the naysayers are coming from tbh.
                
                   I am in the minority on here, because Dr. Glanc was none of those things. This is her first year as on tenure at TAMUCC, and she was very helpful to those who asked. She tutored me, then recommended a tutor when she was out sick for a week. The class is HARD, but she is not. She taught it clear; tests clear [just study!]. Yes - you need the book.
                
                   I'm truly disgusted with this professor. She does not understand the material, so how can she teach it. She teaches contradictory information. She does not give reviews, and is not prepared at all! She also makes inappropriate comments.
                
                   I liked this teacher even though I do agree she isn't prepared at all & if you ask a question youll get an I don't know or a weird answer the tests were ok but they do cover ALOT of material She gives extra credit which is always nice. If you take her you really have to try hard to do good, if you dont  then your grade will reflect it big time.
                
                   This class is all about reading the book. Her tests are easy if you have read and studied over the chapters. She also assigns online activities which are lame, but they will boost your grade if you complete them all. Attendance is not mandatory, but she does have random sign-ins and you get extra points if you are there.
                
                   a really great teacher! it is so easy to pay attention in his class and his lectures are always fun and interesting. We always end up having class debates and such which makes it even more fun! if you want to learn in a more exciting way without falling asleep in class you should definantely take him!!
                
                   Fall '06 was his first semester here, but James is a fantastic professor to have. Expectations in the course were made perfectly clear, and his goofy sense of humor does help make an already interesting class (imo, of course) even more interesting. Would definitely take another of his classes again.
                
                   SUPER EASY AND FUN! I LOVED HER!!
                
                   Best UCCP class EVER! I've heard of other professors giving homework for this class. Dr. Calley helps with your other classes and wants you to do well.
                
                   Very great Professor. She was extremely helpful when it came to review and help for tests. To a large extent lenient when it comes to attendance and participation. I must say it is an easy A as long as you're respectful and go at least once a week.
                
                   Great professor.  Doesn't give busy work keeps everything to the point and keeps the class interesting.  Defiantly would recommend to any one.
                
                   I really enjoyed having Dr.Calley for the second half of philosophy. She was very good at guiding us in all our assignments, which made the work load a lot more smooth for the student.
                
                   She truly cares about her students connecting what they are learning in class to their lives. Very sweet. I had her for seminar and actually learned a lot from her class.
                
                   She is awesome and the nest teacher i ever had
                
                   Awesome teacher!!!! Helped alot with what we were doing in Psychology. It was kinda a boring class but she made it fun :D
                
                   I had her for my recitation section in PHIL 3340. She's great because you learn without having to do a whole lot at home. It was mostly in-class assignments and group projects.  You should definitely take her.
                
                   seminar
                
                   I took seminar with Tracey Calley during Fall '07. I have to say, she really is an awesome person! She helped a lot when it came to studying for tests in the big lecture class and she clarified many of the objectives in my English class. Also, she's really in-touch with younger students since her seminar class is intended for freshmen students.
                
                   dfdasf
                
                   She is the most amazing teacher you can ever have. She is awesome. She is very helpful and charismatic. She is learning interesting and enjoyable
                
                   Great professor! Easy to deal with.
                
                   Fun class with good discussions.  She is a new teacher, but does a good job.
                
                   I had been waiting to take social psych for about 3 semester but could never fit it in to my schedule. Then when I finally did, man was I disappointed. She doesn't have very good public speaking skills and that really distracts you from what she's trying to teach you. Overall, just left me disappoint with a class I really wanted to take.
                
                   thought she brought much to class with psych tests from clinic. liked discussion and debates.  if you do the work, and come to class, you will pass.  tests do include handouts and outside materials
                
                   Lectures come straight from the book so you don't have to go to class or take notes.
                
                   she did teach from the book and related everything to her family but i liked her class. she could easily be mistaken for a student
                
                   She does teach directly from the book, but she knows her stuff. Extremely intelligent, and if you listen and read, you WILL learn something despite the easiness of the course. I'd recommend taking her over any other Psych. professor.
                
                   She does teach right out of the book and tells you flat out that if you read the book you will pass. But she is very understanding and gives the easiest homework!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Her failing students is not helping us learn the material.  She needs to lecture not read book.
                
                   She talks from the moment you sit down until you are out of the door. Relates EVERYTHING back to her family. But she is an alright professor...young too!
                
                   I really wish I would have found this page prior to taking the course.We were expected to know how she wanted things done, without an example of her expectation or she would change them.You just have to block her out and study about 5 hrs per night and you will do fine. Maybe she will get a job at MIT or something, where people can value her skills
                
                   Dawn is an experimental psychologist, that is her life. She moves through the material like lighting and she never strike in the same place.She places material on the test that she did not teach you. Lessons a given that are not in the book. This is a class that you must have time for ALOT of homework. You will have to teach yourself.
                
                   She is an amazing teacher. Dawn is not easy but not hard. If you follow her guide and listen you will pass just fine. She is very interesting when she teaches and makes sure everyone is following along. She will ask class questions so make sure you pay attention. IF you take her class you WILL LEARN! that's the goal right....
                
                   She moves fast like the speed of lighting. If you snooze you loose in this class. She is not flexible at all. Stats is in her blood and experimental is her soul.If you take this course make sure you have a light load of classes.
                
                   She's awesome! She wants you to understand the material and her passion for what she is teaching shines through. She's a tough teacher, but she truly teaches. She is amazing and seems to sincerely care about her students and their success in her class.
                
                   I am taking this class at the CHEC. The material is not easy, but she does everything to help you grasp the concept. She is hot!!!
                
                   I took this class at the CHEC.  The material is not easy, but she does everything to help you grasp the concept.  Offers up to 10% extra credit.  Gives reviews before all of the tests. Assignments straight out of the book. Quizzes are timed but the majority are easy if you read the material.
                
                   Great Professor! I have had a few classes with her. She expects your best, but is always willng to help. She knows exactly what she is doing and has a lot of knowledge to offer if you remain open minded. Would undoubtly recommend her classes!
                
                   Excellent class! If you don't care about doing the work then you probably will complain at the end of the semester. I thought this class was very rewarding. We did have to work but nothing we couldn't handle and it was all interesting none of that busy homework that doesn't matter. Im happy I took the class.
                
                   Hated this course! She is entirely too CONSIDED!!! I learned nothing! Class was too structured! She treated us like we were in middle school! Overall, horrible professor! DO NOT take her, if possible!
                
                   Great professor, makes time fly by.  No demanding homework....just presentations and exams.  You MUST attend class to get all answers for test. Don't really need text she uses ppts. Easy fun class that will make you love the subject even more.  I wish she taught more classes so I could take those too!!!
                
                   She is a great professor and has plenty of energy. She will keep you motivated.
                
                   Dr. Tochkov is full of energy that makes her class fun and constantly entertaining!! She has a real interest in her students not only as they learn the material but as people. On our break in class she has sat and talked with us about music interests and movies. She is not only a super cool teacher but a really chill and amazing lady!!
                
                   She has a contagious enthusiasm and positivity and she is very well educated in her subject. She goes over material and then has students do presentations and the tests cover both. If you read the books you will be fine and take notes in class!!! I would take all of the classes she offered but she only has one I need!!!!
                
                   My only class at TAMU-C outside the counseling department. I truly enjoyed the energy of Dr. Tochkov and her enthusiasm for the subject matter. I will take as many classes as I can with her.
                
                   A motivated and talented teacher that TAMU-C is lucky to have. After taking several classes at this university I can say that the level of quality of her teaching is excellent. Dr. Tochkov offers an active, interesting environment for learning and a great deal of knowledge to share.
                
                   She is useless i the classroom. Instead of teaching she uses class time for students' presentations. Then she opens slides that she has not ssen before the class. She rushes through them at about 100 mi/h speed. Total time she takes to teach - maybe 15 min out of 2 h 40 min. This class should be given on-line.
                
                   She is useless i the classroom. Instead of teaching she uses class time for students' presentations. Then she opens slides that she has not ssen before the class. She rushes through them at about 100 mi/h speed. Total time she takes to teach - maybe 15 min out of 2 h 40 min. This class should be given on-line.
                
                   Dr. Tochkov is awesome!! She has a great sense of humor, so her class is fun and always interesting - &quot;Today we're going to talk about my favorite subject: SEX! Yea!&quot;  She'll make you wish you were a Psych major.
                
                   Good proffesor in general, sometimes he will take a little longer than usual to get back at you by email. He will be flexible with dead lines and such . Take it!
                
                   Learned a lot, lots of work!  Prepare to stay busy.  OK on line class.
                
                   3 novel assignments & tests, 6 movie reviews, 32 discussion assignments, 3 textbook chapter tests. So much busy work.  Aims for each chapter test question to be answered correctly by 75% of class&#63; If more got the answer correct, he knows it was too easy.  Only 2 grades back after nearly 60 days into class.  Good for people detached from society.
                
                   His online course is pretty good.  I really enjoyed it.  DOES NOT follow syllabus much but is very understanding and I believe the main problem was myleo.  I enjoyed this course, one of my favorites ever.
                
                   Her class was a lot of fun. She is very upbeat and loves what she teaches. She teaches from a slide show that she will pull questions from for her tests. All you have to do to make an A is show up and read the slide shows. She also gives extra credit. 
                
                   This is a teacher that I would easily take another class from.
                
                   This class is super simple. Do what is asked and it's an easy A.
                
                   Be prepared to work for your grade. A lot of writing and tough tests. She is very clear on what is expected and give good feedback
                
                   Be prepared to spend extra time on this class. It is not a difficult class but the lectures, instructions and multiple weekly emails will keep you very busy. It is nice to know the expectations of a professor but I think that sometimes less is more. Too much information can make assignments seem much more overwhelming than necessary. 
                
                   I recommend Mrs. Stephens to everyone who has to take any psy 300 or 310 classes! She is very detailed, (almost to a fault) but you always know what to do. Discussions are easy, and even though she says, "make sure you read" you have time to look up every answer in your book during the tests. easy A!
                
                   Took this course online. The professor is very detailed and helpful. Assignments are not hard. Tests are timed but she curves the grades. Just do the work and you will do fine.
                
                   Took this online.  MANY long emails, but she was crystal clear in her expectations, guidelines, deadlines, etc.  No reason to get behind or forget something.  Highly recommend her!
                
                   LOTS of reading, lots of homework, be prepared to spend hours on your computer. She is a wonderful teacher and very very helpful, but it is NOT a 'just get by' kind of class.
                
                   Lots of reading for this class, especially her emails, but she is helpful and she is telling you what you need to know. If you fail, it's really your own fault. Learned a lot.
                
                   Great class, learned a lot
                
                   This class was demanding. I loved it and Prof Stephens was great. Make sure you keep up and read the text. You will only fail this class if you don't try.
                
                   Took this class online. LOVE this professor. Easy to read text goes with class.  Explains everything in detail.  If you fail, you must be &quot;special&quot;.
                
                   GREAT TEACHER!!!  So helpful and grades fair.  She spends A LOT of time making sure that the students understand what they need to be doing each week.  I took her online and wish that I could have met her in person.  Take her class, you will not regret it.  Her assignments are interesting too!
                
                   Very good class she keeps your attention and is very great at what she does. I wish all the other teachers were like her.
                
                   Do yourself a favor and get Rebecca as ur teacher!! She is beyond good, she's extremeley helpful : if you email her she replies back within minutes, even if its late at night and on the weekends. She makes class very fun, you do need to attend and read the material, but she explains all the material thats on the test in class.Shes hilarious get her
                
                   Rebecca is an awesome teacher.  I loved her class.  It is super easy if you go to class and do the 3 home works. She is always willing to help, and responds to e-mails usually within 5 minutes (even late at night).  Her class was never boring; not even on syllabus day!
                
                   Rebecca is awesome.  Her lectures are always fun, and because of that, you can easily retain the information from them.  You have to do 2 case studies, and these homework assignments.  However, the homework assignments are questions you'll see on the test!  The  class isn't too hard, but you really need to make sure you go to class to pass.
                
                   GREAT TEACHER!!!! Made class so much fun with her stories and theatrics.
                
                   Before taking her class I heard tons of negative stuff...like that she was very hard!...But in my case her class was GREAT!all you have to do is read and do the homework she gives you! I wish that more teacher were like her because she had some very interesting stories!the class was GREAT!Believe me take STEPHENS!!!!!
                
                   Absolutely AWESOME teacher! she goes &quot;all out&quot; to teach. Her class is easy as long as you read and do your homework. You will learn a lot if you take this class. And as a Psychology major, I HOPE MORE TEACHERS ARE LIKE HER in my future classes.
                
                   I would recommend this class. It is very interesting. Come to class everyday...dont miss or you will be lost. Study homework and online quizes before tests.
                
                   I've had Natalie twice now for Forensics & Cognitive. She'll make you work for all the right reasons - and in doing so, will make you a better candidate for down the road. Her niche is forensics and she knows her stuff. She is fair, down to earth, experienced, fun, and geniune - you don't find that often today.  She wants you to succeed. Try her!
                
                   Very fun and interesting class. Wasn't very interested in forensic psychology until I took this course.  This class is most definitely her nitch.  She brings in guest speakers and you watch interesting videos. I highly recommend this course.  Very extensive interview project you work on all semester, not hard just a lot of work involved.
                
                   I loved this class but I am already interested in forensics. The class is a lot of fun and you watch a lot of videos about the people we talk about. She tires to make it fun. There was a pretty extensive interview project that had parts due all semester and the final due at the end. It was easy just tedious. Tests are over things in class so go!
                
                   Took it online and it was so easy. You cannot fail this class.
                
                   Easiest teacher ever!
                
                   Awesome teacher, super easy, took online but actually learned a lot!
                
                   Took as an online class. All it consisted of was - read an article, watch a lecture and post a response. There was no discussions, no feedback at all. Topics were somewhat random and lectures seemed biased instead of objective. Wouldn't recommend, at least not online. Seemed personable and helpful when I visited him in his office, though.
                
                   Dr. Reysen is a great professor with a passion for what he does and a heart for helping students learn.  I wish I had more teachers like him.  Texas A & M University is blessed to have him there.
                
                   Great teacher....
                
                   Very knowledgeable and does not just simply regurgitate from the textbook. A very interactive class.
                
                   He is really enthusiastic about the class which helps the information become more interesting. He is helpful and the lab he runs is worth being apart of.
                
                   Doc Reysen is a fresh face at TAMU.  He's almost always operating from his social psych mind - lives what he teaches - relaxed, humble and extremely intelligent.  I would definitely recommend this class to anyone who wants to be reminded of the true essence of being a social creature in our group - the human race!!!
                
                   AWESOME CLASS! I highly recommend it!
                
                   an awesome really chill guy...very helpful with learning content needed for tests and other assignments!
                
                   A very interesting class (but it is definitely not catered to the close-minded). Reysen makes the class very interesting, and is great at using outside sources (such as videos and examples from other disciplines) to supplement the course. I would highly recommend this class if you're not looking for an easy A, but rather a great class experience.
                
                   He was amazing! He is always willing to help no matter what it is. Extremely calm and relaxed atmosphere.
                
                   Dr. Pang, is incredibly knowledgable and helpful.  her comments are clear and her input is very helpful.  I really enjoyed working with her.
                
                   She is the worst online teacher that I have ever had. I would not recommend her to anyone. She is teaching an entry level psychology class like we are Phd's. She provides very little instruction and penalizes heavily when her expectations are not met. Her assignments are extremely boring and time consuming. Above all she is impossible to please.
                
                   She is terrible. NOT a teacher. Not sure whay TAMU-C has her teachign for them. No help at all... did not learn a thing!
                
                   Very strict on grading!!! Does not allow make up work or extra credit!!
                
                   I don't know how she can call herself a Professor. She could not care less for her students. She is awful, and I am completely confused as to why she bothers doing something she is so terrible at.  Incompetence is her forte, followed closely by ignorance.  I got an easy A, but no thanks to her.
                
                   I took intro in high school, but due to an issue with my credits, had to take it again at TAMUC.  I'm actually glad I did.  This has been my favorite class in college so far!  A passionate, funny professor makes such a difference. I hope she teaches something besides intro in the future so I can take another class with her.  Also, girl crush!!
                
                   Ms. Mayberry likes what she teaches and you can tell she enjoys the subject. She voices her political beliefs a little but it's not offensive. I enjoyed the class. I received an A. There is a reading assignment every week and a quiz, but they are both pretty easy.  I do recommend. 
                
                   Professor Mayberry is awesome! She made class enjoyable and really knew how to get the information across! It's obvious she is passionate about the material. 
                
                   She is AWESOME!!! I learned so much in her class. Her lectures are extremely clear and her reviews for test are absolutely on point. She almost made me want to change my major to psych!
                
                   Mayberry is a fun prof. She's obviously passionate about the subject, and is good at explaining it in ways that make it simple. She's also pretty funny in her lectures.  There's a lot of info to learn in this class, but if people put in the work it's not hard to get an A.  The only thing I didn't like was that she's kinda slow getting grades back.
                
                   Jessica's a fun professor, and you can tell she loves what she does! I always enjoyed going to her class!! I definitely recommend taking her class! Her lectures are fun, and she always makes them interesting! As long as you pay attention the class is pretty easy! She's very open-minded, and willing to help any way she can! She's pretty awesome!! 
                
                   Absolutely loved taking this class! 
                
                   Dr. Matthews is awesome! She is Canadian and is very proud of it! She is loud and sassy and makes class fun! The class is an hour and 15 minutes but it does not feel like it. She makes it fun and I laugh in almost every single class!
                
                   Her test are really hard and massive essay questions.  Lots of busy work.
                
                   Ms. Jones was our lab instructor for stats. She was really nice and understanding, and she always stuck around to talk to us if we had questions after class. She went over the lab answers with us too at the end of class. Wish she hadn't gotten ill during the semester, but would take again.
                
                   Dr. Hayes is probably my favorite professor!He's very easy. His test were a little tough but he curved the grades. You do have writing assignments but they're very short and you only have a few. They're two pages long but if you do it, he gives you credit. GO TO CLASS! He gives extra credit most days. Great professor,I would take him again!
                
                   Took this course online. Kept me pretty busy for an online summer course but paid off in the end with an A+!  None of the homework was extremely difficult, online quizzes open book.  Lays out expectations well....take her class!!
                
                   She has a way of explaining the subject matter and making it crystal clear.  I am not a psych major, but she has made the course very interesting.  I like the way she interacts with the class.
                
                   She is super easy! Too easy to the point where you find yourself slacking off b/c it's so easy and you forget that it's a real class.
                
                   Very easy summer class. Only grades are tests, which are easy multiple choice tests. Roll wasn't taken. Class itself is kinda boring, she's not exactly a firecracker. You'll learn a little bit and get an easy passing grade.
                
                   MISS GADZELLA and I had an instant connection.  I listened with great enthusiasm every word she said.  She was VERY interesting and knowledgable. These people who say she "DISRESPECTED" you are CLEARLY people who did not EARN her respect.  I cannot imagine her being malicious to anyone.  I LUV YA Miss Gadzella and MISS U.
                
                   This is the only professor I have encountered at this university that I absolutely have NO respect for. She treats the students with disrespect and can't even understand when asked a simple question. She needs to retire.
                
                   Let our class either use notes or have a partner for all the test but last. Kind of easy class if you prepare notes and a study guide for the test. She doesn't really like being argued with, I'd just sit there and let her talk. In then end she was easy A.
                
                   One of the nicest professors you will ever meet.  she will help you if you will go to her for help.  She has a sense of humor and trys to explain what she wants
                
                   she reminds me of the bat from anastasia in the way she talks..  she's hard of hearing, so thats fun to mess with...can get anoying though when you have to keep repeating things.  She's very helpful, but a stickler on attendance
                
                   Very nice teacher.  Comes off like she will be mean but is nice.  She is helpful
                
                   If I am just going to be brutally honest here I would NOT recommend taking this teacher. She talks to only half the class and does not clarify any instructions of any of the assignments. She is not very informative about what she teaches either. She talks straight from the power point and even then she doesn't go over what all is in the power point
                
                   Ok Honestly DO NOT TAKE THIS TEACHER!!!!  she is not a good teacher.  She only talks to half the class.  And when you ask her a question she wont answer it.  She will put something in the power point and not go over it.  She talks directly from the power point.   Overall not a good teacher.
                
                   I took her for lecture class for PSY300.  Mrs. Fairfield's class was interesting & fun to attend. This was so far my favorite class this semester! She gives fabulous & great feedback about what to expect in diverse classrooms. Most of her assignments are online as well as her exams. Her exams are open book. I would highly recommend her!
                
                   She was not a good teacher. She read straight from the PowerPoints each lecture. Only two tests over about 8-10 chapters. Would not recommend taking. There are weekly assignments and discussion which are easy. Class is very boring. 
                
                   He is by far the best professor I have ever had! He is easy to understand, because he goes into detail to make sure his students comprehend what he is teaching. He is approachable and really works with you in order to ensure success in his class. Can't wait to take his classes next semester!!!
                
                   Fantastic professor! Definitely one of my favorites, really funny and really helpful. His class is always a joy to go to, I would recommend him to any psychology majors or any other major for that matter!
                
                   First, I have a very high GPA, but his lectures were very fast-paced with little clarity.  He made students scared to ask questions by making them seem dumb for asking. His tests were extremely hard.  I made a high B in the course but learned absolutely nothing.
                
                   Incredible professor. Respectful, helpful, good sense of humor and clear. Makes math amazingly fun.
                
                   Brilliant instructor! I recommend him to everyone I know. You will know the experimental method, how to perform experiments and how to write an APA manuscript by the time you leave this class. It's also a plus that he's easy on the eyes, kind, and hilarious!
                
                   He is a verrrry good at explaining things slowly; if you ever don't understand anything he will make sure you do until he continues.
                
                   Great teacher. I learned so much!!! Take him!!
                
                   He is a good instuctor but his test are very comfusing so make sure you got to the Math lab. He say's he's there to help you but when you ask him something he gets mad at you and likes to talk to students like there dumb.
                
                   Excellent professor! Very precise and great at explaining things.  He is always available if you need help and a pretty laid back, fun guy to be around.
                
                   He's cool but his intro psychology class is a lot harder than most.He definately makes you think but he gives a quiz every week and you will actually have to read to pass them.
                
                   He is a great teacher! He is very helpful and is very clear. I highly recommend him!
                
                   Great teacher.  Take his class if you have the chance.
                
                   Great class...you'll learn a lot.  The guy is wired all the time, so you'll definitely be able to pay attention.  Easy to look at, too :)
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He has done a wonderful job and makes the class fun. His tests are not hard at all, they dont require a lot of studies because they are derived from the big concepts we learned in class.If I had the chance to take his class again I would. Take him before you take his wife! I've heard horror stories on her.
                
                   Good activities.  Very clear.  Fun class to take.  Helps you look at things from a child's point of view.  Interesting class, and he teaches you different forms of elementary math that are new and simple.  Will help you become a good teacher.
                
                   She is well spoken and knows what she is talking about. She tries to help and always responds back to emails quickly unlike the lecture professor. Attendance is a HUGE part of the grade so don't skip. She does offer a lot of extra credit opportunities though. If you behave and try she will treat with you respect, if you don't she can be very sassy.
                
                   Although the material is boring, you can tell her passion by how she lectures and tries her best to relate concepts to real world examples. She is definitely a great professor to keep for the long-haul. I'm just not a fan of MC questions but remember it's only one class of the few you take each semester!  
                
                   All grades are online except for attendance. Attendance isn't required necessarily but it is a grade so only miss when you know you are fine grade-wise. The class is extremely easy if you take the quizzes and tests by the deadlines. The lectures are long and somewhat boring but hang in there. It's an easy "A".
                
                   The material is super boring and dry but she tries to make the best of it. She gives a lot of real world examples to help you remember them. There are quizzes every week and 4 total tests and 2 essays. Everything is online. Her tests are 80% multiple choice and 20% essays and she gets the essay questions from videos in class so go to class!  
                
                   Grading tactics poor, confusing on assignment due dates. No help at all. Does not reply to emails. It's an easy class she is just set in her own beliefs. 
                
                   Professor Allen is awesome! Very articulate, down to earth, and approachable. I would love to take another class by her. A professor who loves what she is doing and very passionate about Psychology her class was truly a Wonderful experience.
                
                   Best professor by far.
                
                   She was very personable and truly wanted her students to get what they needed from the class. She went over and beyond to provide necessary materials to students. She tailored the xlass to the needs of her students. Great professor!
                
                   Professor Allen is really personable, laid-back, and caring. I entered the class thinking Health Psych would be boring - NOT! One of the best psychology classes I have taken. She teaches by each student present a chapter via powerpoint. I worked hard in this class, but didn't over-stress. Shirley is a counselor who has true empathy for her students
                
                   Wonderful professor. She wants you to enjoy the class, not be stressed out by it. There is 2 exams, 1 article review, 2 wkbk papers, wellness paper, and ppt presentation. Definitely glad that I took her! I wish she taught more psych classes at A&M Commerce (Higher Education Center).
                
                   Ashley is awesome! She keeps her lectures entertaining so there is never a dull moment in class. She presents the material in a way you can easily understand it. Her tests are really easy! She posts a review sheet that has everything you need to know for the test plus she posts sample questions for the test that are very much like the actual test!
                
                   Ashley Yaugher was by far my favorite professor this semester. She's funny, and while her class isn't hard, it is still very educational. I literally thought about switching to a psychology major at one point because I enjoy her class so much.
                
                   I loved this class. Super informative, and not hard to get an A. She's really helpful, and the textbook website is great to learn the material-without reading it.
                
                   Her lectures are fun and she trys to connect the material to the students in a way that they'll understand. She also loves her dog..a lot. But she's very funny and clear, she obviously loves this subject and is always willing to help and explain the material again! 
                
                   Had him for 203, 204 is just a little harder, but similar teaching style, just be prepared for question that test concept. Not all simple memorization
                
                   A good professor,reading before the class will get you prepared for class. Not much excess out of class work, except for the lab portion. Definitely worth 4 hours of credit, and an easy a, exams aren't tricky at all.
                
                   Easy if you go to class and take notes. The book doesn't always match the slides but it's close enough you could get a good grade without going to class that often. Easy A if you study, however it depends on how cool your TA is.
                
                   She's a very nice lady. 4x MC Tests, no final. You have to go to lecture to fill in the blanks in the notes she posts on WebCT. Lecture is okay, she just goes over the notes. You should study those notes and (maybe) read the book a little. She offers up to 5 extra credit points, she announces this in class. Interesting class.
                
                   She was amazing! She makes sure that everyone is understanding the material and she engages with her students a lot. It was an easy A for me.
                
                   I LOVED her!! She made the class so much fun and entertaining. Human sexuality can be an awkward topic but she makes everyone feel comfortable.  She made it to where I looked forward to class everyday! She is very approachable and gives really easy extra credit. No reading, her tests are strictly from her powerpoints! I HIGHLY recommend her!
                
                   Good Speaker. Makes Psychology interesting. Test are 70-80% lecture. If you go to class and Read the chapters once you will make an A in the class
                
                   If you have any interest in psychology whatsoever you will be fine in this class.
                
                   good speaker, doesn't put you to sleep, always willing to help out
                
                   Taking her Fall 13. No reading and no homework. Attendance is mandatory, lecture is boring, and slides are not posted. Read the book  b/c some material she does a poor job covering some material some material not covered is on the test. she let us make cheat sheets, both side, filled with whatever you want. 3 easy tests, non-cumulative, no final.
                
                   She was sweet but fairly boring...And she gives alot of busy work
                
                   In my class we only had two exams. They were fairly hard but he does curve. I was told by others to drop his class. I stuck it out studied hard and read, still came out a few points under a A. I will not take him again.
                
                   Test are very picky and hard. You MUST read the textbook and reread it to have a chance on hist tests. He is very interesting and easy to listen to. Your grade will be from 3 tests and that is it.
                
                   
                
                   Dr. Smallman is a friendly yet fierce woman who is very clear about her class requirements. The tests and the test review will KILL YOU. She helped me consistently to improve my grade. Take advantage of office hours, and ask questions & for examples! Willing to help if you put in the effort too! She could tell my effort and helped my grade in end.
                
                   Smallman is a great professor. She gives outlines for her lectures so you can actually listen to what she's saying and write down examples instead of trying to scramble and write down definitions. Tests are fairly easy if you have studied and the final isn't cumulative.
                
                   If you like relaxed lectures and a chill in-class environment, don't take Smallman. She is very structured and covers material QUICKLY in class. There are only 2 exams and a final so each exam covers A LOT of material, but they aren't very difficult. Do the study guides she posts (very long so start early) and you will get an A.
                
                   Smallman attempts to give review materials that should make studying for the tests easier but it's still a REAL struggle to get an A or B because she makes psych so much harder than it has to be. Wouldn't recommend or take her again.
                
                   Professor Smallman goes out of her way to give you review materials for the test, for tests we had a jeopardy, practice test and review sheet which are all helpful. Be warned though second test was a bit harder than the first. Posts lectures after she's covered them and also has the funniest videos to reinforce concepts in class. Would take again. 
                
                   She is the best psychology professor! She gives you test reviews that are exactly like her exams. If you want an easy A, take this class.
                
                   Dr. Smallman was one of the best professors I have had so far! Her lectures were always interesting and she shows lots of videos for better understanding. She gives lecture outlines for every lecture. Tests can be slightly tricky, but assignments and participation will ensure a good grade. No cumulative final and all grades are weighted evenly.
                
                   Prof Smallman was one of my favorite professors. I had her morning class and at first I dreaded it, but then I actually got excited to get up and go to her class. It is very smart to go to every lecture since her test questions are based off of what she elaborates on in class. 
                
                   I did not think I would be into this class but Smallman kept the class really interesting. She does do class participation so you have to show up to a majority of the lectures to get the points for that. I personally read the textbook for each chapter we covered but it is not really required. If you take Psyc take Smallman, she is a great teacher!
                
                   Tests are very specific, but if you study and relate the material to your personal experiences you'll do fine. She is a great teacher and makes lecture interesting.
                
                   This class was pretty easy. She was willing to help when needed. Not difficult at all.
                
                   She gives out outlines before every lectures with makes it much easier to take notes. The iclicker examples are similar to the test questions. She tells you exactly what will be on the test. You only have three papers to write which were graded very easily. I did not have to put much effort into the papers and still made A's on them.  
                
                   Take her! Gave all the materials needed to make a high grade if attend class and get full participation points! (in class assign., clicker questions/3 written assign./4 tests) all are possible to make A on if study a little. **Tells your exactly which sections needed to be read in book that aren't covering class** Gives notes outlines for lectures
                
                   Great teacher, made the material interesting in memorable.  The tests were fairly easy if you study. My only complaint is that the papers were graded harshly, but that has more to do with the TA.  I would highly recommend this teacher!
                
                   Such a good prof! GO TO CLASS! She does iclickers and completion quizzes and these points can be the difference between letter grades. She's very knowledgable about the subject and her lectures are entertaining. I didn't read the textbook at all, just took good notes  and studied the night before tests. Got a B in the class.
                
                   She was great. I enjoyed coming to class every day. whatched a lot of videos. I never read out of te book. I just took detailed notes and studied the main points off of them from the review sheet. She gives completion quizzes/clicker questions, so go to class. I suggest taking your own notes and not using her given ones.
                
                   Dr.Smallman knows what she's doing. She uses a lot of videos and metaphors in order to help you understand the concept. Her tests are a bit difficult, so you should definitely study. You should also show up to class, because she gives out in class "quizzes" which are basically free points.
                
                   She is nice, and does teach. There are very few grades, so if you do bad on one then you're screwed. She doesn't give extra credit, and everything is important. She does give review sheets for the test that helps, but you really have to study. Her test are pretty hard, but she is managable. Not too bad overall.
                
                   Like the second person said, she is not horrible but the tests are very tricky. She does assign writing assignments which are not difficult. As long as you put some effort into them you can get 100s. Those helped my grade a lot. She was also very helpful when I went to her office hours to discuss a grade I made, she made adjustments to bump it up.
                
                   She isnt as bad as the person said. her teaching is very engaging, she uses a lot of youtube videos which kept my attention for the most part. you will have to read all of the book to get a clear understanding of the material though.her tests are kind of tricky,but they are def not impossible. i got a b in the class, and i gave average effort.
                
                   Steve Smith is one of the harder psychology professors. His lectures are very interesting and he is really funny, but the tests are difficult. Don't take this class expecting an easy A. You HAVE to read the textbook. Half of the test comes from lecture, and half from the book. Get your experiments done early so you don't have to worry at the end.
                
                   Smith is a fun guy. I love his lecture style, where he'll make a joke or say something ironic about the material, and gauges the class' understanding off of their reaction. If everyone laughs, he knows you've learned. Two tips, 1) go to class. he basically lays out the test topics in class. 2) read the book on what he talked about in class. Easy A.
                
                   I expected this class to be an easy A and was definitely wrong. The lectures are sometimes interesting, but the exams were pretty difficult.
                
                   Lectures are interesting but they have little information that is on the test. Textbook is a must to pass! Exams are difficult and you must read the book. Smith is a funny guy but there are easier psyc107 profs to take for a good grade
                
                   Textbook use is a must. The class consists of 4 total tests and only two assignments. No extra credit. Made a C on the first test and followed it up with 3 A's. Not a hard class, but textbook is essential to doing well on the tests. 
                
                   I was so excited to take psychology but whenever I took the first test I soon realized that most of the information comes from the book. He tries to make class fun by making jokes and talking about experiments but covers little of what will be on the test. You have to attend class because you doesn't post his slide shows.
                
                   Tests are over in-class lectures and terms from the book, take notes in class or you will not pass! Three tests and he drops the lowest grade. Is happy to answer questions during tests. He is hilarious, engaging and would definitely take again!!
                
                   He's a great professor and makes the lessons fun with a few jokes and funny examples. Make sure to go to every class and take really good notes! Most of the tests are based on the notes with a few things from the book so it's always good to scan the book when studying. I really enjoyed this class. And the projects weren't difficult. 
                
                   You get what you give. Go to his lectures. Take good notes. Read the textbook. Drops lowest test grade
                
                   his lectures are boring and you need to read the book because he has random questions from there
                
                   Dr. Smith makes going to class so much more enjoyable! He is truly one of my favorite professors. The tests are tough and are equally based off of the lecture and the textbook. If you study the material and go to class an A is easily attainable. Love love love him!  
                
                   Dr. Smith is great. We did not use the book at all, so you will have to go to class, but the lectures are really interesting. Super easy class with really interesting subject material; can't lose.
                
                   Tests are very difficult and come mostly from the textbook. His lectures are very entertaining and keep you interested, but the lectures only cover a few topics for the test.
                
                   Definitely a harder class than I expected. Studied a lot and received C's on all tests and tests are the only grades. Reading the book and class are necessary and he is very engaging. I recommend him if you already have experience in the material, but if pysch is new to you, there are much easier profs.
                
                   I loved Professor Smith! He was clear with a cheesy, yet very funny sense of humor. I learned a lot from him and his tests are very easy. Reading the textbook helps, but it is not mandatory for a good grade. I definitely look forward to taking more of his classes in the future.
                
                   Extremely engaging professor with a great sense of humor. Tests were quite easy with most of the material coming from lecture (so go to class), with some information backed up by or entirely from the book (so read that as well). It is a lot of info and he presents it quickly so pay attention and ask questions if you're confused, he will explain.
                
                   I was super excited on the first day of class because I thought it was going to be a great one. Boy was I wrong. There are no grades besides the tests, and there is always almost too much information to study for. The tests were definitely not easy, and going to class did not help much.
                
                   I went to class everyday, took notes, and studied. I made a C. Class can be very interesting but tests are difficult even if you read the whole book. There's no homework so your grade is dependent on the tests. I wouldn't sign up for his class if possible.
                
                   Ms. Seto was a GREAT instructor. She made sure that everyone really understood the concepts we were learning and she's super sweet! The class itself was pretty easy. She posts the slides before class and they have a few blanks, but you could get by with not going to class.
                
                   I thought I would hate stats but Dr. Schlegel made it so simple. She knows no one is excited about stats and she works so hard to make sure you understand and wants you to ask questions. You can tell she really enjoys her job and helping students.
                
                   Dr. Schlegel really made statistics easier to learn. She brings enthusiasm and humor and shows a lot of videos to help understand concepts too. She gives a lot of examples and posts slides online. I didn't open my book once and made low A's on the tests. She makes the class laugh all the time and is really enjoyable to listen to! GO TO CLASS
                
                   I cannot stress this enough: If you are a PSYC major and you have to take this class, TAKE DR. SCHLEGEL! I was intimidated of statistics, but she is so enthusiastic and explains concepts in multiple ways to make it easier to understand. I also felt like I could ask questions and not feel stupid or like I was putting her out. She genuinely cares!!!
                
                   This class was actually pretty interesting. Not very difficult and going to class wasn't too bad because she talks about a lot of interesting studies and shows lots of videos. She's very nice and her tests are pretty easy if you study for them. 
                
                   Really a great person to learn from. She brings enthusiasm to statistics which is a difficult thing to do considering how dry the subject matter is.
                
                   It's actually Schlegel, not Schleger. But she is fantastic! Makes statistics really fun! There are 3 tests and a final, which is not cumulative. There are lab assignments that can boost your grade. We also had 4 writing assignments in lab - each had a rough draft and a final draft. They're not bad at all. Overall, great prof!
                
                   I never went to class, but studied the book and made A's on the tests from that.  Passed with a B though b/c the homework was pretty tough.
                
                   Pretty calm/cool guy. He taught Stats the first time this semester, and I think he's doin' a good job. 3 Tests+1 Final. 10HWs. He knows the stuff and the TA holds weekly Review sessions where you can ask questions. He doesn't go over the material too fast. Since you're probably gonna have to take the class, it's not a bad idea to take it with him.
                
                   Dr. Morey is an amazing instructor! If you want to improve on your knowledge in psychology then I would recommend him, but if you want an easy A you might as well look for another instructor. He is a great reference for getting to the next step, in class and out, so if you are serious about psychology then this is one professor you want to have. 
                
                   One of the best professors I have ever had. Hard tests, but only because of my lack of ability.  A class to take to improve, rather than a class for good grades, though good grades will naturally follow for good students.
                
                   He's one of the very best professors that I've ever had. Life-changing.
                
                   Great Prof. Show up to class and you will get an A. Very entertaining to listen to.
                
                   Had her for WGST 300. She changed the course up somewhat from what is written in other comments below. The class is 3 tests, which are fully essay based. She gives you a list of 10, and she picks 3 at random. The class is not a blow off, and there are pop quizzes that you must study for. Class is dificult now, but not impossible.
                
                   Dr. Miner was amazing this semester. Your grade is determined on 4 test grades and that is it. She does offer extra credit if you attend various women's related events. Very funny and makes you want to pay attention in class! Also she is very approachable and willing to help!
                
                   I LOVED Dr. Miner. She gave lots of extra credit and her tests were all online. You do need to go to every class though, because sometimes she puts specific things on her tests that she only said one time during class. She was really funny too.
                
                   She's so funny and she will change your view on life.
                
                   Very fun, very nice. Class is entertaining. 3 tests, 3 papers, 100 points each. Loads of extra credit. Tests are hard! Her friendliness will mislead you, she seems easy but requires a lot from you. Multi-choice and essay tests. MUST read the book! She does not cover everything in class, and 60% of material is from book.
                
                   Love her! Great professor.
                
                   She is wonderful! The class is interesting and the prof is very funny! Tests are a few multiple choice, a few short answer, and one essay. This may change for future classes but it's not tough. Had to write four papers, not too difficult. You'll learn so much from this class.
                
                   I am minoring in psychology and loved learning about the many disorders in this class! Sadly, I slacked off during the first half of the semester. I will most likely be getting a B. It is not very difficult to make an A. Show up to class and fill in the blanks in the power points. She is very sweet and easy to listen to. extra credit for attendance
                
                   Beware of taking a course with this professor! Lectures are dreadful. Attending class is mandatory to receive credit for in class assignment. In class you will learn more about Dr. LeUness than sports psychology. For exams, you have to know the book like the back of your hand! He actually wrote the book, which is about a decade old (literally).
                
                   LeUnes' lectures are usually very relaxed and entertaining, but aren't very helpful for the tests. The key to doing well on exams/in the class is reading the chapters in the book (written by LeUnes himself). A's aren't necessary on exams for an A in the course bc of IN CLASS activity extra credit. The extra credit is substantial, and an 85A.
                
                   TAKE THIS CLASS. Dr. LeUnes is a great professor and cares about his students actually LEARNING. He doesn't stand up at the front of the class and bark at you, he tells stories
                
                   I have never had such a hard time studying for a test as I did for Dr. LeUnes'. Going to class is pointless unless he gives out a participation assignment that day. He rambles on about his life and there is absolutely no organization to the course. Tests are jumbled and confusing just like his lectures. I do not recommend him.
                
                   He goes off on tangents and tells a lot of stories. We don't get too much done in class. Reading the textbook is essential. The tests are still a little difficult and the questions can be tricky. So make sure to read every chapter and take notes. He gives a review sheet for each exam which can be really helpful.
                
                   His tests are extremely difficult. I go to class and read the book and still barely get by. He is an awesome guy and has a great attitude but his class is extremely difficult.
                
                   He's awesome
                
                   Not your normal PSYC class. Dr. LeUnes spends most of the lecture time hitting small bullet points from the text and mostly telling life stories. Must read the textbook to pass, and he is the author. 6 tests with no comprehensive final. Test questions are not copy/paste from book so you have to translate the reading to his expectations.
                
                   LeUnes is a very nice guy. he's funny and can tell a good story.. but he is an awful teacher. In a 50min class AT LEAST 30-35min each day is filled with stories and other things that will NOT be on the exams. reading textbook is mandatory to pass the tests. I found the book to be pretty poor teaching tool. guess what, he wrote it!
                
                   Leunes is the man! He's a really nice guy and extremely flexible. He does tend to go off on tangents about his personal life during lecture that don't really have anything to do with class content. still, take him if you can...funny guy as well
                
                   Professor LeUnes is the bomb!!!  Take any class from him if you have the opportunity... if you don't you are missing out.
                
                   Very nice person but hardly teaches content. He tells stories for the entire class period. Class is interesting but YOU HAVE TO READ THE TEXTBOOK TO PASS THE TESTS. Drops one of the 5 tests.
                
                   i took prof leunes for abnormal and LOVED him!! he really didn't go over any information in class, just told stories about his career that pertained to the topic we were studying so reading is mandatory, but everything is really interesting. tests are multiple choice, pretty easy, if you get something wrong and argue it well he will give you credit
                
                   Dr. Koehler was a pretty fun prof. She had some great stories from working as a prison psychologist, so her class was alright. For the tests, read the BOOK!
                
                   Tests are HARD, she only has a mid-term and a final so you have no real chance to make up your grade. The class is hybrid so it is also online for quizzes but they are not worth much of your grade. She is a great teacher and go to class because she talks more in depth on the notes but on tests there seemed to be more than one right answer.
                
                   Very funny, entertaining lectures, really made the class interesting and the lectures enjoyable. Everything is based on lecture, so don't even bother buying the book. Tests are tricky, just make sure you know your stuff, how to apply it, and what it actually looks like in an example.
                
                   Best class I've taken. Not the easiest but she is so entertaining and naturally funny that I looked forward to her class. Loved her and the material she taught
                
                   Come to class! She gives note outlines but she usually explains in detail what will be on the test in class. She tells stories and shows a lot of videos! Very interactive teacher! She's great! There are a few online quizes. The final is cumulative.
                
                   Professor Hull is a great teacher. She makes the material interesting and entertaining. Atendence is not mandatory but her tests are based on lecture NOT the book. Her tests are hard but fair. I loved her!
                
                   Dr. Hull is amazing!  I definitely recommend her class!  She teaches with youtube and her lectures are so much fun && definitely NOT boring.  It's easy to get involved and want to dive deeper into the subject.  She's really funny!
                
                   LOVED HER!!!<3
                
                   Great professor! She really makes the material interesting and relates it to everyday life. Her tests are difficult, so I highly suggest attending SI sessions (she has a great TA too!). If you're a psyc major you should take her class.
                
                   Dr. Hull is an awesome teacher. She'll talk with you until she's sure you understand it and enjoys getting to know students. Tests aren't the easiest, but mostly lecture. TAKE HER! She's the best.
                
                   An excellent professor, worthy of every teaching award she has won. Her tests are mostly based on lecture, so attendance is pretty mandatory though she doesn't take roll. She is very thorough with her lessons often pausing to clarify details that were not understood. She loves to joke and often relates the course material to fun imagery. Awesome!
                
                   She's awesome. Very helpful and knows how to help you study more efficiently. her tests are moderately difficult but you end up actually learning the material. I love her class, she makes psyc. interesting and fun. plus! she uses youtube for examples!
                
                   She always takes time to answer your questions after class, she doesn't take attendance, but her class is pretty interesting, and she's really awesome and will help you get the grade you want by your hard work. It's my fav class.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Best prof I've ever had at a&m. She dominates over all.
                
                   Dr. Edens is great! She's hilarious and a good professor. She makes the lectures interesting and provides videos and examples for clarity. I read most of the assigned chapters in the book, did the extra articles/videos, and went to class and the tests weren't that bad. I got an A on the paper. She's my favorite professor and would 100% recommend!!
                
                   Lectures are fun and interesting but many, if not half of the questions on exams are exclusively from lecture. You need to both go to class AND read the book to get an A. I just read the book and skipped a few classes per exam and earned a B. Going to class will get you extra credit but it only helps if you're on the borderline in between grades.
                
                   Dr. Edens is very enthusiastic about the subject matter and makes lectures very interesting to go to. Her tests can be tough if you don't study but she has short assignments that are easy to get full credit on that make up for the points you lose on the test. Overall she makes class interesting, you learn a lot, and assigns fair assignments.
                
                   Dr. Edens is extremely funny. Knows how to keep her class interesting. Considering how fun and interesting it was, the test were tough if you did not read the book. Don't rely on her powerpoint to get you through the semester. 
                
                   She is an amazing prof and easily one of the best lecturers at TAMU. Her tests are hard but it's easy to make an A if you try! Go to class! Take her she is hilarious!  
                
                   Dr. Edens was great! Her lectures were entertaining and thought provoking, and I thought her tests were fair. I got an A after barely cracking the book open the night before each test. Make sure you watch the videos though! I missed one once and it came back to haunt me during the test. All in all, I would definitely take Dr. Edens again!
                
                   Dr. Edens is a very nice and funny, and it is easy to tell that she loves what she teaches. She does challenge you, but as a psychology major, that is what I needed. It is essential to attend class and read the assigned readings (which are very short) in order to get a good grade on the exams, which can be tough. All in all, I would take her again.
                
                   She is so funny! Class is always a blasts and I'm not even super interested in psychology but I love going to her class, definitely want to take her psych of women class next semester!
                
                   Dr. Edens was a great professor and extremely helpful but the tests in this class were very hard. You don't have to go to class but be sure to memorize the slides and skim over the book and additional material. I would take another class by her if I could
                
                   DR. EDENS IS THE BOMB! Hilarious, confident & entertaining. I found the material so interesting that I enjoyed coming to class & studying for exams. Easy A for me! Prepare to read the textbook - her exams come largely from text & lecture material. Small easy assignments, exams are multiple choice. Favorite class of the semester!
                
                   I thought she was a great professor and is very outgoing and much more laid back than my other professors.  She makes the concepts very relatable and easier to understand.  Super funny... Love her!
                
                   I loved her!!! She was a great professor and the class was very interesting. I actually learned and retained a ton of information. There is bonus points for good attendance in the class. Few assignments. Tests aren't bad if you read the chapter and study her slideshows. 
                
                   FAVORITE PROF I'VE HAD AT A&M THUS FAR!! I never zoned out in lectures because she was so incredibly outgoing and her lectures were so interesting I didn't want to miss anything! You will love her! TAKE THIS PROFESSOR!!!
                
                   Have your textbook handy and read it.  Make sure to read extra readings. Hard class have to work hard to pass the tests. 
                
                   Dr. Edens is an amazing professor: organized, teaches well (give great examples & provides videos & pictures to help explain), and hilarious. She is outgoing and enjoys her field of study. Her class is what made my semester good. Definitely read before class to stay on top. Tests are easy, but be able to apply to scenarios!! Bonus pts for attending
                
                   My favorite class I've taken at A&M so far and by far my favorite prof!!! I didn't even mind attending class because Dr. Edens is so engaging and interesting! LOVE THIS CLASS! 
                
                   Dr. Edens was great and made this class so interesting. Lectures flew by because I was so interested in what she was talking about and I'm not even a psych major. Tests are usually a little tricky, just make sure to read the book, and study your notesher powerpoints. More studyinghigher grades, easily. TAKE THIS PROF! :)
                
                   Edens is fantastic. Wonderful lectures and so incredibly interesting. But those tests are tough.. Didn't expect that even after studying and reading a lot. The material is easy but those tests aren't clear cut. She does provide other grades besides the tests though. I'd take her again though.
                
                   Very helpful but the tests were pretty tricky. The first test I didn't study for and received a decent grade. But for the rest of the other tests, I studied for them and received a lower grade. She uses a lot of the textbook as well as lecture. If you are having trouble, she is very helpful and would recommend going to her for some tips.
                
                   She is a cool prof. She just doesn't provide enough study material to help for tests. You only get a print out of notes ,lectures , and a textbook.  Nothing is really clear. Test are really confusing. 
                
                   This is not an easy A class. This is not an easy B class. Class grade average after the final was 73. Reading the textbook is necessary and the archaic way she teaches requires for you to come to class and take extensive notes. There are 2-3 pop quizzes each week over heavy psych articles. If you take this class, be prepared to work for your grade!
                
                   Super easy. No book this semester (Fall 13). It was all slides that he posted online. He  puts blanks in slides and you them in in class. He has in class exercises and sometimes articles we must read and write a reaction paper on. It's completion grade. Tests are super easy, all from slides, he tells you what to look over. would take him again.
                
                   lazy, reads stuff off the slides and most of it isn't on test. you gotta read the chapters, and go through all the online book resources (summaries, prac quizes, term flashcards, and short (2min.) animated lecture videos). thoroughly go over all that and you can make an A on the tests. lots of extra-credit opportunities!!
                
                   Very good Professor. I was an experimental class format that had us in groups, she gave us handouts and worksheets and had us discuss it in our groups. You make some real good friends this way! You will need to read the book b/c that is where the test comes from. This teacher is amazing, take her if at all possible for Psych of Adjustment!!!
                
                   One group project and an individual one. Not too hard. She grades tests in a timely manner, but not the other assignments. She's really nice and easily approachable. Read the book if you want to do well on exams, especially toward the end. Don't by the May Reader, the supporting book.
                
                   Took her two semesters in a row. First was psych of sex other was psych of women and both classes were great. She truly cares about her students and she's extremely easy to understand. Both times she curved the grades on the exams. Would definitely take another class from her.
                
                   easiest 3 hour class i've ever taken. barely any outside work or studying. def take her if you can.
                
                   Easy, all online quizes, cuts you a lot of breaks.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Professor Benjamin is incredibly knowledgeable in all types of psychology and he is credited in almost all of our intro books.
                
                   Instructions unclear for writing papers. Feedback for paper was personally degrading, rather than referring to writing, grammer, etc.
                
                   He's passionate about History of Psychology & an excellent story-teller.  Lectures are very interesting.  High expectations from students, but not unreasonable.  He's an excellent prof to take this class from.
                
                   really arrogant!
                
                   honors class is awesome. not easy but very interesting.
                
                   Big tall guy, looks intimidating at first. Will help you though. Reasonable workload, good class.
                
                   hard not to pay attention - he's a looker! But that aside, Dr. Oslund is quite the charismatic lecturer. He also takes the time to answer questions and clarify misunderstandings. If you don't understand, he patiently will explain it differently. Not an easy professor - definitely makes you work for the grade! A+ prof. Highly recommended.    
                
                   Oslund was a great teacher, he was very funny, made the class very enjoyable, I looked forward to this class.  As long as you take good notes and attend class you will do fine.
                
                   Dr. Daniel is inconsistent. She demands attendance to her class or your grade will reflect. She does not understand when things happen outside of school. Also, this class was miserably boring. I would recommend that anyone who is considering her, reconsider.
                
                   Class is focused on Power Points that are directly from the book. She makes the class like high school and treats it as such. Also gets off topic during the lecture as well as tells unimportant information. If you go to the class and semi pay attention you'll pass, but you will be VERY bored.
                
                   Has the powerpoints online and reads off them in class. Makes it almost pointless to show up to class.
                